
                   dr. dudt is the BEST teacher i have EVER had. she knows her material, conveys that knowledge in a clear manner, and really works to help students reach their potential. take her for ALL possible classes! wish there were more like her!!
                
                   Dr. Dudt rocks!  It was a hard class, but awesome!
                
                   Dr. Dudt is probably the best professor I've ever had.  I learned so much from her, and I think that if you ask anyone who has had her before, they will tell you the same.
                
                   Dr. Dudt is one of my most favorite professors here at WT! She makes one work, but she does so in order to help us learn the most we can. I am always able to visit her and ask for help. I highly recommend taking one of her courses.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Doty is just simply the man. He is always in an upbeat mood, brings a high level of enthusiasm to every class, is hilarious at the most unexpected times, and highly encourages imaginative thinking, critical analysis, and personal development. He knows his Shakespeare inside and out. You will read, you will write, you will be challenged but worth it
                
                   I found this class enjoyable because I am so passionate about what he teaches. Even if you don't care about English or Shakespeare, the guy is an absolute genius! Always so enthused and fun to listen to. 
                
                   He actually challenges his students, is a good person, has contagious enthusiasm, and teaches with patience and kindness. Super cool guy.
                
                   He's a really good teacher.
                
                   Dr. Werden is really hard if you take his online class
                
                   Great!!!!!
                
                   high energy and well prepared.  easy to talk to.  learned so much from him
                
                   cool
                
                   Does not explain well at all, and docks points for no reason at all. Fails you on a paper and then doesn't specify why. Acts like she cares and wants to help you, but then doesn't.
                
                   It's a writing class.  She's not there to entertain you.  Do what you're told and QYB.
                
                   She gives you TONS of work. 8 papers a semester. Everyday its the same boring process. Nothing new happens. We did the same thing each day. And she doesnt give instructions clearly.
                
                   very good professor.  old school and demanding.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   smart and well researched.  he has a habit of pacing while he lectures but overall very good professor
                
                   he is a great professor.  one of my favorites at WTAMU.  an inspiration.
                
                   Very tough grader. Terrible feedback, would say my rough draft was really good but give me a B or even a C. Doesn't explain very well, also doesn't help. He might seem like your best friend the first week but them pretends he doesn't know you. Don't skip class, quizzes all the time. Plus you never get out early, usually 5 minutes late.
                
                   He does not explain any of his assignments well. If you ask for help you can forget about it, because he does not even help. He does not help you when you make a mistake on a writing paper, and gives no explanation on why it's wrong. Over all not a very good professor!
                
                   He does not make his lessons clear to the students. When asking for help he has a sarcastic persona and makes his students not want to ask questions. He never gives good help when he does help you. Over all not a very good teacher, but he will improve your writing skills if that is what you are looking for. 
                
                   He acts like he is endowed with superior intellect, so it is nearly impossible to ask him questions because he "scoffs" at us. Idk how he doesn't have bad reviews because no one likes him. 
                
                   Good class, he was strict, but I excelled in his class. He gives an extra credit opportunity right off the bat if you help him but passing out papers and writing on the board. He offered to write me a letter of recommendation after the end of his class. I liked him well enough
                
                   Yes he actually is a really easy professor. Let's just say that he would be better suited teaching special ed. On my term paper, instead of taking off points where it actually mattered -i.e. ideas & spelling/grammar he took off 10 points for every line where I put too much space on the works cited... seriously? So I ended up getting a C on it...
                
                   He is a challenging teacher and his class is not easy at all if you want above a C. You will leave his class with a very high level of satisfaction though if you try your hardest.
                
                   Very very hard professor, very nick picky, not open to what your views are. His way or the highway, his idea's or fail! Has a good attitude until he gets ahold of of your paper and a red pen!
                
                   Yes, he is really hard professor. However, if you do all the assignments on time you can count on a good grade. He always helps his students with any question you have. I strongli recommend this professor for the students who like and will study. Esp. if you want to know COMPOSITION better, he is the right choice.
                
                   Yes the attendance is mandatory but the class isnt that hard! If your like the slacker below yes it wont be an easy A because you have to read some out of class every week, but its only 2 chapters so its not that big of a deal. Also he gives tons of easy quizes that help boost your grade! Def. better than Dr. Werden from 1301 who is on crack!
                
                   Dr. Hart is awesome without a doubt and her passion is contagious, but doesn't communicate well outside of lectures sometimes.
                
                   The class is very interesting and good interpretation of British lit. but Dr. Hart is a little spacey, hard to get a hold of and is very very slow at grading (Week 7 grades were still missing on week 14) so you never have an accurate view of what your grade is. ONLINE COURSE- You must read the books, but is interesting and worth taking.
                
                   3 test is all you get, but he tells you what is on the test.  This professor wants you to learn but does not want you to fail.  He had a great personality and even though he does not act like it, he cares about his students. Great professor :)
                
                   I am currently taking his World Literature class and it's well worth the time. He spends as much time necessary in order to help students understand the material. Upon going over Greek texts, i.e. the Odyssey, we spent very little time on why Odysseus is heroic. However, while reading the Ramanyana, he spent time explaining how Rama is a Hindu hero
                
                   Dr. J. was by far the best professor I ever had at WT. Class was never boring (we often diagrammed Duran Duran lyrics in Advanced Grammar, just for fun). He helped spark my interest in linguistics, and he always pushed me to exceed my expectations. I have since become an English and ESOL teacher, due in part to his influence. Thanks, Dr. Jacobsen!
                
                   Do not expect to coast in Jacobsen's courses. Do, however, expect to examine English from a scientific perspective and be amazed at how neat that really is. Also, be prepared to rock out.
                
                   OUTSTANDING PROFESSOR! Dr. Jacobsen was easily the best professor I had this term. He challenges the class to think beyond the stories we read. He puts the stories into their time periods to show how ancient writings are applied to today's society. This course was required, but because of him, I'm thinking of voluntarily taking his Asian Lit course
                
                   Really good professor.  He customizes tests for the material.  One test may be a take home essay, the other may be entirely fill in the blank.  Pay close attention to the Syllabus for reading assignments and if he doesn't specify whether or not you are reading or watching a film, ask him, he kinda expects you to already know.
                
                   Dr. Jacobsen is not necessarily a difficult professor, but is unwilling to make exceptions for any missed class or even help a student make-up work.  His classes are boring as he just blabs about pointless information, and unfortunately, my experience resulted in many other negative repercussions than just hating his class.
                
                   He is an EXCELLENT professor. I could never ask for a better influence. I will remember his methods until I'm very old. I loved the way he made us think when we were down to the last minute of class. He doesn't bother with the little things; he makes you think outside the norm, logically, and he is quite a wit.
                
                   He's an excellent prof.  In honors it's all discussion, and while there isn't many assignments, the reading can be quite a payload.  If you're in honors, take his class, but be prepared to hear him ask you, &quot;What else&#63;&quot; when you are out of ideas.  Even if you've read the stories you're reviewing, I'd suggest reading them again anyways; you'll be glad you did.
                
                   He is very enthusiastic about his subject and very knowledgeable.  He's good at making us think -- and making us WANT to think.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I have had multiple classes with Dr. Jacobsen.  He is brilliant, funny, and engaging.  A definite must have at the university.  He's not easy nor impossible.  A super A+
                
                   Mr. Klaehn is fun to be around and makes his class enjoyable even when the content is boring! He also has a really interesting life outside of class that he does mention occasionally, which always lightens the mood. 
                
                   Teacher is clearly existentially bored - not exactly engaged and it comes across in his teaching style. He is a decent guy - funny, smart - just kind of cynical. He's sarcastic, a bit condescending and stingy with praise. His instructions are confusing and his input is vague. Good luck navigating his disorganized assignments online also.
                
                   I loved his class, very helpful. He cares about his students and he's pretty funny and sarcastic.
                
                   He is a very good teacher. He cares about teaching and will make you learn. He does have a huge proposal project at the end of the semester that will affect your grade enough to pass or fail. This was one of my favorite classes to show up to because of his occasional funny stories and sarcastic humor. He does quizzes to help those who come to class
                
                   I really had a lot of trouble in this class. Got the lowest grade of the year in this class. Would suggest this class for those who struggle to pay attention, But not for those who are not very good at English.
                
                   This is a good professor.  He really expects for you to learn and work at a college level.  He will let you know when you make mistakes, but doesn't grade too harshly.  He expects for your arguments to be valid.  I rate this professor highly.
                
                   Favorite professor! Easy English class. He rocks!! His essays are not graded hard. Most essays don't have a length requirement, you just write till you think you get your point across. I highly recommend Mr. Klaehn :)
                
                   Really laid back teacher that explains assignments well. You write a few essays but she gives you very good feedback on your rough draft to fix any mistakes made.
                
                   really nice and helpful, sit in the front row she likes that and because shes pretty good looking for a mom
                
                   I liked this class, it was easy and rather intresting. I love the readings.
                
                   He was ****ed, didn't explain things well, rude, had a bad attitude, didnt care about students, dont take him
                
                   No Comments
                
                   An inspiration to anyone wishing to teach English, and a joy to learn from. It is a chore to find anything not to love about her. I take classes from her every chance I get, she is by far the best professor I have ever had.
                
                   She is truly a great teacher that is really good at engaging the class. It was always exciting going into her class.
                
                   Professor Smith is awesome! She really cares about her subject, and her students! SImply one of the best!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Mrs. Trela is my favorite professor this semester, but beware: this is not a blow off class! 
                
                   Mrs. Trela is awesome. She's very funny and helpful. You will always turn in a rough draft of a paper before the final so you have a really good opportunity to receive a high grade.
                
                   Mrs. Trela is the best english professor ever!  She loves each one of her students and goes out of her way to make sure they are successful.  One of the most caring and energetic professors I have had so far.  Take every class with her that you can!
                
                   I took her for English 1301 and I'm so happy I did! She's one of the funniest teachers I've had. She gives you comments on your rough drafts, and that helps a bunch! I would take her again for sure.
                
                   She takes attendance and loves people who participate in class. Before you turn in a final essay, she gives comments on the rough draft...very helpful! Class often ends early. One of my favorite teachers!
                
                   Mrs. Trela is a wonderful teacher.  She is very engaging and has a respect for the youth culture.  Her class is easy to participate in.  I enjoyed her class so much, I am taking it in 1302!
                
                   my favorite she sparked a great interest and new Love for the subject
                
                   She is a really great teacher and will help you when you need it.
                
                   GREAT class. She is so great-she helps you even when you really don't deserve it. An extra plus-she has quite a pleasant voice. Makes it easier to sit in class everyday.
                
                   very good class enjoyed it very much. good teacher she helps when you need it and sometimes even when you dont
                
                   A great teacher.  Liked the way she grades and taught so much I took her for 1302 as well
                
                   Always interesting to listen to
                
                   He's great and I learned a lot.  Hard work paid off. If you're like the person below who thinks that writing essays is &quot;pointless and stupid,&quot; then you won't like him.  It's a writing cvlass after all, and boneheads don't belong in this class.
                
                   At the first day of class I really liked professor Werden, but after getting to know him, he started to become really mean and strict. Every single day we would do essays and comment o n other people's essays which I thought was pointless and stupid. I went to class every single day, did all the idiodic work he assigned and still made a C in the cl
                
                   Dr. Werden gives you hints and tips all year as to what will appear on the final. IF you read, IF you do your homework and IF you attend chats... you'll do fine. Looking at the previous post though; I'd say if you are barely literate then no, this class will prove too difficult for you to handle.
                
                   He's class was aweful!!! We has to read, The Od. Illiad, ect. And the final was 15 random quotes from each story, and you had tell him who said it, who it was said to, what it meant, how important it was, and the theme of the chapter it came from. He's extremely hard and unfai.
                
                   I am currently taking her British Literature: Women of Literature class, and I would rather listen to 3 hours of polka music than sit in that class. She spends the majority of the class period either reading the book or paraphrasing said book. Upon asking a question, all she is looking for is a more intricate paraphrase.
                
                   Dr. B is great! You can tell he really loves teaching and is actually interested in the course matter. If you form a good relationship with him at the beginning of the semester and make an effort to speak up in class, you will do well in his class.
                
                   This class was a lot of fun!  He allowed students to edit each others papers before they were turned in (not to mention he allowed students to take home the tests = short essay).  Dr. B also made class interesting and fun.  He encouraged students to voice their opinions and the class passed quickly due to interesting debates.
                
                   I really enjoyed having Dr. B for a professor. The first day is a little intimidating, but he really makes the students feel comfortable. I HIGHLY recommend to go to him for papers. He was very helpful and I ended up getting an A on the term paper thanks to his help! You can tell he truly cares about every student, and is always willing to help.
                
                   Dr. B has real issues making his  wants known. He allows you to send in your papers early for a review (which I advise doing) but when he told me what to fix and I fixed it he still gave me a 75. I am in the honors program here so C's are not really my thing. I feel like he grades really harshly and is not someone I would recommend as a teacher. He
                
                   He assigned 4 papers as test grades, and there was a final exam. Each paper was a comparison of the books read in the class, and the final was over the books. If you read them, you should be okay; however, he is very particular about wording within your papers. Always try to be concise.
                
                   Don't take fantasy literature online. First of all, his lectures are so boring. Secondly don't even waste time reading the books because his test questions ask you about the most minute, unimportant details of his lectures. Also, don't ever email him because he will take participation points away if he feels like he's explained it well enough. 
                
                   He's the coolest.  Just don't miss class, ever.
                
                   He looks like Mr. Smithers
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Ashley is a great student teacher.  I learned much in her class and she is always helpful whenever needed.  Plus she's hot, so with that and her smarts she's a total package.  Recommended.
                
                   Dr. Brown has a lot of energy, but I hated the &quot;points&quot; system.  In a graduate level class, it seemed to foster a weird environment.
                
                   hilarious and fun
                
                   nice!
                
                   Dr. Brooks is probably one of the most dynamic speakers I have ever heard in my entire life.  His ability to help you see deeper into the works of Shakespeare and apply them to the world around you.  He is very accomodating for all of his students.  He will even come to study groups and bring pizza.  Take him, it will change your life- Really!
                
                   AWESOME!!! You can learn so much from Dr. Brooks... even after you graduate.
                
                   Best professor on the planet. Everyone should take a class from Dr. Brooks, your college career is incomplete without it.
                
                   One of the best professors I've had in my 7 years of undergrad and grad classes. He knows his subject, and he's interesting to listen to.
                
                   This professor is the best professor at the school.  He is available to students and his class is entertaining as well as educational.  He provides positive feedback and encouragement consistently.  Everyone should take a class with this professor.
                
                   Brooks is one of the most interesting and passionate people I've ever met.  I wish everyone could take one of his classes.
                
                   Best Teacher I've ever had. Hot bod too.
                
                   EASY CLASS, YOU DON'T HAVE TO COME TO CLASS AS MUCH. JUST DO THE MAJOR ASSIGNMENTS AND YOU WILL PASS, HE LOOKS AT MLA HARD.
                
                   Chabot is by far the best professor I have had at A&M! He really cares about his students and goes out of his way to help them. He is understanding towards deadlines and flexible. Attendance isn't mandatory but helpful. The material is sometimes boring, but he makes class fun. I highly suggest taking him. He is so helpful!
                
                   He's hilarious & very nice. We have class outside when he feels like it, when he doesn't feel like having class he cancels it or makes us breakfast! no textbook, just notes. he tells u exactly how to do well, it's easy nd fun. no1 ever skipped class bc we enjoyed it so much. and his &quot;deadlines aren't set in stone.&quot; very flexible and understanding.
                
                   THIS PROFS LAUGH IS HILARIOUS, PLEASE TAKE HIM, YOU WILL BE HAPPY
                
                   Dr. Clark is one of the best teachers at A&M! I though his lectures were amazing because he is so knowledgeable. His class only has 3 test which are fair if you listen in class. I would take him for all my classes if i could! Just need to take notes in the class and read, you will get an A! He grades very very fair! Amazing Professor!
                
                   Dr. Clark is SO knowledgeable! I absolutely loved his class because he is so interesting and entertaining. Class participation is SUPER important to him. He definitely grades you on it so don't be afraid to interject regularly. He's very open to responses so don't worry about sounding stupid. He's very chill, but be on time to class. 
                
                   I was very pleased with the overall quality and interest taking ths class with Dr. Clark. He is a very funny and helpful teacher. He really cares about the interest and hardwork a student puts forth in his class.I highly recommend him. Two thumbs up Awesome teacher!
                
                   Best teacher ever in English. His explanations about the readings are truly significant because he sees them as the reader would and as the author would. Amazing.
                
                   He's amazing. He loves what he's teaching and he really cares if you learn. His tests are what he lectures over and he's just a great man all around.
                
                   Dr. Clark is absolutely fantastic!  He knows his subject matter very well, and he makes students work hard.  Students will be introduced to many wonderful works of literature and will gain an understanding of some of the most interesting philosophical ideas that are central to the works being studied.
                
                   Great professor, good communicator, actually cares whether students learn.
                
                   totally awesome class...really helpful, will read papers early and if he likes then he pulls out the gradebook and writes it down right then...even if it's not perfect, really loves to teach
                
                   Dr. Clark is so great! He loves what he does. I love going to class just to hear him laugh and see what color suit he's wearing! Very highly recomended.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He gives take home quizzes, an essay, and a take home final and grades incredibly hard. He doesn't explain why you received the grade that you received. The way he grades seems like a complete wild card. Would not recommend him.
                
                   There were about 6 or 7 reading assignments that were assigned in his class. The books were all pretty interesting, so that wasn't bad. There are 4 take home quizzes, a 4 page paper, and a take home final. His work was not stressful or too hard. You do have to work pretty hard to get an A. He doesn't force anyone to be involved in the discussion.
                
                   He is a really nice guy but his class is so boring. He assigns readings out of several books (not textbooks) and in class you basically re-read the same material with him. It makes it VERY boring. He gives 4 take home quizzes and a take home final. They are all essay. Overall, pretty easy. Just do the readings and you will be fine.
                
                   Wonderful teacher! If you have the chance to take a class with her, do it!!! Always willing to help!!! 
                
                   Very helpful and caring. She will do whatever you need to get an A, all you need to do is ask for help. If you have issues understanding she will take the time to give you extra instruction. She obviously loves what she does.
                
                   Dr. Djordjevic is a great teacher. She is extremely helpful and I have learned more about writing and English in this one semester than I did my whole highschool career. Read the assigned chapters and revise your papers after you receive her comments and you'll do great.
                
                   Shell ramble and complain all year that no one can write. You cant understand or reason with her. Shes a feminist, liberal.  Shell never tell you your grade so you think you're doing terrible. And at the end of the year you wind up with an A.
                
                   This class was very helpful. Don't miss class or you will miss important info. There is a language barrier with Djordjevic b/c she's from Serbia. She's not always clear on the instructions and can have an attitude if the class isn't good at writing.
                
                   I took his Shakespeare class and enjoyed it. Make sure you go to class and take good notes. Studying is required to get an A.  The things he went over in class were always on the tests. You have 3 tests and 5 online posts. The tests require written answers in a blue book but don't let that scare you. I would recommend this class for sure!
                
                   His Shakespeare class was enjoyable and as long as you went to class, you had the information needed for the exams. He loves to interact with the class but don't raise your hand for a question if you aren't prepared to answer all of them! Would only suggest taking it if your like shakespeare as the class covers 7 plays. Overall would take it again.
                
                   Great class overall. Makes Shakespeare very clear and interesting. You have to go to class to know what he finds important about each play you read. Only three exams, short answer & essay but pretty general. 
                
                   Great guy, just pay attention in class, make sure you show up. Really emphasizes stuff that is usually on the exam. 
                
                   I took Shakespeare with him and learned so much. His tests were long), but if you know your stuff, not hard at all. If you get keywordsconcepts on the essay, he gives you full credit on them. I will definitely take a class from him again in the future.
                
                   He is extremely self-centered and condescending. He teaches out of a book that he wrote, so you may not have any opinion different from his. You cannot use the restroom in his class. He hushes you before you are finished responding to a question he asks, and he has a terrible attitude problem and has said some inappropriate things to my classmates.
                
                   Boring. Not very intellectually stimulating and the class is full of dull moments. The material isn't very difficult, but it enduring the class is. Your grade consists of 2 exams and the final. No quizzes/attendance. Tests are mostly essay. You need the book.
                
                   Loved him - you just have to pay attention and talk to him. Very personable and loves what he teaches. And how can you not dig the bowtie&#63; Loves NCAA basketball.
                
                   To take his class, you need a good standing in history. His exams are mostly essay type, but he covers everything in class...so all you need to do is pay attention.
                
                   Yes, he is enamored with himself. He will call on you if you make eye contact with him, so be prepared or keep your head down. His in-class questions are rather vague and he's very condescending to anyone who answers incorrectly. He's a little flirty with the girls. Guys, talk about basketball. He loves it.
                
                   I didn't find the subject matter very interesting, but I did like Dr. Dickson.  He taught me how to write a thesis sentence, something very important for an Englsih major.
                
                   Dickson was condescending and full of himself. He loved to throw out the word pneumetology for some reason (in a 17th Century British Poets class). He is fun to make fun off, but terrible to take.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Pretty straight forward class. Read and talk about what was read. Midterm and final. One big project. Many quizzes over the readings. Sometimes she gives notice, sometimes she doesn't. Must have read reading to do well on quiz (no sparknotes). 
                
                   I would not recommend her at all. It is very confusing on what she is asking for when it comes to projects. Doesn't use any visual aids and doesn't seem organized. She's a nice lady and is approachable, but her grading is horrible. Basically if she doesn't like it then you won't get a good grade. C is possible if you try hard. I got a 69 no curve.
                
                   She's weird but not a bad teacher.
                
                   Ms. Elston is a good teacher who really cares that her students are learning. Some people in the class didn't like the projects and the required journals. Some said they wished this was more like a "regular" English class. I had enough of those in high school. I like how her class is different and there's a lot of peer teaching & interaction.
                
                   Professor Ezell is wonderful! Take her if you get the chance. Her exams are very easy but you must show up to lecture. Once you have gotten familiar with her grading criteria, you will certainly do well. 
                
                   This professor is very helpful, she makes the class fun by making jokes and interacts with the students often - very big on asking the class questions. She explains the material thoroughly, but I strongly recommend that you still read most of the material. She gives a lot of extra credit opportunities - easy B, I'd say.
                
                   She's seriously the best professor I've had at A&M. She is a very tough grader, and she really makes you work for your grade. However, I learned so much in her class. I wish I could take it again!
                
                   Class is mandatory and lectures consist of some slides, but most of it comes from discussion of the reading. She is very knowledgeable in her field and very passionate. Grades consisted of 2 essays, bi-weekly  papers (short), and 2 tests. I will warn you, this class is very challenging. The tests are hard and she grades the essays very hard.
                
                   Prof. Gibson was on my graduate committee.  He is the most unaffected man you will ever meet.  What you see is what you get.  He is extremely helpful provided you play it straight with him.  He knows his field thoroughly and has a great sense of humour.  Highly recommend.
                
                   Dr. Gibson was my undergrad advisor and one of the best professors at A&M.  He really CARED about my class choices, my education, my future career.  He really stood out for me and I'm just sorry I never got to take one of his classes.  He was always available for students.  Wonderful man.
                
                   Dr. Gibso was my English undergraduate advisor and was on my committee in grad school.  I have fond memeories of him, and I am grateful to have worked with him to get the best education I could.
                
                   He's EXTREMELY thorough on his tests. You definantly take something away from his class. I loved the class. He is the absolute BEST.
                
                   he is great
                
                   GREAT PROF!!! Take her she is good, just be sure to respond to her..lol she is funny and nice!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   dumb.  and she tries to be funny.
                
                   This class may not be easy for everyone, but Professor Harris is really willing to help. As long as you utilize his feedback and go to him with any questions, you should be fine. There were three 6-8 page papers and one 10-14 page paper, along with pop quizzes and peer review participation grades. Read all assigned materials and you'll be fine.
                
                   He's a good prof. As long as you go to class and do the readings, you'll be fine. He's really helpful in office hours too. He gives great feedback and gives suggestions on what to add to your papers.
                
                   Easy class - comp & rhetoric. Had assigned readings, read the first week, never opened books again. Easy grader. 4 tests a semester, "final" is the research paper at the end. Even let us re-edit a previous paper for a better grade. Only disadvantage is that he's quiet and mumbles. Attendance is counted in participation grade. Definitely take him.
                
                   One of my favorite classes so far at A&M! Dr. Harner is hilarious & I loved hearing him take on the 4 Shakespeare plays we read in class- lectures was really enjoyable. I know some people complained about the tests, but if you take good notes you should be fine (this is college after all- you're gonna have to take good notes no matter what). 
                
                   He's pretty funny and a very nice guy, but he's a pretty hard grader. His test questions seem very subjective, so you'd better know his opinion. Lectures are enjoyable, and he clearly tells you what's going on in the play, but his tests and essays are (I think) unfairly graded.
                
                   He grades the paper like he expects graduate-level analysis from a sophomore-level shakespeare intro class. He's rude and uses foul language freely and does not want anyone's opinion but his own. His lectures are boring and irritatingly vague and slow. Some enjoyed it, but I couldn't stand the class or the professor. 
                
                   Lectures are often imprecise and irrelevant. Sometimes I felt like sitting in the lecture was a waste of time because hardly anything he says makes real sense and if it does it isn't helpful in understanding the material. He required a large, expensive textbook and it was completely unnecessary as we only read 4 plays you can get on Amazon for 2. 
                
                   Nothing he talked about in class had to do with the papers we wrote. This was his first year in a while teaching ENGL 203 and he told a girl he hated teaching it. He seriously hated me for no reason. I used a motif from sparknotes in an essay and he told me it wasn't a motif. While he may be a great professor for Shakespeare, he isnt for ENGL 203
                
                   Dr. Harner is very knowledgeable about Shakespeare and has the unique skill to make even someone like me, who could never make it through one of the plays in high school, actually enjoy it. Not an easy class but an A is possible if you work hard. I felt that the essay grading was unfair but I think that was the TA, not him.
                
                   Such a fun class! There are only two tests and a paper, but there is a lot of opportunity for him to help you. Shakespeare can be hard to understand, but Harner explains everything as you go. No problems.
                
                   Very entertaining. One of my favorite classes. Professor Harner definitely knows his Shakespeare and tries to relate the plays to our everyday lives. Every class is memorable and I highly recommend it. You wont regret it.
                
                   May be one of the best classes I've ever had. Lectures are very fun and he always makes the material interesting. Just take good notes and have a decent grasp of the plays and you'll do fine.
                
                   Very good professor! I would recommend him to anyone interested in taking an english course. Even if you've never studied Shakespeare, he makes it very interesting and provided a very broad perspective on each of the plays. The exams are multiple choice with 40 &#63;s. Tons of extra credit. The paper is easy if you start earlier than the night before.
                
                   If you take Dr. Harner for ENGL 212 (Shakespeare) you won't regret it. There are only two tests, and one paper. Jut by hearing him you can tell that he really knows what he's talking about. He has dry humor so it makes the class more interesting.
                
                   A witty and interesting teacher. I highly recommend him for anyone interested in taking Shakespeare.
                
                   Lecturer Larry Heinemann will absolutely push you out of your comfort zone. He is, to say the least, an interesting character who truly wants to help you develop as a writer. You have to go to class because he only has them in 3 hr blocks once a week and each class is super dense with what you learn. Overall, one of the best lecturers to take!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Awesome prof, very knowledgeable and hysterical. Would DEFINITELY take another class from him, STRONGLY recommend.
                
                   This guy is hillarious! best shakespeare professor EVER! he is so funny and makes class awesome. You have to write like 5 papers but they are all only 2 pages long!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great class, really interesting. If you came to class, took notes, did the assigned readings (which were fairly short), and did the homework problems, you could easily make an A. She drops the lowest test grade and has plenty of extra credit opportunities. Plus, she makes linguistics fun and easy. I would definitely recommend this course! :)
                
                   She was a total pushover. Spent most of the class time teaching us how to place commas in simple sentences. But then expects us to write 5-8 page papers. Never taught anything useful and often kept the class past release time. Incredibly boring too.
                
                   Dr. Kinkead is amazing. She is brilliant and hysterically funny. Lectures are always interesting and essay topics are usually open-ended. However, there is a lot of reading and the content is pretty heavy stuff. She's always willing to help, though, so if you don't understand the material make use of her office hours!
                
                   I love Dr. Kinkead. In fact, she is one of my favorite people on this Earth; she is kind, funny, caring, generous, willing to work with you onwith anything. With that being said, her teachings were a little bit left field from the traditional Rhetoric of Style class, but I liked it that way. However, be prepared for tough reads, but fun lectures!
                
                   Great professor. The class is intriguing, and the discussion well-rounded. He has a sense of humor and an &quot;appeal&quot; that works well with his students.
                
                   J. Killingsworth is amazing -- very friendly, very easy to listen to, and incredibly helpful one-on-one. Definitely my favorite professor.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Loved the class.  Great professor.  Talented Musician.  Go see his band.
                
                   Class was very early in the morning, but his sense of humor keeps you entertained! He cancels class from time to time and is very chill on asking questions about the coursework. He is a great professor that cares about his students, and makes a boring subject something you don't mind! I would take a class again with him for sure. 
                
                   Fair grader!
                
                   She is very easy. She has a very thick accent that can be hard to understand, but it's super cute. There is no way you could fail this class unless you just never attend the class.
                
                   There is a LOT of reading for this course but he is a pretty easy grader. The tests are hard and consist of short answer and one essay question. You must take notes in class because the definitions and history of the authors WILL be on the test and will be on it a lot. He is a very funny and nice guy who my whole class just loved! Take Him!
                
                   (Survey of English Lit.) He's funny enough and the tests are easy, but his classes are mere summaries of the previous night's reading. Not that I'm ungrateful for the easy A - I just want to be a little bit more engaged. That's not to say that I want to be burdened with a ton of assignments! Maybe the classes could just focus on more complex stuff?
                
                   He is so nice - and smart!  I'm not even a TAMU student - just a staff member who asked his permission to audit a grad-school-level British Lit. class he was teaching, and he said that would be fine.  Can't say for sure how hard he is, since I wasn't taking the class for credit, but it looked like the assignments were challenging.  Do the reading!
                
                   Took online, quizzes and discussion boards every week but super easy. Most of the time she'll cancel the discussion board for various reasons. 2 exams, both very straightforward and either right in the text or in her notes. Very sweet!
                
                   She is very nice and is very helpful both in class and in office hours, but she is a tough grader. I have always been told that I am a great writer, but on my first assignment I got a 83 and was shocked. After that I attended her office hours a lot more and really tried to embrace the writing style she prefers and got two more As and one B.
                
                   She does teach you a lot but her grading is pretty difficult. Plus attendance is mandatory even though a few people were out every class period. Her participation grade means a lot and if you aren't really into english then you probably will get a bad grade on it.
                
                   She was pretty cool, but I could never make higher than a 75 on any of the papers. She's definitely a tough grader. 
                
                   Her Class is very simple, about 5 random quizzes and 3 papers. All you have to do is go to class, discuss what you read and then write a paper. If you put effort into the class you can definitely get a B or an A. She's weird and takes pride in it which is fine but overall its a simple class and I would recommend it.
                
                   If you're taking this class for an easy grade, DON'T! She is an incredibly tough grader. She believes that most writing is considered a C. You have to be INCREDIBLY gifted at writing to get anything above that. She is a nice person but don't really expect anything more. She is also confusing about her guidelines and rules.
                
                   Super nice and funny! doesn't seem like he is your teacher. I would recommend him to anyone!
                
                   Dr. Oliver was amazing!!! I learned SO much in this class! A lot of readings, but if you read most of the readings off BookRags or SparkNotes you'll be fine (know whats going on and pay attention in class if you're going to do this tho). Theres a couple of papers. He's a decent grader. Two exams: midterm & final. Study in groups for these!
                
                   I had to take him for the new English 303 class. He was incredibly rude and counted off tremendously on my papers. I got a  1925 points because of four "missed" commas. Honestly, he picks favorites and if you are not a favorite student of his you wont pass. Also,read the last chapter of the reading assignment that is where the test questions are.
                
                   (Am Lit. Civil War - Present) Very interesting class and wonderful prof. He's really interested in knowing what the students want to read. So speak up and take advantage of it! Reading every night, only essays for assignments (one reading quiz), one extra credit assignment. Very bright guy. Not the easiest grader, but oh well!
                
                   Dr. Oliver is a great professor. He is very kind, understanding and is extremely helpful if you are having trouble understanding anything. His exams are over the short stories/short novels that you read and discuss in class and they are all short answer over 10 terms which he will give you before the exam as a study guide. Great prof!
                
                   I had him for a couple of classes.  It was an honors course and I did well in it, but couldn't convince him to give me a recommendation to grad school.  I am still not clear on his reasons why.  He is a good professor, but not a good people person.
                
                   Hard to understand a lot of the time, gives mostly C grades for papers (an occasional B or A if you're lucky).
                
                   3 papers all semester, not long at all just over topics we discuss in class. The readings he assigns, we discuss in class so you can get away with not reading. You do have to get all 3 book materials though for assigned for papers. No tests other than midterm and final, which were simple. Interesting class and fairly easy. Would recommend him! 
                
                   Dr. Perry is super sweet, energetic, and passionate. Her Bible as Literature class requires A LOT of reading and studying, but SO WORTH IT because her lectures and the material were so interesting. Weekly homework, short answer/essay tests, cumulative final exam. Reading for every class. Lots of class discussion. HER LECTURES BLEW MY MIND.
                
                   she's super nice, and I like this class a lot!
                
                   looks nice, mean heart, below average scores, not considering the student, another teacher is more nice than her
                
                   I think this class is better than the mainstream english class and although the content is hard to love I'm kind of glad I took it
                
                   So I'm an English major, so i figured i would LOVE this class. All he does is ramble on and on about stupid stuff that I'm not real sure what he's talking about(I do know it has NO relevance to what we are doing!) and he teaches from his seat, and he never answers anyones questions. I would NEVER recomend this prof. and he teaches at USI now btw.
                
                   Goes off on tangets the entire class. He talks about the same thing over and over again, it's so hard to sit through the class, but he takes attendance every day. Make sure you cite your sources (in text also) on all your papers and it's hard to get below a B in there.
                
                   She's a good professor, but very hard grader. You have to actually try to get an good grade in the class.
                
                   Dr.Stabile's class was challenging for me at first because I was a freshmen in a 300 level class. She is a great and helpful prof. Class was challenging but very rewarding. She makes her students think for themselves unlike teachers in high school. Highly recommend her.
                
                   She was so difficult.  And she seems to be used to teaching graduate students so she used so many big words I didn't understand.  BUt she is a really smart woman.
                
                   Good god she's hot!
                
                   She does care about students, but be prepared not to write your beliefs only hers or you will get a low class grade.  She never gives you a specific grade until the end.....
                
                   Pretty cool.  Kinda funny and the class isn't very hard if you do what she tells you.
                
                   Ms. Spear is incredible! She is there for her students and wants you to succeed. Just 3 essays that you choose the topic of & an annotated bibliography. No quizzes or tests. She doesn't offer extra credit but work hard on your papers and come to class for participation and you won't need extra credit.
                
                   She takes attendance every day and gives quizzes unannounced. If you go to class and take note of the passages explains, the tests should be fairly easy. She appreciates those who share in class. The reading and writing is a pretty heavy load in this class, so don't fall behind. She is nice and young, and realistic about scheduling.
                
                   Boring. I love writing. Especially creative writing. Guy made it so boring.
                
                   Easy teacher. The only thing that sucked was that attendance was madatory and you got points taken off if you didn't have a university sanctioned absense. Otherwise, he was a good teacher.
                
                   Great guy, very interesting readings - some I still think about years later. I took him in fall of 1998.
                
                   Total hippie, great guy although it creeped me out when he asked the class if anyone wanted to go to a poetry reading in Austin. That wasn't as creepy as him wanting to drive all of us in his VAN!
                
                   He is very knowledgeable on the material he teaches. If you have more than 3 unexcused absences, it starts affecting your grade. There are 3 tests (including the final) which are fairly easy if you read the books and take good notes. I would definitely take him again.
                
                   He makes the class pretty interesting and is very knowledgable on all the books.  Tests are easy if you take good notes. 
                
                   Vasilakis is a breath of fresh air to any english class. His lectures about science fiction were engaging enough to keep my interest and he is happy to answer questions and entertain viewpoints.
                
                   Vasilakis is a super cool professor. He honestly really cares about what he is teaching and whether or not his students are learning. If you don't have time to read the book, don't worry: he thoroughly explains everything in class. Additionally, he only tests you on what he says in class, so there are no trick questions! Would definitely take again
                
                   Professor Vasilakis was amazing; definitely take him if you have the chance! He is very insightful and will help you however he can. This class only had two papers and he was willing to read your rough draft and make suggestions before you turned it in, which was super helpful.
                
                   VERY boring - she takes attendance so you can't get away with skipping.  Easy class and books though.  I made an easy A
                
                   I remember Dr. VanRiper spending an entire class session talking about Barbie.  Still, I looked forward to the class because we watched fun movies and read easy books.
                
                   She should have retired years ago.  Constantly interprets lit in ways that make you think you must have read the wrong book.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Really laid back he wont stress if you don't stress. and speak up in his class it makes him sad if you don't
                
                   First couple weeks i didnt like him but give him a chance and you'll probably really enjoy his class. He made it fun and easy, i definitely recommend him.
                
                   Fantastic! Very interesting.
                
                   He cares...
                
                   Awesome Prof... Fun discussions and enjoyable papers to write.  It isn't the easiest class in the world but i was able to get an A in the shortened summer session. (hint untilize freewrites and office hours)
                
                   Idk how she is every semester but, she has shown up late every class and has not had a set lecture. I haven't learned an ounce of anything. I feel like this class has been a joke. We had a midterm and wrote textual analysis papers and haven't received this grades back. Maybe she is just busy this semester. She is so kind but she's not focused.
                
                   Extremely Helpful
                
                   Tough grader on papers. Plenty of other grades given inside class so it helps to be in class everyday.
                
                   Dr. Alexander, by far the best professor I've ever had. He appreciates students who put in the work to be successful in his class. Dr. Alexander wants to see you exceed personally. He is very good at teaching and making things more clear. There is plenty of opportunity in his class to not only learn but to make a great grade. Definitely recommend.
                
                   He is very easy to understand and will work with you to improve your grade. Doesn't except late work! Overall an amazing class to take.
                
                   Mr. Alexander is the best teacher I have had since coming to Commerce, he always gives you opportunities to improve and seems to be very concerned about the well being of his students. He goes out of his way to make the class easier and to help out students as much as he can. I would recommend him to anyone taking this course.
                
                   His class was really easy to follow. As long as you turn in your work on time you will pass and he will work with you to help you understand better. Student conferences are a great time to understand more about the material or any questions you may have.
                
                   I had a great experience in her class. Every lecture she gave was very helpful and exciting. She also gave a lot of good examples. Like the way she explain something.. I would love to take her class on the next level..Great teacher!
                
                   You have got to be kidding me!!! Is all I will say.
                
                   Don't be a bunch of babies. If you failed, it's because you're lazy or dumb. Read a book.
                
                   Excellent professor. I learned a lot in his course and I'd recommend him to others easily. He really knows his stuff. His instructions were always clear and his grading was fair. He's a stickler for following directions and submitting assignments on time, which I appreciate. If he deducts points, he always explains why. Superb textbooks, too.
                
                   This Prof is no nonsense! Don't expect extra credit or do-overs cause there are non. Just do the work and read the chapters. You'd do well to know that from the start. I took this class online and I also do bad with online classes as is. I missed one discussion and lost a letter grade.
                
                   I have this teacher for 2 classes this semester. Both are online classes. I am mostly an A student. I have only gotten 1 or 2 B's in my life. I may get C's.... enough said&#63; He is a no exceptions kind of person. If you want him to listen, get real. He doesn't think anything you have to say is important. I can't get 2 C's.... I'll have to retake one 
                
                   He requires a lot of reading.  He occasionally gives quizes.  He had three exams during the semester along with a final paper.  Not an easy class, but if you are willing to put very little time in you can pass easily.  He is mono-tone and boring so try to stay awake.
                
                   Dr. Baumgardner had the potential to be nice.  The final was open-book, because we all hated one of the 3 books he assigned for the class.  Only his opinions are correct, and he really likes to argue.  He does not create an environment where open discussion is welcome (unless you are restating his opinion). He was really mono-toned and boring also.
                
                   He is very smart helpful and knows what he is talking about. If you participate having some idea of what you are talking about he'll like you. if you are a talker he likes everybody involved so dont do it all the time. Its a farely easy class if you put some effort into it.
                
                   Come to class, do the work, and you will probably make an A--or a B at the very least.  He is a bit boring, but pretty nice.
                
                   very boring and very astute professor but the class was actually interesting.
                
                   Dr. B is fun and has a great sense of humor. I really enjoyed the discussions we had in class and connected with him as a person.
                
                   There are people on her who perceive a good teacher to be one who doesn't assign work and lets them get away with everything. Grow up! I took him for ENG 457, worked my butt off, and got an A. He does help you if you ask for help.
                
                   Monotone... it's a dreadfully boring class. He's very easy if you read the book and not listen to what he's saying in class... if you could even stay awake for that. However, once her has his mind set that you are some particular way, there's not changing it. Not really all that helpful.
                
                   Dr. Baumgardner is a strict old fashioned professor. He expects you come to class and shut up. If you're a talker then don't take his class or limit yourself to only answering one question per day.
                
                   he was a decent professor....he really makes you think!! i made a good grade but i busted my ass!! just go to class and get involved with the discussion.
                
                   Dr. Baumgardner is a great teacher. The textbooks used in this course are a little difficult to understand. However, if you ask him, he will help. It is not an easy class, but you'll be fine as long as you complete each assignment.
                
                   The class is easy, but I feel that it is a waste of my time because we get into arguments in class that go nowhere.
                
                   nice and very helpful
                
                   He is pretty hard to follow. i would never miss a class though. if you do , then you will be more confused than before. he is very intelligent so he can seem a bit intimidating.
                
                   I think the class is pretty easy, and I haven't read a page of the text.
                
                   I think Baumgardner is cool.  Yes, you have to read the text (like, duh!), and he does go off on tangents, but it is all relative to the topic.  I had him for linguistics, and he made the subject fun and easy.
                
                   He makes fun of students and then makes them feel like they know nothing.  I just don't get why he wants to make things not understandable.  He needs to get a life and help students.
                
                   Dr. Boggs was a great instructor. If you do the work and come to class you will do fine.
                
                   Professor Boggs is a good instructor. You will learn a lot in her class.
                
                   
                
                   Student are given the chance to learn from one another, she acts more in the role of a facilitator.
                
                   This professor it completely unfair! She grades on how much she likes you as opposed on the quality of your work. Watch out!
                
                   Dr. Bolin is a wonderful teacher! His lectures are amazing, interesting, and real though provokers. I really loved the content and the way he delivered it. His exams were reasonably challenging, but if you payed attention and put thought into the class, they were no problem.
                
                   Dr. Bolin has high expectations for his students, and those are spelled out clearly in the syllabus.  He is very encouraging of students' efforts and gives them opportunities to revise and improve their work.
                
                   Dr. Bolin has high but fair standards and communicates those standards to his class.  If you come to class every time, participate in discussions, do your best on each assignment, and do any bonus assignments, you will probably make an &quot;A.&quot;  People who don't do well for him usually dont follow the above instructions.
                
                   A great teacher!
                
                   Dr. Bolin was great!  I've used a lot of his ideas for my AP class that I'm teaching now.
                
                   from what i remember Dr. Bolin is real cool.
                
                   this class was a bit harder than his eng 333 but i still enjoyed it!! he's a great teacher and everything....you ust have to know what he wants!!
                
                   I felt like he didn't explain himself clearly about assignments and then graded harshly. I flet like I could never win with him. No matter how hard I tried on an assignment, I rarely made higher than a B.
                
                   I really learned alot from him in this creative writing class.  Very easy to talk to and helpful.
                
                   hated it
                
                   felt we got a little off track and answers to questions were hard to come by
                
                   Dr. Bolin is so helpful! His online classes are very reasonable, as well. Great guy.
                
                   he is so awesome! if you go to class and pay attention, then you will be fine. Be sure to give plenty of examples when you are explaining something.
                
                   Dr. Bolin is accessible and helpful.  He doesn't always state what he is looking for until after he has graded it.
                
                   Excellent professor, always willing to help. Just simply complete all assignment ontime and follow his instructions and you will do well.
                
                   Only &quot;C&quot; I ever made.  Screwed my GPA and was all my fault.  Do as you are asked, when you are asked and you won't be punished.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Bolin has definate expectaions of his students, but that bar isn't too hard to meet because he is very accesable and willing to offer help if you need it. He's also very personable and is willing accomodate students with just about anything
                
                   He is a difficult teacher, but very good & I would still recommend him.  He does not accept late essays.
                
                   Shes ok but she will get caught up and she dosent really explain things out clear
                
                   Great teacher, she is very nice and understanding, takes a bit of work but the pay off is worth it
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very hard to please but final evaluation is easy!
                
                   Dr. Chalaire is about the worst teachers I have ever had.  She treats our class as if we were still in high school.  She can't read a paragraph with out stopping after ever sentence and babbles about nothing.  I feel like I have learned absolutely nothing in her class. She's not even a reading teacher she normally teaches ENG.1301.
                
                   
                
                   Very good teacher. You need to do your reading in order to do well on numerous pop quizzes. If you can creatively write with good grammar, you can do well. She made class conversation fun.
                
                   I started out the semester hating this class because she always started 10 minutes early. She does not go into great detail about anything really and will just send you to the writing lab if you need help. She does offer re-writes on essays. Lots of movies/ videos shown in class. We watched Hunger Games. She also tends to cancel class once a week.
                
                   I cannot understand her. A LOT OF HOMEWORKS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! homeworks made me crazy.
                
                   The class is very hard.
                
                   Great professor!!
                
                   She could be a bit more clear in class... she also tends to dominate class with her personal research.
                
                   He's funny and easy to reason with. He's also easy to make fun of and doesnt care when you do it.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He was helpful and strict but got upset when students didn't bring their books. Do your assignments and discuss in class and you'll do well. Plus he's a nice guy outside of class.
                
                   Mrs. Flanagan is a great English teacher- she grades hard, but if you do well then you know you REALLY did well!
                
                   Great Instructor
                
                   Not very fair. I found him to be unhelpful.
                
                   Quiet guy, philosophy was a different subject for me, so don't know how to compare him to other teachers.  Could have done a better job and had a little more personality.  Generally friendly and old
                
                   I am not sure if Dr. Grimshaw is still teaching.  He was a very strict professor who tended to focus on the little things instead of the big picture. (He wouldn't let guys wear hats in the class etc.) He also played favorites and was inconsistent with his grading.
                
                   She didn't know what she was talking about half of the time.  Absolutely waist of time AND money!
                
                   Was very helpful.You can revise until the end of the semester. She makes sure you understand what is going on in the readings as well as the assignments.
                
                   even though english is about reading and writing...I still thought it was a lot of work.  The teacher was nice and tried to make the class interesting
                
                   The material in this class is interesting.  The teacher is very helpful and understanding, but she doesn't cut anyone any slack.  She's fun and definitly hot.
                
                   This class is the WORST class ever.I dont like the teacher or the class it makes me want to barf. i would NOT recommend this class to anybody it really makes you feel stupid
                
                   Not a fun class at all. Too much politics and the book we used was written by a teacher in the department. I say burn the book and ban the teacher.
                
                   This class was very uniteresting, it is all political, not at all about literature or english. I would not reccomend it.
                
                   On my final research paper, she gave me a low grade with hardly any feedback.  All she said was she didn't agree with my argument, even though I had more than the required scholarly resources to back me up.  I will avoid taking her again if it can be avoided.  
                
                   Dr. Jacobs is the funnest instructor that I have ever had. She knows her stuff, and that is always helpful. She is awesome, in one word AWESOME.
                
                   I have had Dr. Jacobs for 4 classes and I adore her. She is very high spirited and enthusiastic. She is the smartest person I know. You must read the assignments thoroughly in her lit classes but if you do you will have no problems on he tests. I took her for ENG 315 and she taught me to love poetry!
                
                   excellent hyper fun teacher! loved her! journals were easy, not many assignments other than reading and journals. she sometimes even acted out the scene! phd from HARVARD so VERY SMART! liked her alot TAKE THIS CLASS! quick email responces and will take a whole class period to answer questions if you ask! love love love her!
                
                   Dr. Jacobs was an amazing professor. My friend and I were in her honors class and it was so much more fun than we expected. We were with her when we found out her son died, but she pulled through and taught like nothing had happened. Very knowledgeable, but be ready to read and write papers! Loved her!
                
                   Dr. Jacobs is extremely knowledgeable in her field. She brings exuberance and a thrill for the subject matter to the class. She is demanding, however, and those who are looking for an easy A might want to look elsewhere.
                
                   She is awesome!  She made what I thought were going to be dry, boring books into fun reads.  Very easy to work with.  Quick to respond to questions via email.
                
                   don't understand the Shakespeare plays.  She doesn't explain things and we could use some help. why not try to communicate more with her class and find out how much she's not helping us&#63;
                
                   What a disappointment! Much of the class is meandering, and there are talks about other people that sound gossipy.  I would like for us to discuss Shakespeare.
                
                   Dr. Jacobs is by far the most overqualified professor at TAMUC.  She should be the department head if she wants the job.  She has a Masters and Doctorial degree in English from HARVARD.  If that is not impressive enough, she is one of the best English proffs I have ever had.  She cares about the students and makes class interesting.
                
                   Dr. Jacobs is one of the best professors I've ever had!! She's very passionate about her subjects which makes the classes wonderful.
                
                   The readings are interesting, but I don't like the way she talks about other people, including fellow teachers during class.  Could be a fun class, but the gossiping is very unprofessional.
                
                   i love her harry potter class! im not an english major, so i just took it out of interest. she was willing to stay after and help me with any questions i had to make me feel more assured about assignments. awesome prof! she's &quot;bloody brilliant!&quot;
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Jacobs has to be the most intelligent person I've ever known!  I always wondered how she ended up in Commerce, Tx.  She always kept class interesting and really &quot;taught&quot; the readings!  When I wanted to give up on the whole---job, husband, kid, AND COLLEGE thing, she inspired me to keep going.  BTW, as soon as I walked, I gave up the husband.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Jacobs is a great teacher. She's a little wierd at times, but that's what makes her who she is!
                
                   I began the class not liking Shakespeare, but Dr. Jacobs make a Shakespeare lover out of me. She is enthusiastic and encourages student participation and text analysis. I also had her for ENG 472, and she was great in that class as well.
                
                   What can I say that hasn't been said, great, wonderful, animated, exciting proff!
                
                   This is on Harvard grad who is anything but stuffy. She is absolutely fantastic. She's demanding, but she's willing to bend two fold to make sure that you pass her class. She truly cares about each of her students, and she knows her material. If you ask her and she doesn't know it, she'll fing it.
                
                   I've always hated taking English classes, and I absolutely DREADED taking this class. I'm so glad that I did! I actually LOVE this class and the professor is awesome and very encouraging. I'd take her again if she teaches another lit class!!
                
                   I absolutely loved her and if she starts teaching any other literature courses I would def take her again
                
                   She was really engaging and creative about explaining what she wanted in the class.
                
                   Last semester this was my favorite class, and I ended up reorganizing my whole spring schedule to get in Mr. Peterman's class again this semester. He is an excellent teacher, his class is fun, and I highly recommend it to everyone. Hands down my favorite teacher.
                
                   I had Professor Reynolds for three different English classes, and he's an incredible teacher.  I learned so much.  He cares about his students, about his subject, and about Jimmy Buffet.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Reynolds is a great teacher. He's considered a professional humorist and uses humor to teach classes. Students who are easily offended are most commonly turned off by his everyday street humor. Great teacher!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   One of the best Lit classes I have attended.  Makes learning easy because he expects you to do your reading.  After that, follow Reynold's rules to a good grade and a better understanding of lit and the world. Lots of love and passion- interesting!!
                
                   He is a sex maniac!  You ask him a question and you will get an answer that relates to sex!
                
                   Teaches literature as good if not better than my high school AP teacher (now That guy was awesome).  Real solid in his knowledge, pace isn't too quick, well organized, and easily understood.  And humor goes a LOng way.  Loved it.
                
                   Dr Reid gives our numerous handouts which spell out her expectations clearly; you must read them in their entirety, however.  She is always available with feedback via email and often responds within minutes rather than the next day. Her creative writing course is a workshop style, meaning you turn in your rough work and are graded on improvements.
                
                   Absolutely the worst professor I have ever encountered.  She has a myopic view of her work, provides 0 useless feedback, and once crossed will grade that student poorly on all assignments.  The grading rubric does not match how she grades, so there is no way to know what she is expecting, and the catalog description does not match any of the conten
                
                   I can see why they keep her from teaching entry level classes. The department would never get new majors. Her comments on work are unhelpful at best (and usually misspelled) to almost abusive at worst. Her need to prove her self better than her students is irritating  and detracts from anything she could have said to help with assignments. 
                
                   Assignments are unclear and peer feedback is required but not quite helpful. Doesn't look at anything past the front of an assignment and grades arbitrarily, full credit for this half credit for that, maybe Dr. Reid knows what grade I will be receiving from the start of the semester and is just grading towards that.
                
                   I HATED this class. She was one of the worst professors I've ever had. She isn't clear about what she wants and there is way too many assignments due each week. For the class I took there was 6 assignments(al of them were lengthy and time consuming) due EVERY week. I regret taking this class!
                
                   Eng 200 is an experimental class, and in my opinion it is a failure. The instructor is unclear on instructions. She also changes her mind on what she wants ALL the time. She waited until 2 weeks left in the semester to give us feedback and grades on the things we worked on all semester. DO NOT TAKE THIS CLASS OR PROFESSOR!
                
                   She is awful, and lucky me I was in a class that was new (FB/face to face). I was not aware of this when I signed up! During her class she is very unclear and not connected. When doing the work you think you need to do its "wrong". Avoid at all costs, I could go on and on about why not to take her!!!!!
                
                   Absolutely loved her creative writing class. I look forward to taking her again!
                
                   Really enjoyed the creative writing class she taught last year spring semester. She seemed really understanding and helpful. Absolutely loved her class and will be taking her again!
                
                   This is THE worst teacher I've had so far in my collegiate career. Her assignments are vague and when returned her comments were unhelpful. I made many phone calls to try and get what she wanted out of the class and redid ALL of my assignments (she FINALLY graded near the end of the semester) and STILL got a C!AVOID AT ALL COSTS!
                
                   Dr. Reid seems like she could be a good professor.  She doesn't really connect with her students.  You might write a paper for her and follow the guidelines and instructions to the t but when you get it back she says it's all wrong.  And that's putting it lightly.  I think if she actually sat down and truly thought about what she wants her students
                
                   THis professor is very disconnected with the real world. Has her own definition of key word and applies it to everything, and it is not relavent to what we are doing. Does not care to explain what she is really talking about.
                
                   THis professor is very disconnected with the real world. Has her own definition of key word and applies it to everything, and it is not relavent to what we are doing. Does not care to explain what she is really talking about.
                
                   what a **** this person is.  how can she still have her teaching job&#63;&#63;
                
                   Not sure where some get their &quot;positive experiences&quot; from.  My experience was horrid.  I'm not sure about the gender bias (I'm a woman) but I think Dr. Reid is toxic regardless of gender.  She is scattered and unrealistic, and apparently is new to online teaching.  Be warned: only take as last resort!
                
                   This creative writing class is fantastic! Great peer feedback.  I have had her for several classes. She does NOT hate men like one user stated. She is always willing to explain things if you ask. She gives great feedback on your work. She is a Dr.- it is inproper to refer to her as Ms. or Miss. Highly recommend taking any of her classes.
                
                   So unhelpful.  This professor is apparently bitter with certain kinds of students.  Biased toward certain people.  I'm female and could sense her hatred of men.  There's apparently a disconnect between her world and ours.  Stay away!
                
                   Dr. Reid was always helpful with feedback and understanding when things in your life go wrong.   She is always willing to work with you and if necessary discuss problems concerning the course material if you make an appointment or just stop by her office during office hours.  She is a great teacher.
                
                   I just didnt like the way she explained things and if you had questions she would not help very much. It's almost as if she can't get down to our level when explaining things which makes the class that much harder.
                
                   Her class is boring, she wont help you if you have any questions. And if you try to call her Miss, Ms. or, Mrs. She will not even reply to you the rest if the semester, so take my advise and stay away, as far away as possible!!
                
                   She is fair and encourages discussion in class.  She inspired me to focus on American Lit.  Very fair teacher, but you will be required to work hard.
                
                   Prof. Roggenkamp is professional and fair.  I feel like she genuinely cares about about my success.
                
                   I am not a lover of American Lit, but Dr. Roggenkamp has changed my mind!  She is a wonderful sweet lady, and a very intelligent teacher.  The discussions are very open in her class, and I always get so much out of her notes.
                
                   Great with English!  She doesn't grade the papers, but rather grades how you edit the paper.  She is not concerned with grammer and spelling, but with content and revision!  Awesome teacher!
                
                   She loves discussion, so the class is as good as the people in the class with you.  The reading load is a challenge and is a must for this class.  She is very down-to-earth and is quick to help.  No tests, but 2 in-depth papers.
                
                   Wonderful for those who like dicussion based classes  She is pro-free speech and it shows. The ACLU never had a better member. She knows her material, and she can bring out points that You would never think about. Not the easiest class, but not the hardest. But, she is a most caring prof.
                
                   Dr. Roggenkamp is an easy to talk to teacher who listens. She demands alot but you learn alot.
                
                   she was a great professor...lit is just not one of my fav subjects!! the class discussions are great and keep your attention!!
                
                   Dr. R loves her material & loves presenting it to her class.  She is very fair-minded & easy to work with.  She also is very helpful in terms of outside-class academic achievement, for instance honor societies and such.  I am taking her for another class next semester.
                
                   She is so passionate about literature. Make sure you read all the material and take notes in class during discussions. Tests are a little hard, but if you study your notes you'll do fine. Discussions in class were interesting.
                
                   Anyone can pass this class if they read the material (which consists of very short stories/poems/plays) and take notes during discussion. She is very helpful when you have questions, but you need to attend if you want to make a good grade.
                
                   Very easy class, good material and he made it easy to take the lession and use it in essays. It also helps that he was really nice and awkward in the best way. I seriously would take this class again.
                
                   Ive always hated English. But he really helps you understand! 
                
                   Most chill and laid back teacher that I have had in college. He is very understanding that not everyone excels in English and he tries his best to help bring you up to college level with in-depth student conferences on your paper and lectures. Try your best to take his class for a good professor who cares about your grades.
                
                   She's an amazing teacher! She is random and some of the things she say will catch you off guard but I guarantee you will laugh. She gives more chances than she should but do your work and you will pass. She doesn't like when you talk a lot during her lecture. She is wild. Darth Vader is all else I will say.    May the force be with you. 
                
                   Awesome teacher. She's an easy grader as long as you put the effort in and easygoing in general. She's a weird person but it makes the class fun and interesting. 
                
                   She will have you interested in English. I felt horrible about writing until I took her class.
                
                   Cool lady just a little wild!!
                
                   This woman is crazy, but actually made me almost interested in writing.
                
                   great professor. fun classes and assignments. Very helpful professor and understsanding
                
                   This class is a very discussion based class.Opposing views and different ideas are encouraged. There are 4 essays, online discussions, and a presentation (of your choice). This class thrives off of JSTOR. No Google, Wiki, or magazines-scholarly articles only. The last paper is pretty lengthy (10 pg) and has 7-10 JSTOR sources. Still a fun class. :)
                
                   hes a nice teacher, and the work is easy to understand. he likes to act hip, much to our folly. i wish i could have him again.
                
                   His lectures are boring and not relevant to anything we are doing in the class. Assigns papers with little to no instruction. Luckily he is an easy grader and I am a good writer. Very liberal and has lots of political debates in our class. Didn't go to class much and would not take him again. Wouldn't recommend him unless you want to fall asleep.
                
                   BALLMER is this ish! LOVE U!
                
                   very good teacher and tries to help any way she can
                
                   great
                
                   Noelle was a blast. One of my favorite teachers of all time. :) I've also had some really good teachers so that's saying a lot.
                
                   She is nice. She is good about giveing extra time on papers.
                
                   She's VERY helpful. She's VERY nice. Do well on every assignment. Don't miss class. Daily A&P grades help a lot. She's like a friend in her class. Never wears shoes. haha She loves her cats.
                
                   She's Great!
                
                   use the web site. She does a lot on computers.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   :)
                
                   she will make class fun. lets you work on papers in class. takie her if you can.
                
                   nice
                
                   She's nice. I liked it.   Very helpful and does fun stuff.  There were 3 papers but they were done in groups so not to bad. soes take late homework. Laughs alot.
                
                   She is a very good teacher. even if you don't like writing you will get used to it. she is always willing to help but it is your responsibility to look at the class plans to know what you have to turn in a do before the next class because she may forget to tell you. If you can take i loved this class can't wait for this next semester
                
                   Super sweet and nice. Will help with whatever you need.  Sends cute emails. Tales late work and gives tons of xtra credit!!Really cool.
                
                   Kelly Bezio is a nice professor, however, she is not very clear on most assignments and her lectures are very frustrating and don't really make sense. She assigns a lot of busy work and a few papers and she is not very clear about when assignments are due. Her class felt overall pointless and off topic a lot. I would not take her again.
                
                   Bezio is a great professor, however, you will be expected to print out literally hundreds of pages that you will be expected to have on-hand in every single class. She is a fair grader and gives great feedback, but this class is a lot of work. I recommend taking her if you're an English major.
                
                   would not recommend this teacher to anyone.  she never gives clear instructions, she acts as though she is better than everyone, the worst part is she is a student herself so you think she would be more understanding, not the case at all.  she does not seem to know what she is doing.
                
                   Incredibly easy class, so easy that it is a waste of your time. The professor isnt a very good teacher. She is monotonous, unclear in assignments and even unfair in grading at times. Don't take this class unless you have too. The learning material is somewhat below college level and it seemed like we did the same thing over and over again.
                
                   Very cool, and well help with anything you need help on.  Just do your papers and you will pass with no problem!
                
                   Awesome class...you learn a lot in this class!Most of her teaching is hand's on meaning you are required to participate! Overall I enjoyed this class.
                
                   Super laid back do the work you will get an A
                
                   Mr. Britt, is nice but is confusing at times. Won't explain the assignments right. If there is not a lot of time left in class forget about getting the information for a project or assignment. 
                
                   Great teacher, very understanding and laid back.
                
                   Really helpful if asked and even checks to see how you are doing if you don't ask. Really easy to get an A if you listen to what he expects and follow those guidelines.
                
                   If you can get him, do it! You will not have a professor like him ever! He's so awesome, so laid back. You couldn't ask for anything more. In my opinion I think he grades super easy and fairly.
                
                   One of my favorite professors, He's so laid back. Super Helpful, Highly recommend this professor.
                
                   Laid back guy who will always help you out and knows what he's talking about. Doesn't assign alot of homework and always has class plans online so you know what to expect. Highly recommend his class! Easy A!
                
                   Very easy going and helpful when you need it
                
                   Amazing teacher. Very easy going. Very helpful. As Sean would say "right on" :)
                
                   Extremely intelligent professor.  He is readily available for any help so receiving anything less than an A is the fault of only the student.  Take advantage of his casual demeanor and appreciate what he has to teach.
                
                   He's a great professor, his work is very understandable i highly recomend him. Great guy and makes class fun. If you need help he is there to help you with no questions asked.
                
                   Took him for English 1301, great teacher for my first composition class. It's easy if you show up to class. Every day there were small easy writing assignments which he took for a grade.
                
                   She's Awesome!!
                
                   The best English teacher I have ever had. If you are good at writing, you will be fine. She is very dedicated to helping the individual improve their writing skills and is easy to talk to. I highly recommend going to her office hours for help on papers since she will often give you pointers. If you put effort into this class, you will do well.
                
                   Very good teacher, very helpful, rough class but she loves to help and is there for you, also she will make you go to class but without going to class you will not pass
                
                   Good teacher, very helpful.
                
                   Jennifer Bray is a wonderful teacher! If you pay attention in class there is no way to get behind. She offers many extra credit assignments and events that are able to replace any daily grade that is missed or is low!
                
                   She's a very good professor! I had her for both ENGL 1301 and 1302. If you pay attention and ask her to check over your papers, you will easily make an A.
                
                   She is a great professor. All class plans are online and easy to follow. There is a ton of homework but none of it is really hard. She is very easy to talk to. You don't have to go to class but you get daily writing grades. She will not take late work but gives extensions.
                
                   Jen!!She's such a great professor, always helpful and there when you need it. If you have a problem attending, tell her beforehand and she will do whatever she can to help you out. She's such a great person, she has a schedule of what you will be doing everyday, and always tries to contact students if she misses class. I STRONGLY recommend
                
                   She is really helpfull, if you ask for help. She does assign a lot of writing but if your a good writer then you will have no problem at all. I thought she communicated effectively, showed positive emotion, and was not intimidating at all. I enjoyed this class and highly recommend this professor.
                
                   Wonderful. Always willing to help and will go out of her way to do so. Doesn't belittle students and really loves her job.
                
                   Ridiculous class. No point in asking for help because when you discuss something with her it is clear that everything goes in one ear and out the other. She assigns papers to be turned in when all other classwork needs to be turned in. Does not even try to intergrate her class with the triad. Feels like she does her best to make you feel stupid.
                
                   She is great teacher i would recommend her for anyone, but just keep in mind that major project are alway  due either before test or after test. She is very helpful even if you just talk to her class you don't even have to go to her office hour to get help, since she provided so much help in the class room. friendly, and helpful
                
                   She was not very clear. Our whole class was lost most of the time. Going to class was pointless but she takes attendance. Always assigned big papers due around triad test date.
                
                   She assigned was to much work and we had hours of homework. For being a writing class, we had huge amounts of readings and in class presentations. I thought most of the work done is class was pointless and didnt help me at all. I did not learn much in this class and would not recommend this teacher.
                
                   she is an amazing professor!   she is so cool, easy to talk to, always available during office hours or via email.  I recommend her!   no late work is allowed!  everything she has planned for you will help with your portfolios, so you are not doing work for nothing.   little homework..
                
                   she was hardly ever there due to her daughter's health condistions, i felt lost and our sub didnt know what we wer doing, taught myself what to do.. but she is a great teacher tho.. (if she were there.)
                
                   Great teacher.  Always available and very dedicated to her profession.  University needs more professors like her.
                
                   Great teacher!! She is so nice and helpful. Makes expectations clear for every assignment and is always available for questions. There is always work so don't slack off!! Gives feedback on all papers and makes you want to be a better writer. She gets down to you level so you always understand. Take her class you won't regret it!
                
                   Love her! Great teacher she is very happy all the time!  Grades very fair and will stop what she is doing to help you if you visit with a BIG SMILE! :)
                
                   Great Teacher!  She is awesome comes in everyday with a big smile.  She explains her stuff well and we had fun in her class.
                
                   She is in no way organized. Will change things at the last minute so you are not prepared. She's very unclear on her instructions and has to have everything exactly how she wants it. DO NOT TAKE HER EVER
                
                   Had her for Technical Writing.  She is such a nice lady and takes a real interest in her students.  The class may seem a little chaotic at first, but you can learn a lot from her.
                
                   She does take attendance.  Ask questions or e-mail her if you dont understand the assignment. She grades very tough however if you take your paper for a revision before submitting for a grade you will get a good grade.  Very down to earth person, professional teacher show her respect and will earn hers.   Buy the texbook on time!!
                
                   Took her for technical writing. She was very involved even called you if you had any questions.  Does grade kind of tough. A professor I will remember in a good way for a long time...
                
                   She is disorganized, assigns endless busy work and deadlines for work are not at the same time (so it's easy to forget when something is due). Lots of assignment are outside of class, which is inconvenient. Engl 3301 is a memo class.
                
                   worst class ever. she is very spontaneus lady( not in good way) makes no sense and the class was so pointless.. she should not be teaching
                
                   This is the most professional professor ever! She addresses everyone by &quot;Miss,&quot; or &quot;Mr.,&quot; and gives the classroom a &quot;real world&quot; atmosphere.
                
                   Excellent teacher!
                
                   
                
                   She helped me. I will never forget Professor Delgado. I thought she was very mean until I finally understood it was me that was lazy and she tried harder than all my other instructors to get me to pass.
                
                   She work very hard. Good teacher
                
                   DARN, HER CLASS IS FULL! Was going to re-take her class, but theres no more room. I had to drop her course, but I had every opportunity to pass. She was tough on me, but tried to get me to learn what she was teaching. Now, who knows if I will end up with some bone head lazy professor like I had at UT. Those professors are worthless. Edith is #1
                
                   she is a very great and nice teacher I have ever seen. I am so glad to be her student again
                
                   I will never forget her. She gives so much efforts and is very nice. I hope I see her here at TAMUCC when my little sister arrives. Good Luck Ms. Delgado! Keep up the good work
                
                   GREAT CLASS! I love the discussions and the topics we cover. I never realizied how much I needed to learn how to write until professor Delgado opened my eyes. Its very hard, but, i have learned so much and feel more confident. I don't want to semester to end.
                
                   I had her my first year of college. She is a very nice and helpful professor and person. She made sure that every single one of her students understood what the assignment was. She is a bit of a hard grader, but its all out of her wanting to make sure your ready for the future. She is by far the best teacher i've ever had. LOVE HER!
                
                   She is a very helpful and nice teacher that believes in us. She knows her work is hard at times, but she is willing to help if we dont understand or if we make a bad grade on an assignment. overall, i love her!
                
                   The Best! Never met someone who cared so much if I pass or fail. Will never forget her. Good person and instructor.
                
                   I miss being in her class. She was so nice an happy always. She is a motivator. I wish her well in teaching. maybe I can take another class of hers  so I be motivated to do better with my life.
                
                   I had a hard time understanding her instructions.Demanding and tough grader.She needs to remember we are not grad students yet.I'm sure she had good intentions but too intense.
                
                   I had a hard time understanding her instructions.Extremely demanding and tough grader.She needs to remember we are not grad students yet.I'm sure she had good intentions but too intense.
                
                   I had trouble understanding her. Seems to try hard. I did not get it until almost the end. But I feel she was trying to get me ready for Graduate school. I believe she belongs at A&M CC, and is a good professor with a big heart. but needs to focus on Bachelor degree students and remember we are not ready for graduate level work as she is doing.
                
                   NOT A GOOD PROFESSOR! INSTRUCTIONS WERE ALWAYS NEVER CLEAR! SHE DEMANDS A TON OF WORK AND GRADES LIKE A MAD WOMEN! OVER HALF OF HER CLASS DROPED DUE TO HER HIGH EXPECTATIONS.. STAY CLEAR!
                
                   Although her instruction was hard to understand at times, She helped me to snap out of my childness. I will never forget her. She opened my eyed to a new view on life and education. Thank you Professor Delgado
                
                   tough and demanding
                
                   hard work with low grade. useless....
                
                   She?s tough. I learned a lot, never been pushed so hard. 1302 ppl don?t believe everything you read. She?s hard, but the person who got 9 pts was lazy & can?t write a full sentence, anyone catch that&#63; You?ll definitely learn. She won?t let you fail, if you don?t fail her?always communicate with her, extra credit is easy. She?s the best!
                
                   &quot;death&quot; was a good description.Standards extremely high and perfectionist.
                
                   If you take her class, you will know what is the meaning of &quot;death&quot;. Also, she gave extra credits, but the credits is extremely hard. She has a lotttt of reqirements for each portfolio. By the way, she is so mean because she always gives low grade, even give 9 points for portfolio!!!!!If you are in her class, good luck~~~~
                
                   She takes the class seriously and you have to come on time to sign in. There's daily reading assignments and she'll make you talk about it in class or do drawings. It's not a hard class but it isn't too easy either.
                
                   Dr. Cox takes her literature very seriously, but also realizes not all of the students are as interested. Attendance is mandatory, tests are straightforward, class can be dull and drag on at times, if student attends class, reads and does assignments an A is easily achievable
                
                   Any person who shows up and goes through the motions will get a high grade. She likes what she teaches, but some of her students would be able teach the class much better than her. Certain tenured professors, makes everyone lose. The school, and especially the students. Easy class!!
                
                   Awesome Literature Professor, I so enjoyed the class, gained a real appreciation for so called funky old literature, it's really pretty good stuff
                
                   Dr.Davis, is such a sweet teacher. Her class is very easy, you do write essays every other week. But she will extend the deadline to the whole class if needed. She's not a hard grader when it comes to the paper.  She's very understanding and will help you in anyway.
                
                   Her class consists of writing essay and no exams. I thought it was one of the easiest classes I took this semester. She grades very leniently and allows you to  re-write essays that you made bad grades on (if you have them reviewed at the writing center). She is a very exciting teacher and guides you through everything. I highly recommend her class
                
                   A great professor! She helped me better understand grammar and now I am a so much better at writing! I would recommend her to anyone!
                
                   She is extremely helpful and knows what she is talking about. There were 9 papers to write along with a research paper, a storytelling assignment and the final paper. If you are not good at writing papers this is not the class for you. The only reason I got a B is because I didn't do one of the 9 papers. Other than that I got an A on every paper.
                
                   Very helpful professor! Makes you do one group presentation and several essays. It's not hard to make an A in her class as long as you know what she's looking for in the essays and she's always willing to work with you if you have problems. Attendance isn't mandatory but she'll start taking points off your average if you miss too many classes.
                
                   Great teacher! Knows her stuff...extremely helpful and understanding!!
                
                   Makes a difficult subject very easy. If you don't do the homework assignment though, you'll be lost.  This class is similar to a math class in that you must practice what you have learned to be ready for the next lesson.  There is a lot of peer-exercises in class. Four papers which are quite easy to knock out. I enjoyed this class tremendously.
                
                   she makes you do a lot of group work stuff and presentations. don't take if you don't have the time to devote to it.
                
                   This was a great class! Very fun, and helpful too.  English isn't so bad if you get this teacher because she makes it fun, and you learn a lot.
                
                   I took her for 1301 and 1302.  I learned soo much in this class, she is the best teacher I have ever had.  She is fun and really understanding she makes you want to go to class.  Also she wrote me recommendation letters.  I love this lady.
                
                   Ashleigh is a great teacher, I learned alot about writing as well as myself and I enjoyed this semester with her as my teacher.
                
                   I loved this class!  I learned SO much about writing, and it was fun 'cause Ashleigh's not afraid to use humor in class.
                
                   Professor Dziadek is an amazing person. She's funny, caring, and wants you to succeed. I do not recommend skipping her class, you will need to attend for clarification on the homework that is assigned online. Expect to write papers and read for homework. Overall, she may not get into detail with her assignments during lecture, just as for help!
                
                   Ms. Dziadek started off as a great teacher, but as the year progressed it became harder and harder to be in her class. She rarely replied to emails asking for clarification, and would often get upset with students for asking too many questions. I didn't like having her as a teacher, and wouldn't recommend her. 
                
                   The course was not my favorite, but Ms Deezy made it fun. She always made herself available to help one on one and online. If you do your work, do the readings, and come prepared to class, there is no reason why ANYONE can't make an A in this course. If you did poorly, then it was because you did nothing. 
                
                   I had Ms. Deezy my Freshman year. In the beginning, I thought her class would've been fun, but by the end of it, I was dreading going to class. She's a very tough grader, and I felt like my writing just wasn't good enough for her. I got a D on every single paper I turned in.  I wouldn't recommend her.
                
                   She is a great teacher! She will take the time to go over your papers and make corrections as long as you go to her office hours. Gives extra credit for attending different local events and writing a short paper on it. I learned more about writing in this year than I ever had before this class!! She is a must take for English!! 
                
                   You have to beg for help and she will call you out for asking "dumb questions" if you ask her to clarify something she feels she already explained.  I wouldn't advise taking her as I saw her get really mean with a couple of students. She'll start off the semester nice and by the end loses interest in her students and grades harder.
                
                   The course theme was The Dark, Daring and Demented so opened things up for awesome group discussions.  Lots of reading, journals, short and long papers, but totally within anyone's reach to earn an "A". I should have rated her sooner, totally recommend her as an instructor.
                
                   Mrs. Deezy was by far the best english professor i could ask for. She was very clear on what she wanted in a paper and her class was always beneficial. No doubt would recommend her to anyone.
                
                   Tips to pass with ease, learn the pbworks website and she always has specific questions that she wants answered when you write your papers, reflections, or peer reviews, answer those questions and you will do fine.  Also take a few minutes to learn how to fully navigate her class plans because all the questions peg to the assignments are in there.
                
                   She is awesome! I do not like writing classes, and she gave me a new found appreciation for writing.
                
                   Guys, i suck at english. Simple. But this professor, has somehow found a way for me to love english and open my mind.She helps a lot and has online conferences.She is funny, and she does strictly go by syllabus.  but all teachers do. if you don'y like her cause you failed, it's your fault and your wrong. Plain and simple.
                
                   The best teacher ever! This was my second time having her and she is an absolute blast. She is always willing to lend the helping hand if you show you want the help. If you keep up with the material, there should be no reason why you can't get an A!
                
                   Once I found my groove the class went well. Teacher always made herself available to help and even made videos to help us along the way. Lots of work, but managing time. Very important. I would recommend her definitely.
                
                   Her course requires you check in regularly and READ the assignments as well as class plans. You can't fake your way through, the course. She is a genuine teacher and is willing to really help her students. It was hard but worth the effort.
                
                   She starts off good and interesting but by the third project she becomes very confusing, using technical terms that don't make sense and being unclear about assignments and directions. She asks you to refer to her online class plans which are equally as confusing. Avoid her at all costs. She is nice at first but picky and unpleasant by the end.
                
                   even though I got an A, however, I don't recommend this professor cause you may have to do 50-60 pages essays  includes projects, evaluations and reflections. but you really can learn something useful on her class. take her class only if you like to do a lot a lot essays.
                
                   She's awesome towards the beginning but as time progresses she starts to point fingers at all of her students in front of the class telling everyone what they did wrong. I liked her at first but she is not clear about what she wants you to write on any of her essays. She uses a bit too much technology in her classes.
                
                   One of the best teachers I have ever had. Cares greatly about her students and english. Strongly recommend taking her!
                
                   You have to pay attention and do your work. If you've got that, it is a fun class! She does a little more than the average professor online, but I think she is just evolving with the times. Got Wiki&#63; One of her faves... Be sure to cite your sources, she can spot five words copied from other works and will nail you on it. Otherwise, great class!
                
                   Very fun teacher who wants her students to truly learn. She is personable and fun to talk to. I truly enjoyed her class. ENJOY!
                
                   Amazing teacher. I highly recommend you taking his class
                
                   Horrible teacher ever. He gives out a lot of work just like we have only his class in the whole semester. He expects way to much from the students with many ridiculous requirements in writing project. Don't ever take his class if you don't want to be dying. If you are international student, you have a very high chance of being in his class though.
                
                   this class was only given once a week. don't take this one. there is one that is offered twice a week in the spring. TAKE THAT ONE! two and a half hours a night is horrible. if you don't go to class you WILL NOT pass! there is a research paper at the end of the semester. as long as you study for the mid term and final you will be good.
                
                   He is very tough grader, never satisfy with your work. He does not say clearly what he wants to give students good grades. Occasionally, he does not understand the obvious word meaning. By the book professor, do not take this class if you have anger issue. The book is great but you only use less than 30 pages out of 300+ pages.  
                
                   Probably the best teacher I have ever had. His class is not easy but he tries incredibly hard to help you get a great grade. If you want a good grade in this class you have to work for it and attend every class, but I have nothing bad to say about this teacher. He generally does care about everyone of his students and he is hilarious.
                
                   He gives a lot of work but it only helps you understand the material better. his grade point system is a little complex so if you're interested in how you're doing at any point during the semester, you may want to go see him. Great professor, wish he taught other classes
                
                   Loved this class. Dr. Doolan cares about his students doing well and is funny.  Would take his class again.
                
                   Loved this class!  Dr. Doolan wants you to do well.  He cares about his students and is really funny. Would take him again.
                
                   I LOVED him. Yes, he gives out a lot of work but more than half of it is optional-it is just extra practice-which I highly recommend you do if you want an A. Go to class & do the assignments and practice in the book and online. Find a book for the GIA assignment early before they all get check out of the library. EXCELLENT prof & I loved his humor.
                
                   He is a great professor. Other reviews stated that he gives out a ton of assignments, but they are not hard. The reason he gives out so many is that you have lots of practice with the material. I also enjoy his sense of humor and recommend taking him for Grammar and Linguistics.
                
                   very hard assignment. too much homework. no one can get good grade for his writing homework what ever he does. nor him nor his wife.
                
                   u goona have  lot of work need to do. paper is hard!!!!!!:(
                
                   He's a really good teacher, and he covers the material well enough. It's just a matter of how well you can grasp the concepts of the subject. There are quite a few assignments, but they're all pretty easy, albeit a bit time consuming.
                
                   He is the hardest professor I have ever had and he is giving a bunch of assignment and he never satisfied with the works that he gave in class.  If you take his class you should be a crazy .
                
                   He is helpful and if you try, you can get a good grade but it will take some time.
                
                   Really good professor! He helps students improve their writings. But it's too hard to get high grade. A lot of assignments, too.
                
                   This class is horrible. She is very snide and will annoy you. The assignments don't help you at all they're more used as a way for her to give you homework almost every class. Her grading is stupid and inconsistent. My advice, do not take this class.
                
                   So this professor got under my skin. English professor/student, she works from the &quot;writing about writing&quot; book...A LOT doesnt explain her assignments or projects that well make sure to read her syllabus first day of class.
                
                   There was absolutely no structure in her class. Plus, if you question the lack of structure, she'll just say "the structure is that there is no structure." The group project was terrible. If you want to learn something, I would not take this professor. But, if you want an easy A, she's good for that. 
                
                   Incredibly vague assignments, lack of structure. Whole class was lost many times not knowing what she wanted. Nothing was learned in this course. Attendance not mandatory which lead to a weak classroom environment  and confusion on group assignments . Do not take her if you actually want to learn something.
                
                   Huge lack of structure in this class, which a lot of people (like myself) need. Our class made it into Nov. - and we were still planning what we'd be doing for the semester. It was strange. She's a sweet lady and always available to help, but the class became chaotic after a while. I left this class not actually learning anything at all...
                
                   Great professor who genuinely cares about her students. If you're having issues with an assignment, she is more than willing to help you out. While the assignments were work-intensive, the work was spread out enough that it was not hard to complete. She's big on class participation and peer reviews, in order to get a good grade you must do them.
                
                   Awesome teacher! If you can take her for a class, do it. While she does expect good work that is turned on on time, the work is very individual and she is willing to tailor the assignment to each student and their interests. Our class wrote a zombie survival guide and each person wrote their own chapter. She is an amazing teacher!
                
                   She is a very kind teacher & is willing to compromise in order to help you with your assignments. There are no tests, just essays. You don't need your book. I came into this class thinking it was going to be boring & that I would hate it, but Ms.Garza completely changed my mentality by the end of the semester! She is very supportive & encouraging.
                
                   Ms. garza is young and full of life very helpFul and easy as long as you participate and do the assignments you will pass with flying colors no tests at all just writing assignments easy
                
                   really helpful with grammar. class is completely boring and sometimes hard to stay awake. But she is the nicest lady on campus and will help you in any way possible
                
                   This class is thoroughly enjoyable, so long as you show up. Lectures are short, and sweet. The work load, however, is rigorous but you do receive quality feedback on almost all assignments. Overall, I would take this class again, because the work is made enjoyable by the amount of humor used. My writing has developed drastically, would recommend!
                
                   Great Professor. Show up to class and you should do fine, She makes class really enjoyable by adding a lot of humor. She really helped me develop my writing skills. I would take her again for English if I could.
                
                   Love Ms. Hartman! She is so funny and very helpful while writing essays. i would definitely recommend this class.
                
                   She is super kind and always willing to joke. Her method of explaining the assignments and the understanding is pretty clear. i honestly never had a professor that did not make it look so easy for me. 
                
                   Super funny! Felt like I was hanging out with a friend rather than a professor!
                
                   This is an easy class if you show up every single day. You get to express yourself as a writer and by taking this class I've learned a lot. She will give you extra credit on essay's if you go to the writing center, two visits can boost you up to a letter grade. If you skip you will loose out on very important information. I recommend this teacher
                
                   Difficult Class. Used every textbook and analyzed each one in deep detail. Her class took up all of my time and I hardly had time for any of my other courses. Many essays and pop quizzes.. The exams arent MC or matching, just writing and they're very hard. I suggest not taking her if at all possible. Make sure you read and pay attention if you do.
                
                   Her class is hard. If you aren't good at reading and breaking down the books and thoughly analizing the book th it's not the class for you. I read and studied all the time for the class and i still came out with just a C.She's hard to follow in class as well.
                
                   Terrible professor, boring class, more philosophy than English, he is teaching the wrong subject. Not very helpful.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This professor was awesome! I had a fun time in his class.  He made things interesting.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   breanne is awesome. she's really funny and explains the assignments very well. hopefully she won't change anything for 1302
                
                   she dresses cute and is very hyper, but has a generally good attitude, but she won't baby you.
                
                   Excellent professor!!! Her class was alot of fun, and she hardly gave out work which was great!! I highly recommend joanna!
                
                   SHES AWESOME!! I love her! probably one of my favorite teachers.  Very lenient and easy going.  Simple class, very easy.
                
                   Let me turn in stuff late when life got in the way of school. Very nice and understanding.  She is a must take teacher.
                
                   She was so helpful all the time and she truly cares about each student. She does take attendance every class. I would take her again!
                
                   It was an amazing semester, and fortunate enough for my English section we were bestowed the honor of being her first Eng students. She's an amazing teacher and person. She focuses on bringing out your full potential as a writer and always finds something positive to say about your essay. Unfortunately this is going to be her only year for Eng1301.
                
                   If you go to class every day, you'll be fine! But she takes Freshman Seminar too serious.
                
                   i love her, very comfortable to talk to. very great. want to have her very year
                
                   Chelsie has a good interest in her students; she definitely wants them to succeed. Makes good use of class time and is very well organized. Is a bit of a stickler for attendance, but will work with you. You should take her ESPECIALLY if you're taking huerta (she takes his sometimes pointless rants and relates them to the work)
                
                   Very helpful instructor,If you wanna get an &quot;A&quot; in large lecture, you better take her class
                
                   She is nice with you if you go to class and make the work. She is getting meaner but she is still being new in her teaching experience.
                
                   Amazing teacher. She really makes you think about the material. She explains what she wants clearly. It really is a shame she's retiring in the Spring.
                
                   SHE IS AN AWESOME ENGLISH TEACHER! You don't do busy work, but rather analyze whatever you may have read the day before. Very open discussions. She's very helpful. Her paper's are kind of tough but fair.
                
                   Inspiring and lovely. I would consider her a mentor really. Classes with her are amazing and she's hilarious and fun. Her course load is perfectly balanced and you will learn a lot of intriguing facts. I would take any course that she teaches. Look into her Creative Writing workshop also.
                
                   Honestly one of my favorite professors. She's such a sweetheart. You have reading to do before class but they are very easy and short. Overall, I would recommend her for your literature credit.
                
                   She is one of the best professors I have had at TAMUCC.  You are given the syllabus with the readings and she follows the syllabus. You have a daily assignment that gives you extra credit really easy even if you didn't read material for that day. Easy grader. OVER ALL, RECOMMENDED!
                
                   An amazing professor. For techniques of creative writing, you have two major assignments that count for your entire grade but consist of homework assignments that you should be keeping up with. It is a fairly simple class. She makes it fun and you learn a lot about how to improve your writing.
                
                   Totally lovely, great professor. Techniques class requires a Creative Writing Portfolio and a Poetry portfolio, 50 points each. So long as you keep an organized folder of your work, an A is guaranteed.
                
                   Awesome teacher! She's funny and makes the class interesting to attend. Make VERY sure you do well on the two essays and your journal, because that's the only grading criteria that was involved for Brit Lit. But yeah, if you do well it should be a rather easy A. Highly recommended!
                
                   My only complaint about this class would be that there are NO GRADES until the very end.  Everything is dependent upon your portfolio.  Process is as large a component as the final product... so keep everything!
                
                   Vanessa is one of the best professors at this university. She's hilarious, witty, and very helpful for anyone interested in English. I also suggest her creative writing workshop. Best teacher yet.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I have been waiting his class for two years!!! When I am ready, he passed away. Even though I didn't have a chance to take his class, but I would like to rate full score based on what I know about him.
                
                   Since he is no longer with us, I would suggest taking his wife for English and Writing courses. I took Bible as Lit with Dr. Robb and he became a spiritual guide for me. You would never look at the Bible the same way again. The man was amazing, insightful, hilarious, and a beautiful human being. An awesome man of God, not in a conventional way tho.
                
                   BEST professor at TAMUCC!Unfortunately, he passed away recently, wish more people could have taken him. He was a great man, who cared very much for his students! If you are looking for another great LIT prof, take his wife, V. Jackson, she is just as awesome :)
                
                   He is a great professor. He gives you complete freedom, and so long as you pay attention (which you will he's awesome) you'll do great. He will blow your mind with philosophies. Ask him about his Orange story if you want a funny and intriguing story, or about TAAS/TAKS testing if you want to hear him go off on a rant against establishment.
                
                   The perfect kind of professor, ex/part hippy, always relating subjects to life lessons. Lots of jokes and stories that make it easier to understand. Definitely worth listening to what he has to say.
                
                   Didn't exactly have a class but he did teach a friend and I a life lesson
                
                   If you need regular feedback, Robb is not for you!  Dr. Robb likes for writing to be a process.  Sometimes, you won't know if you're improving a paper that is already a 90, or only a 65.  Don't get behind on the required papers or you'll be overwhelmed at the end!
                
                   Best Prof. I have ever taken.
                
                   Intro Class. VERY informative. Great teacher! Interesting...and you LEARN!
                
                   he is an excellent teacher and he is hilarious
                
                   The best english teacher I could ever imagine having. If you have the opportunity to have Robb as your professor, TAKE IT!!
                
                   Amazing teacher as well as human being. He truely cares about each of his students and is totally willing to help them succede. Very funny! Love the man, he is wonderful.
                
                   Amazingly helpful and a great teacher.
                
                   best teacher i've ever had!!!!!!!!
                
                   Robb is the best teacher ever; he knows his stuff and his lectures are always fun because he has the best sense of humor. Plus you learn a good deal of material and the tests are not hard.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   great guy, has a great sense of humor.
                
                   robb really knows his stuff.  he's worth listening to, but he's not gonna help you if you don't help yourself first.  great teacher - has the most interesting way of communicating ideas of anyone i've ever met, inside or outside the classroom.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Best professor at A&amp;M Corpus Christi. No other like him.
                
                   I liked her as a teacher.  I made a B in there but I was lazy and procrastinated a lot.  If you follow the syllabus, go to class and follow her direction as well as seek her help you should make an A.
                
                   She is a really good teacher. She will go out of her way to help you and to make sure you do your very best in her class.
                
                   Great professor! She is new but has a strong interest in what she does.  Always willing to help students and is open minded.  Very positive, and is fair in her grading.
                
                   I happen to think he is really hot in a dark and twisty rebellious grunge sorta way.
                
                   He his perhaps the worst teacher I have ever had. He never listens or takes the time to listen to students. He always puts you down whenever you have a question or comment, he always has to be right. If you do end up with this guy, get out or at least be on alert for random assignments and due dates.
                
                   I love Dr.Kirklighter! She is so sweet and passionate about writing. She really wants you to do well and is not really strict and lets you take your own direction on assignemnts. I am not an english major, and she really made me appreciate writing in the community. Shes  funny too :) I totally recommend her. Got an A in her class
                
                   While she does give broad assignments and allows students to tailor the assignment to themselves, she likes to read everything to the class. She goes over things way too much and treats us as if we need everything spoon-fed to us. Ans she docks points from assignments where they shouldn't have been docked.
                
                   Her assignments are fairly broad allowing you the ability to apply yourself in the direction of your future. I learned a lot from her class.
                
                   I took her Priciples of Professional Report Writing class, and it was AWFUL.  Attendance was mandatory, but a lot of the days were just &quot;writing workshop&quot; days that we had to sit in for 2 hours, and that were, honestly, completely uneccessary. The class wasnt hard, but she wasn't as helpful as she could have been!
                
                   She is awesome! I would recommend her to anyone who is required the take english professional writing and report course. Very helpful and very understanding. great class. Theres a lot of group peer editing and group work done in her class which is great...
                
                   loved loved loved this professor!! she's cooky, and funny and she's really nice and her class isn't difficult. she also is very helpful. i HIGHLY recommend her :]
                
                   She was such a sweetheart and her class was easy.  I had her the first semester she ever taught there and I loved her.  If you need help just ask her!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He does give pop quizzes but make sure to read what you're supposed to read so you can at least be somewhat prepared. His lectures are incredibly long and boring,  and not really helpful. I really didn't use any of his tips and I just wrote how I wanted and I got an A for my final grade. He's a pretty easy and fair grader, I would take him again.
                
                   Quite a bit of very dry reading, one of the worst textbooks ever written.  1 short 4-page writing assignment during the first half of semester, 1 major writing assignment during the second half of semester with a presentation. Quizzes were open notes as long as they were hand written. It's very easy to get an "A".
                
                   You have to go in for help on essays if you want feedback on them and he gives quizzes over the readings. The quizzes, tests and essays are very easy if you read so you have to read everything he assigns. TAKE NOTES. He posts all of the powerpoints online however you do get penalized on your final grade for not going to class a certain # of times
                
                   He is SUCH AN EASY GRADER. All you have to do is write a well  written essay. I got all B's on the essays and managed to get an A because of the quizzes. I did not understand anything he said and I just wrote like I normally would. I bs'ed one essay and still got an 88. Although he will not reply to your emails if you ask for help.
                
                   He would be a great teacher is he didn't lecture at the class rather than lecturing to the class. He doesn't let anyone get a word in and is rather unapproachable. For an hour and fifteen minutes, he lectures at the class without pausing and gives random (but not unpredictable) quizzes. Would NOT take again. 
                
                   She lets you choose the topics for all of your writing assignments. And she is the easiest grader ever. You have to go to class though =( which is a bummer because its really boring.
                
                   She goes over project/assignment instructions in class, and has a discussion question for the class to respond to every class, but it is only for a daily grade. I missed 8 classes during the semester and still received an A. Take her class, and you will, most likely, do well.
                
                   Very easy class, but very very boring teacher!
                
                   great teacher. Makes everything clear and could understand everything required.
                
                   She's definitely one of the most helpful teachers ever. She knows exactly what she's talking about and let's you be creative by letting you pick your own topics to write about :)
                
                   Veryyyyy helpful! My favorite.
                
                   GREAT, GREAT, GREAT, she knows her stuff, and will take the time to work with you.  Just go to class, be respectful, and you will learn and pass.
                
                   Great teacher, this was my first college level English class.  I though I would hate it as I have previous English classes.  Each task/report is clearly outlined by her. Any questions posed, she would answer and not let you leave until she felt you got the answer you were looking 4.  If she felt class was ahead of schedule, she would dismiss early.
                
                   Extremely nice and laid back! Takes attendance everyday and very easygoing when grading assignments. I hate writing papers, but she made the topics fun and easy for me to write. Definitely recommend for any english class!
                
                   The way a freshman class is supposed to be, very easy.  She is extremely nice, and if you turn the assignments in on time, then you will pass the class.  Quite often she will let you go really early from class.
                
                   Very nice and helpful. Easy to understand. I had her in a summer class, assignments were easy, but she did mention that the work she assigns her students in regular semesters is a lot more than in the summer semester. She takes attendance every day!
                
                   Very nice and helpful. Easy to understand. I had her in a summer class, assignments were easy, but she did mention that the work she assigns her students in regular semesters is a lot more than in the summer semester. She takes attendance every day!
                
                   She was very helpful, always willing to answere any questions.  She put all her assignments on Web CT so you could refer back to them.  Each of her assignments was crystal clear I had no problems following them.
                
                   she is a good teacher she is very willing to help if you show interest! i got a A very easy!
                
                   she is a nice person, but her teaching skills are lacking.  i wish she would try to take control of her class every now and then.  she doesnt make her assignments clear, and wonders why everyone fails them.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very good teacher.  He was one of the only English professors who did not encourage you to write like a robot.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Definatley Recommended!!He is the nicest and easiest teacher. will help you out in anyway possible no matter what the situation is. he doesn't give tests or final exams. just do your journal responses and you'll get an A. Real easy class with no very much to do.don't know what to say but sweetheart!
                
                   Super fun and exciting! Essays are very do-able and class work is always interactive.
                
                   Best professor I've had so far at TAMUCC. She's extremely helpful and very nice. Essays are pretty easy. I definitely recommend her.
                
                   By far the best teacher I've met at TAMUCC. She helps you if you need it and keeps things interesting. Just do the homework and you will do fine.
                
                   Dre is absolutely fantastic! I had her for English 1301. The class is easy if you make it easy. Just get your work done and you will do just fine. If you ever have any questions, she has no problem assisting you. We always got down to business in every class with her, so try not to miss!
                
                   Murphy assigns many things at once and expects students to go over and beyond expectations without being asked. She takes her time with grading and doesn't necessarily give helpful feedback. With that being said, she is a very understanding person and will allow you to edit work for a better grade.
                
                   English reading course, so daily reading, but not overloaded.  Cool 70's hippie dude.  If you keep up in the class, easy pop-quizzes.  Mid-term and final exams are super-easy, since he provides short-answer questions in advance and goes over answers beforehand.  Tends to answer own questions that he asks the class in discussions.
                
                   He is flamboyant, he is partial, and he is disrespectful. Avoid
                
                   Awesome professor! Yes he does get angry at times, the books you read are off the wall. If you take him go to class and read the books it will help you in the long run.Helpful,so go to office hours if you do not like your grade or have questions. This is not an easy A class but I have heard of harder Lit classes. Spark notes work only for so long.
                
                   Very nice man but he is easily frustrated when the class asks questions about assignments.It is never clear what he is asking us to do. I wouldn't recommend him. He is also almost always late and the class seems very disorganized.
                
                   He is not very good. Grader is hard. Good for English majors otherwise stay away.
                
                   He makes class funny sometimes when he picks on students, but those students do that to themselves by sleeping or listening to music during class.  He grades essays at a difficult way but if you think you don't deserve that grade, TALK TO HIM! I thank him because he motivated me when I thought I was horrible at English, I made an A w/ hard work!!
                
                   He likes to call on a lot of students randomly, but overall he is a very good professor. The essays aren't too hard, but you really need to keep up with his assignments to pass the class. You can tell he really enjoys his job. I would definitely recommend him.
                
                   Murphy made reading fun again! Though there is alot of it, and the essays are never fun to do; his choice of books for the semester just got better and better. He is always willing to talk with you about a grade he has given, usually tacks on another point...or 5!
                
                   I'm not going to lie, Mr. Murphy is hard on grading his essays. There's seven books that you need to read. There's three four page essays, and two test. Try your best and you'll get an A like i did.
                
                   Professor is good and tries to explain important points throughout the required text. Reading is sometimes long but necessary in order to write the 3 essays. Mid term and final are not bad because he gives the questions and answers if you attend class before the exam. Enjoyed class because of his humor that made the semester fly by.
                
                   There were lots of books to read however he was really helpful on all the essays. True the TA grades like a nazi but he doesn't grade anything except for the midterm and final. Curves a whole bunch. As long as you actually try no reason why you shouldn't get an A.
                
                   Difficult class. Lots of reading and writing involved. You have to stay on top of required reading. TA grades like all students are English majors. One essay over each book, six altogether. Only two exams, midterm and final are essay and short answer. Doesn't make things easy for you at all. One group presentation. Take an easier prof if you can.
                
                   One of the worst English professors that I've ever had. He has his TA do ALL of the grading and she grades as if we're all English majors. He frequently arrives late to class and isn't helpful when answering a question. Seems lazy.
                
                   Tons of reading and writing!  Vocab quizzes every few weeks and lots of discussion. Reading assigned pages are a must!  Six essays, one over each book. Only tests are midterm and final which are both short answer and essay. Posts study questions and essays for exams, study them all!! Don't take if you are looking for an easy class.
                
                   forgot class #: professional report writing online. he was a nice guy, and I'm sure he's a fine teacher not online, but he really sucked. We got absolutely no feedback for the first half of the semester, and after that it was really spotty. The assignments were also really unclear. No one knew what we were supposed to do. Not recommended!
                
                   Cool guy! Very laid-back style of teaching, and he's willing to help you out if you have any questions. Attendance is highly mandatory, since it counts for the grade and it's important that you know for sure what's to be expected in the class. If he's teaching a required English course, take him!
                
                   Tom Murphy is great! He is very understanding with his students & very helpful. Mr. Murphy requires 6 essays, at least 3 pages long. You go over the answers to the mid-term & final before the test, so you know what to study, but on those two test, make sure to underline the title of the book! Group presentation is awkward. Attendance is mandatory!!
                
                   best experience with an instructor ever! He is the finest prof. at TAMUCC.
                
                   Really cool guy who is nice and approachable. Pretty easy class that requires a lot of essays, but they aren't very long (about 3 pages minimum). Take him if you have to take this particular literature class!
                
                   awesome, fantastic...great teaching style, always willing to help
                
                   do NOT take this class if you are lazy. candace is really cool and will help you if you need it but she pushes you to do your work and sometimes the project is difficult to understand. she's awesome and you will come out of this class more studious
                
                   a little challegeing but not to bad, great teacher
                
                   Hard class but so worth it - she really is there to help you do well
                
                   real easy, works great with you and is compassionate  to first year students, woks to make sure you can meet requirments and if you can't she'll change them up for you so you can. she is funny and couses and everything, the kind of teecher that is your friend rather than &quot;supperior&quot; to you!!
                
                   Great teacher.  I think that if you don't particularly like the requirements for the class she will work with you to find something does make you want to learn and participate.  Don't be afraid to ask her, she wants to help students out
                
                   Candace- we heart you, you rock our socks!  :)                           -luv your Eng. 1301Triad K Class !!!!
                
                   shes a great teacher. she really cares alot. she kicks ass.
                
                   she is a really free spirited teacher and will help you if she knows you have payed attention!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Ms P rocks!
                
                   TAKE HIM!! Super awesome and funny guy. I've never met anyone more laid back. He gives you an outline for the two major papers and a lot of time to do them!!
                
                   Mr Ed is very friendly, charismatic and laid back. He does not take attendance, but going to his classes is worth it. He does a lot to help you get a good grade, and puts any doubt to rest. He is a great instructor who seems very passionate and is always in a good mood. 
                
                   Really laid back. Class is pretty easy but I don't recommend taking it at 8 am. Great teacher. Super helpful.
                
                   Awesome professor, great with late work. Attendance isn't mandatory but his class is worth attending & you're always out early anyway.
                
                   Loved Mr. Quintana! He was really understanding and clarified anything you were confused about. Also is really laid-back. I wish I could have had him for Comp. 2!
                
                   Really helpful when you need understanding an assignment. Easy grader, super nice, and really understanding. I really recommend him as a teacher.
                
                   I loved her class. She gives you a lot of freedom to let what you want to learn about teaching writing guide you throughout the class. I learned a lot and it was easy. I had no idea what to expect at first but I am really glad I took her and the class.
                
                   Four Portfolios, Three 6-8 page essays(double-space), one 15min powerpoint presentation IS all you do during the Semester. Really cool teacher because we don't do any actual in class assignments. All you have to do is worry about getting the essays and powerpoint done and make sure you do them right. I recommend.
                
                   She is an awsome teacher!!  She gives you some group work.  She explains everything.  Not a lot of assignments or reading of books!  A lot of class discussions!
                
                   This class was fairly easy. You obviously have to write a couple of papers but she is really helpful and also gives extra points for going to the writing center. Get your assignemnts done and you should be looking at an A.
                
                   She a really sweet teacher but very strict about the work.  She would also at the end of the school year give you a chance to turn in some late papers.
                
                   Ms. Rhodes was an awesome teacher. She works in the writing center which constantly gives you the opportunity to work on your papers with her. If you chose to put in the work with her so she can see you are trying you will do fine in this class.
                
                   She is a great teacher.  Making English a fun class to go to.  She is a nerd and easy to talk to.  I spent a lot of time talking to her in the writing center.  She honestly cares about our grades and when life happens she is always there for help or just to talk to.  If there is an issue with your grade just talk to her and she will makethingsright
                
                   She is a good teacher. She makes it interesting and fun. 
                
                   Sincerely she is mediocre when correcting papers, she does not care of the content on your paper, she has a perspective towards things totally different from you, always ready to defy you and a super feminist. DO NOT take a class with her, nobody in my class got an A with her...
                
                   She is a good teacher. I am not good in English but she makes in so interesting and fun. If I had to take this class again I would take it with her I love this class 
                
                   Great guy and teacher! Not a fan of English but he made the semester really fun and worthwhile. His work may be lengthy but as long as you do it there isn't a reason not to get an A in his class. Definitely a professor I would recommend taking! Very helpful and approachable as well!
                
                   She's an awesome teacher! she's comprehensive and very respectful. You just go to her class and pay attention to what she says and do the work and youll get a really good grade. Her clases are fun and she is a sweetheart.
                
                   Awesome teacher! I was lucky enough to have Miss Seiller for both Composition 1 and Composition 2 in my freshman year. She's very nice and respectful towards her students, and she also makes the class easy for everyone. I easily made an A in both courses. I highly recommend her!
                
                   Best teacher to take for English Lit.  Attendance is mandatory and he does take seriously.  Have a reading quiz everyday and 2 essays that count more than the final.  Very helpful, lectures aren't too bad, funny at times.  Available to help before, after class & during office hours.
                
                   Dr. Wallace really has influenced me as a writer. He is very clear in what he is trying to get across, and is pretty comical. He's always willing to help you when you're completely lost. If he tells you to read something(which isn't often) read it because odds are you'll have to write a summary over it! But other than that its an easy course. 
                
                   Dr. Wallace was a good professor. Show up and do the work.  He's fair if you are fair.  Professors expect you to show up and do the work.  Be open to learning what it takes to write a paper.  Don't try to make short cuts and you'll do well in this class.  It's
                
                   Although she may take long to grade, she is a very fun teacher. I got to know her on a personal level and I am taking her again this semester for ENGL 1302. There is a 1-2 page assignment every class but it's not horrible. I would recommend.
                
                   Horrible teacher, did not learn anything from her class. I highly suggest you take another professor for this course and don't waster your time taking her. Way too much homework and long boring lectures
                
                   Horrible teacher, DO NOT TAKE
                
                   Horrible teacher. Slow to grade even with a grader and always giving assignments after each long lecture 
                
                   Horrible teacher. Always takes FOREVER to grade things even though she has a grader. Makes you write a page and a half to 2 page journal response almost every class. I did EVERY assignment making A's and B's and sill ended up with a B. Also it's discussion based so if you say something wrong she makes you feel stupid. DO NOT TAKE 
                
                   Her English Lit class is a discussion class where you can voice your own opinions and if you are insulted you can leave. She will adjust the schedule for assignments (extends if you ask). Really the only complaint is that she is never clear on due dates or content for tests. You have to ask her multiple times before she will give you study guides.
                
                   Her Engl Lit class is amazing! This is one of my favorite classes so far. Loved the books and reading but it is a very demanding class. Just do the work and attend class and you should get an A or a B.  The class is about woman renaissance, so we talked about women, racism, and women writers .
                
                   Class was easy, too easy. Felt like a waste of time for the most part to be honest. But if you feel like you need an easy A then just go to class and get an attendance grade. We only got three assignments for the whole semester and she graded them very leniently. There were no social anxiety inducing assignments besides peer reviews. 4/5 bananas.
                
                   She was very helpful and would adjust dates to help students. I would recommend to anyone to take her. She would also help students struggling
                
                   Great class and great professor.  Dr. Walker is very sincere and concerned about her students comprehension.  She adjusted the class schedule at times to ensure enough time was provided on topics/projects that needed them.  She is very approachable and will adjust her office hours if needed so a student can get help if needed.  I recommend her.
                
                   He is the best and no doubt about it my favorite professor!!!  He uses more of hands on approach in his classes. I took him for both ENGL 1301 & 1302. No textbook required.  The only way you can fail his class is by not going at all and trying.  I've learned so much from him & he made my transition into college easy. :)))
                
                   Great professor and always willing to help even if it isn't during her office hours.  Put forth a good effort and you will do well.
                
                   Just do your work and everything will go fine. Shes very nice and easygoing and is always willing to help. She does tend to change things on the syllibus a lot, just go to class and that shouldnt be too much of a problem.
                
                   A very challenging class, but she is a really good prof who is really interested in her students. I made a high B and i didn't even turn in my anonatated biblograpies, all you have to do is do your papers and ask for her help. Don't take her if you plan on doing abosolutely nothing!
                
                   changes the syllabus too much, excessive reading journals
                
                   Just do all your work. she's real eager to help u outside of class
                
                   she's decent enough- if you do all your papers- and turn them all in- you'll get a b at worst
                
                   I took her for comp and rhetoric. She's kinda a flake, i told her i had mental problems and she passed me when i should have failed. So that was cool :) other than that she's kinda flakey.
                
                   Great teacher. Really easy to talk to and he actually cares. 
                
                   Great teacher! Very clear and very funny. I thoroughly enjoyed his course
                
                   This is a great instructor. He is very clear and if you do the reading you will be able to do decent.
                
                   Great prof, took him for shakespeare and he really made me appreciate the subject.
                
                   Very passionate about the English subject. Took him for SciFi and it was a lot of reading and discussion. Quizzes were really simple you did the reading. He's pretty fair as far as grading your essays go. I really enjoyed this class and this professor.
                
                   He's an absolute joy. I would reccommend to take him is possible
                
                   I had him for language of film during the summer and i loved it! he was awesome, but i have to say that when it was time to come and write the paper i didnt get the grade i thought it deserved. he was very excited about this class and excited to hear what we had to day. awesome teacher
                
                   Best prof at TAMUG&#63; Are you serious&#63;  You must not go to your other classes or know anything about your field.  Curley's grading system is entirely subjective.  Hope you like sucking up!
                
                   Can't believe the good ratings. IMHO, talks down to students like they're stupid.  Entertains instead of educates. Grading criteria not clear at all--very personality dependent (do you suck up&#63;). More interested in you liking him than teaching substance. Loser. (I did get a good grade.)
                
                   GREAT CURRICULUM, GREAT TEACHER. YOU WILL LEARN AND ENJOY AT THE SAME TIME!
                
                   I LOVE DR. CURLEY!  he is such a great teacher, if not the best at TAMUG.  i graduated in 2002, and i was bummed that i didn't take more classes with him.  he's so funny and really seems to love to teach.  he relates to his students well, and is demanding, but fair.  i like the way he does his tests.
                
                   Loved this class!
                
                   I LOVE DR. CURLEY.
                
                   Took Dr Curley for as many english classes as I could-Lit of the Sea, Comp &amp; Rhet, etc-he makes class fun, even playing guitar and singing sea chanties.  He lets you establish your own writing style, but with guidance on what is acceptable in the professional world-I would HIGHLY recommend his classes
                
                   i loved dr. curley!!! he is such a great prof, and is always willing to help you. great man in &amp; out of the classroom. i highly reccomend him!
                
                   He made the class fun and enjoyable. Dr. Curley is a wonderful prof.
                
                   Makes Shakespeare easy to understand!
                
                   I really enjoyed this professor.  You must do the journel assignments before hand or he will throw you out class.  Same thing with the readings.  But if you get pass this, Connely is a lively teacher that you can learn a lot from
                
                   i did not like this professor at all
                
                   Be prepared when you walk in his classroom because he likes to randomly call on his students.
                
                   He is the most connected prof. ever. He knows how to be funny and still be boss, he knows how to teach, but still let you learn on your own. He knows what the real world calls for and makes sure that you are prepared.
                
                   He is a very good teacher. He will help you when you need it.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This professor is smart, and will let you know he has paid his dues.  However, he adapts his class to best benefit his students.  I would recommend him.
                
                   If you attend every class (no excuses accepted) he will give you an automatic 100% on your final and you won't have to take it. He does grade quite hard but make sure you talk to him about why he corrected the paper the way he did. Semi difficult but you can get a B at least if you follow what he says.
                
                   This professor was awful! I strongly advice anyone and everyone to NOT take him if at all possible. He is rude, arrogant and egotistical.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   too much busy work and quizes over material i couldnt care less about.  graded the final paper extremely hard.  i got all As on every paper but ended up with a B because he said that overall he wasnt thrilled with the class.  i dont care how the class did, i know i did well.
                
                   This guy knows his stuff.  I learned a lot that I'll be able to use when I go to work. Taught us how to write all kinds of professional papers, and gave us guidelines we can use for others. A lot of assignments and (ugh) reading quizzes, but we learned! He's really eccentric, which is kinda fun.  Grades hard but not too hard. Few As, many Bs.
                
                   Dr. Irwin is the best english teacher I've ever had!!! The way he willingly opens up to the class about personal things make you want to be open in your essays. He makes the class enjoyable by not having a filter & saying just about anything while also making you think critically. Just from one semester my writing skills have immensely improved.
                
                   Dr. Irwin has been my favorite prof I've taken so far. He's been the only english teacher I've had who has actually helped me improve my writing. He's very open with the class about himself, which made me feel comfortable to open up and write more personal things about myself. I would definitely take him again.
                
                   will she ever come back&#63; Know one knows.
                
                   She will break your heart.
                
                   She's competent enough to hold a class. Although she doesn't teach grammar and god knows I needed it. Her face is brighter than a ray of sunlight so I had to look away when our eyes met but it's hard not to admire the intensity of the crinkles in her forehead when she argued her implacable position. She has a cute little tush. I made a B+.
                
                   I took her UHCL WRIT 3037 for upper level writing. She is only the coolest teacher and she does not like food in her classroom. She does get off topic but she is fun to learn from. She really helps you guide your essay but she does not help you with grammar errors bc it is upper lever writing so you better know your grammar before. I got a B+
                
                   I took her UHCL for upper level writing. She is only the coolest teacher and she does not like food in her classroom. She does get off topic but she is fun to learn from. She really helps you guide your essay but she does not help you with grammar errors bc it is upper lever writing so you better know your grammar before. I got a B+
                
                   I didn't learn anything in this class.  I felt like she was making us write at a 3rd grade level.
                
                   She gets off topic way to easily and if we ever get off topic she will go crazy. Sometimes you just want to slap the bit** out of her becuase of how she acts. She can be extemly immature at times.  It is cool because she can make you laugh, but normally your laughing at her going off on another student for no reason. She loves argueing to the death
                
                   Very cool teacher!!!
                
                   I enjoyed taking her course. She will def make you laugh. The only thing that I didnt like was we got off topic quite a few times and it became pointless to be there. But overall she was a great professor who expanded my knowledge of poetry.
                
                   great teacher! really fun and enthusiastic--makes papers have broad range of possibilities!
                
                   Lets you revise papers for a better grade but gives practically useless guidelines and regularly forgets which class he told what.  Tries to keep class interested with dirty old man jokes, some of which are humorous while others are disturbing.  Mandatory online section so you must judge your peers ideas.  Leads to a bunch of useless info to sieve.
                
                   Annoying. But you will make a good grade. He lets you revise your papers.
                
                   Made me look forward to coming to class! Not that hard of a class, but make sure to participate! If he knows you're name you'll do better in the class.  Miss 3 classes or less and you don't have to take the TAKE HOME final :-)  Deff take Vic if you can!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   AWESOME PROF
                
                   No Comments
                
                   breakin social boundries one step at a time
                
                   was awesome in comp and rhetoric. Very interesting...non-boring class. But you must get your work done. no slackers. Likes short awesome papers, rather than long drawn out ones. Have fun if you get in his class.
                
                   I took Penuel for eng 101 and he made the class interesting. I also took him for world lit and he man knows his stuff. He really wants you to learn but more important he wants you to learn to think for yourself and clearly express your ideas.
                
                   If you enjoy sitting and listening to this man ramble about his atheistic beliefs, then this class is perfect for you. He talks way too much and all of his content relates back to religion, which he doesn't believe in, therefore he shouldn't have anything to say about religion. He also thinks being an Aggie is a joke,  HE TEACHES AT AN A&M SCHOOL.
                
                   He makes class lively and interesting. Very nice. Pay attention and engage in discussion. MUST SHOW UP EVERYDAY. Put your best effort into both essays, you will do fine.
                
                   This class is pretty easy to pass. It is just two papers all semester, but you have to attend every class for the participation grade and he talks A LOT, all lesson. However, he is a nice guy and it is an easy pass if you show up.
                
                   Even at the end of the semester I did't know how he graded or what he was looking for in our papers. I asked him for help several times but that was't helpful because he isn't clear. Unless you ask him a specific question he isn't much help.
                
                   Professor Theis was a little confusing on when things were due, his syllabus was changed multiple times. If you need help he is always there. My papers were all graded pretty fair. He drove me crazy just because the only way you will know when things are due is to go to class and he will update the syllabus. I wouldn't mind him again.
                
                   HORRIBLE professor! He will sort of tell  you what he wants and grade you completely different. Never got a grade higher than a C. Only one person has earned an A paper all semester.
                
                   He was a nice guy, I took his Summer II session. We had a few essays and some text book reading. He was very eager to help kids with their essays. I thought the class was easy but I usually do well in English classes. I would definitely take him again. Just make sure to give liberal opinions on essays or you will get lower grades.
                
                   Basically if you write about the things he says in class-especially his opinions of the topics-he will mark you higher. Write what you think he wants to read and follow his prompt and you will do fine even if writing isn't your strong suit.
                
                   This guy is awesome. The quality teacher you get a couple times in public school, if your lucky. Take his class. I got a C, but not because of anything to do with him.
                
                   Theis is a good teacher overall, not really prepared for class, and most of the time you talk about what was assigned the class before. He is the type of teacher that will mark off the most random errors, which aren't really wrong. Overall, he just tries to make it look like something is wrong with your essay.
                
                   He's very easy if you know how to type an essay correctly. He basically tells you how to write the essay, gives you all of the key information. All you have to do is make sure you know how to write a good solid research essay. If you can cite correctly, you are set for his class. He trails off a little, but who cares as long as you make the A.
                
                   Lectures are almost pointless because she goes through the book (which you should have already read) & reads her assigmts (which you can find on BB). There are 4 assigmts through the semester (1 being a group assign). None of these papers are difficult but she grades based on her opinion instead of what the book teaches.
                
                   She is snooty and rude. If she does not like you she will grade your documents harder than everyone else's. If you do end up with her, go to class, you can get extra points from this.
                
                   Very cool teacher, but going to class tends to be pointless, she grades essays pretty toughly but if you put a ton of effort into the 4 essays you must write and the online assignments its still possible to get a good grade
                
                   A fun teacher once you get her talking.  I'd recommend her class to people.
                
                   She's alright. She isn't bad at what she does, but I just didn't like her, ended up dropping the class the first week. Reasons: was rude, audacious, a feminist, high and mighty, snooty.
                
                   I learned a lot from her. The books she chose for the class were very helpful. No final, but  we wrote about 4 essays throughout the semester. I think her grading was reasonable and fair. Lots of online quizzes but they really aren't too difficult, just take the 15 minutes to read the chapter.
                
                   The worst professor you can ever have, EVER!!! She is soo picky, gives little detail on how assignments, and her grading is horrible!!! Everyone in class was lost and soo upset at her!! DO NOT TAKE HER EVER!!!!!
                
                   Hybrid class. A great class. It's an easy class that you learn in. Lectures are interesting. In class fun group projects. Allows revising of assignments for credit. Online quizzes & discussions are easy. Absences are excused if you give her letter with reason. She's willing to help and goes out of her way. I highly recommend.
                
                   She's a very cool lady! She allows you to revise essays during a one week period after they are given back. She makes things interesting and tries to keep everyone in the conversation. Attendance is a must! If you miss more than six times you might as well drop the class.
                
                   Easy class you are required to do 4 papers which you can all revise and 1 research paper. You can have only 6 unexcused absences
                
                   Fun and Exciting! Very little grammer deals!!!
                
                   one of the most boring classes and professors on campus
                
                   AWESOME PROF!  COOL LADY!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   very helpful and extremely nice.
                
                   Professor Acuff is a wonderful teacher!  I learned a great deal from her tech writing class.  At first, I thought that I was going to be overwhelmed, but I ended up doing very well.  Much better than some of the other english profs!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very nice, and very sweet.  But, the class isn't as clear as it could be.  There is just a bit too much work (especially if you are taking a full-time class load).
                
                   We read some great books and poems! One of the poetry assignments was an essay about a favorite song, which I liked a lot. I've never thought of myself as an "English person" but her class was fun, and we discussed some interesting social issues. She was very helpful with writing assignments. I'd definitely take another literature class of hers.
                
                   Grades solely off of tests horrible avoid at all costs.
                
                   I really liked Dr. Briones. She picked interesting novels to discuss in class. She made connections to today's society with the novels she chose and exposed different stereotypes and prejudices. Discussions were always interesting and thought-provoking. Quizzes on the reading were not multiple choice and the questions were critical thinking.
                
                   Wonderful teacher
                
                   great professor although she is a tough essay grader she will read your rough draft if you go to her and that helped me alot....gives alot of essays and journals but overall pretty easy
                
                   Hm this class was alright all you did was read two essays over it and write a one page journal over it. she graded essays pretty fairly but if you want to ask her about it just don't go to her face to face she can be pretty brutal &gt;_&gt; just email for her opinion instead.
                
                   also ENG 2302    Very smart older woman who tells it like it is.  Also is very respectful to all students
                
                   Great. Enjoyed her class.
                
                   Great, really enjoyed her class.
                
                   Great teacher - awesome person.
                
                   Great, fair professor.
                
                   Awesome Teacher!!
                
                   What bore... This was the worst class ever.  If you believe some people shouldn't teach, this is a prime example.  She makes you feel like a child, and I don't see how you learn anything here.
                
                   all u do is watch movies then write papers on them using the quest cylce, the quizzes are hard but i failed them and still got a B. this is a very good teacher with easy work...defintely take her..just make sure u go to hoggie aces to edit your papers and you wil make an A
                
                   Probably the finest human being in the world.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   A few essays and quizzes. Stress free class
                
                   She is very interesting. We do a total of 4 essays and she grades fairly and not hard. Topics can range on difficulty but she is really there to help you and make a good grade.
                
                   So, I'm not sure if it was because she was thrown into the class at the last minute, but this class was extremely easy. I felt like I wouldn't give my best effort in the assignments and I would still get praised. She's super funny and sarcastic, so don't take her if you don't know dry humor. She's a great writer and you can learn a lot from her.
                
                   Amazing professor! 
                
                   Took her because it was a requirement and got a C. I'm a straight-A student most times and this class was hard. She's very particular with her work and wants specific things but yet won't ask for them in the instructions. If you're taking her online, go to her hybrid classes; you won't get clear instructions from the notes. Take her if you HAVE TO.
                
                   Graded way too hard! I didn't enjoy this class at all...I went for help and advice which was ok but still not enough to pass the class. 
                
                   she grades tough but she does explain her reasoning. she is passionate about her field and very down to earth. she is encouraging but does have high expectations. she notes on your specific progresses. like i said, it is not an easy class and there will be lots of writing so i suggest Downs only for those who love this subject
                
                   She's interesting, but I didn't understand her class at all. If she could communicate her expectations and assignments better, she'd be a good professor.
                
                   Negative comments below are obviously from a student who paid no attention, She is a great professor! Really unique, and wants student to succeed. If you care about your grade so does she! State your honest opinion & also engage in class participation. She will gladly listen, & will comment on papers & make you feel proud! Strongly suggested.
                
                   Hated going to the class, I would do all my papers and turn everything in and passed the final and I still got an F. Se grades really hard, and is just pain weird. Don't ever take her!!
                
                   Dr. Downs is a wonderful teacher. She is so down to earth and not concerned with image.  Smart and interesting. She is very earthy and and an overall wonderful person. This is the second class I have had her for and I really like her.  She does grade hard, but do your work and you will be fine.
                
                   this lady was really something else I came to class everyday, did every assignment and turned them in on time, did pretty good on the final and she gave me an &quot;F&quot;
                
                   she's ok.  she focuses more on the novel section because that is what she is good at.  not very good at the poetry part.  basically give your opinion on whatever you read and you will do ok.
                
                   You could do better
                
                   Under no condition take her.
                
                   Please dont take her--a waste of time and she prides herself on being called a teacher's teacher.  Nopersonality, cold, icey cold--brrrr
                
                   This class is very difficult subject. I do not recommend this class because she did not explain well. You need to take the other teacher.
                
                   she needs to find other job because she does not have patience. She has alot bitterness and lonelines. Probably she needs a good husband. Good luck! Mrs. Down I hope your life changes someday.
                
                   Great English professor. First time my essay topics are interesting and beneficial for a writing course. Essays take some time to write as shortest is around 4 pages, some homework, but overall great! If making a grade you're unsure of - ask what you need to change, he will help. 
                
                   I took her for ENGL 1301-1302 she is super easy! Highly recommend her. She does not give test. You have 4 papers during the semester the first one usually really simple. You work on most of the paper in class (step by step to writing papers) Recommend taking final drafts to writing center before turning in
                
                   She should have retired many years ago--avoid at all cost.
                
                   The class is mostly busy work.  It's pretty easy.  She does like to pile on the work though.
                
                   This class was primarily based on group work...so when your group doesn't show up for class, your pretty much screwed. She tries to help you out as much as possible but it still takes its toll on your overall average. I would definitely recommend a class with more independent work.
                
                   Tough class!  Dr. Halford doesn't hand you anything on a silver platter -- but she is really great!
                
                   Unorganized...Fell behind on the syllabus...Very Confusing
                
                   This teacher is much like Escargot. An acquired taste. Just be sure to ask as many questions as possible about the writing assignments.
                
                   He was very rude and unprofessional towards all students, but he seemed even more so to me specifically. I felt personally victimized by him. He also gives a lot of writing and reading assignments.
                
                   He was very clear in what he wanted you to do. Just be aware of his sarcasm.
                
                   WORST CLASS EVER! This professor was rude and not helpful at all! If you want to pass you have to show up to class. The only good thing about this class was the fact that he didn't give exams at all. The only exam we took was the final and it was a presentation. Just expect to write a bunch of 5-10 pg papers every 2 wks.. 
                
                   Dr. Mann is not a good professor!! She only explains assignments once and never talks about it until it is due and she's a tough grader. I recommend you DO NOT take her if you're not an english major. She makes it seem like her class is the #1 priority with all the work she gives.
                
                   Really cool professor, she has a lot of energy and is always willing to help and explain class material. Keeps class interesting all the time and you can tell she's always having a great time lecturing. A must take if you want a good professor and great feedback on your papers!!!
                
                   Dr. Mann is an awesome professor full of energy that makes jokes to keep the class interesting.
                
                   Great professor! have to go to class everyday and READ chapters assigned each day, if not, lecture will be difficult and she may assign quiz's if most of class doesn't participate in lecture or didn't read. 3 essay's due throughout the semester overall not to hard at all if you pay attention in class :)
                
                   Not too hard, by the end of the class I became very interested in the topic. Thought it was pretty interesting, kept it fun with videos and jokes. I would definitely recommend.
                
                   Dr. Morse is picky. She expects thing done her way, which I don't understand how it will help me in the near future. The major grades in her class are 3 essays. 
                
                   All together a good instructor. Everything is posted in the syllabus.. He sends out reminders on blackboard so make sure you login and take a look on a daily bases. Participation is important and so is attendance. Revision on papers allowed. Always ask questions if you don't he won't know how to help.
                
                   if u go 2 class and do the work, u will be fine.
                
                   hes awesome.
                
                   yea, he's tough but he's cool. you have to read. he wants you to succeed. always ask him for help, he'll go out of his way to help. 
                
                   He is a great professor. He will read your rough draft and let you know if you are on the right track or help you find your way. Show up to class, he hates when people are absent. There is no book required but he does post reading on blackboard that you have to print out read and bring to class almost everyday. 
                
                   There's no book, he gives you the readings. Read them all! His instructions are clear as far as the papers go. You must show up (it's college you pay, you show up). He and and other students can give clear feedback on papers. You do do some presentations. B+ or higher.
                
                   Great teacher
                
                   This professor is an absolute nut.  Students with low self-esteem, those who play sports in college, and girls who like getting attention from creepy older men are the only ones who will appreciate this professor.  When I took his class, I felt like I was surrounded by members of a cult who were systematically being programmed to worship him.  Run!
                
                   This teacher was awesome! So easy if you just read and write over w/e he tells you to. Participate in class and he'll be nicer grading your paper.
                
                   I adore this teacher. He's great! He has so much to teach his students. I can't wait to take another class with him.
                
                   Although he does offer extra credit points for talking to him before class...it's not worth it. He was entertaining but he lost TWO of my papers and always contradicts himself. My writing or grammar did not improve and if I could do it over I would not take him.
                
                   You need to stop by his office to talk it will help with grade.  Keep going to see him periodically.  Do the papers!  Bring a card each day to class with notes from the required reading.  You will have to read.  But nice individual, good personality, kinda grumpy at times.  Take him!  You'll have a great time.
                
                   Extremely helpful--however, he practices tough love--a must take prof
                
                   LOOK AT THE GRAMMAR OF THE STUDENT WHO CALLED THIS TEACHER A BOZO--I'LL BET HE FAILED THE COURSE.  HIS TEMPER IS AN ACT, ANY FOOL KNOWS THAT.  HE WARNS STUDENTS OF HIS TOUGH LOVE POLICY IN THE SYLLABUS. HE'S A HOT TEACHER.  TAKE HIM.
                
                   Great teacher, caring, fair, and open classroom.  Yes, caring too.
                
                   Tough love professor--I agree students who don't work dislike him  However, most like him because he wants them to have the knowledge they need to pursue their dreams.  Don't take him if you ar not willing to work.
                
                   The best teacher ever--the only one that I learned from
                
                   I never missed a class and I still did not like this guy. He is a self-abnoxious bozo. He loses his temper alot and tries to hide it by telling a joke after it. This guy is crazy, I would NEVER recommend taking him. Register for someone elses class.
                
                   very good teacher
                
                   This will probably be the ONE professor that I will remember until I am old and gray. He is full of knowledge and loves his work. He opens up your mind to different ways of thinking of things. He is truly a great professor and human being. Plus, he is pret
                
                   Great Professor...People who hate him are the ones who usually fail his class cause they dont go. Greatest teacher i ever had! You learn so much more about yourself and the subject matter than anywhere else
                
                   He is very obnoxious. He likes to pry into your life and the constant topic in his class seemed to be about religion. He made a lot of students in class feel uncomfortable with his topics for discussion.
                
                   this class is a very great class...you not only learn about the subject area, but you also learn more about yourself
                
                   he sucked.  if you have **** or are a jock you can pass his class.  if you have your own opinion and dont agree with what he says, you shouldnt take him.
                
                   Awesome guy!  This is not like any other english class, you definitely learn alot about life and relationships.  He is easy to talk to, and very helpful...he actually wants students to do well!  Definitely take this class with him, you won't regret it!
                
                   He is super nice and willing to help if you are falling behind. I learned a lot in his class.
                
                   Rather straight forward lit teacher. Clear expectations and assignments. Knowledgeable.
                
                   Gives 5 EC points for perfect attendance and 5 EC for attending a live drama/ performance. She is a tough grader but you learn how to write better. She doesn't tell you how to write but as most college students SHOULD do- you learn from your mistakes. All grades come from your essays, 2 exams, and 1 easy group project. (3 books needed=$70 total)
                
                   Great teacher! Loves what she does for a living and it shows. You actually learn from her. If you're not in class, it will severely hurt your grade and your education as a whole. I feel smarter now. Worth the effort. Not an easy A class, but still a good class.
                
                   Good looker, but definitely NOT a hot teacher.  Beware students--avoid her
                
                   Improvement needed
                
                   She is a really sweet lady, and she knows and loves the topic that she teaches. You get your money's worth with her, which means that you do have to do your part and put in effort. Don't take her if you want &quot;an easy A&quot;.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   What a fine lady! She is a very vocal feminist, so be prepared! However, she is really clear, and with a little effort, you can easily pull an 'A.'
                
                   Dr. Richard is a pretty good english teacher, but he assigns too much work. He expects alot from his students and drives down on them hard. Although he is a hard teacher you will learn alot from him.
                
                   You have to read a little and do a few problems out of your book. Expect 4-5 essays that are quite easy to write. Very down to earth teacher and is very funny. Would defiantly take the class again. 
                
                   Has 4 major essays in the semester, each increasing in percentage of semester grade 10, 15, 20, and 25. Super chill class, most of the time we talk about movies and comic books.
                
                   Great professor overall
                
                   Great Professor, I do not enjoy reading much because I am very busy, but she makes the books so interesting and its really helpful because during class she explains the books and makes everything so interesting, actually making you want to read! Love her! will take her again if I need to 
                
                   I have  had miss tucker for 3 classes and she is by far an amazing teacher you will learn a lot and she never has test just little journal entries.
                
                   I've taken Dr. Tucker for about 3 upper-level English classes. I've made A's in each one. She facilitates class discussions, and doesn't "talk at you," so you have to put effort into the class. Directions can get a bit unclear, but she is always happy to clear up any confusion,if you just ask!If you are lazy or don't like to think, don't take her.
                
                   Tucker is a really good professor. I took her for 1302 and 2342. I must admit her class may sound tough in the beginning, but it will be worth it in the end. I dont enjoy any type of reading class, but Tucker's class was probably the best class i have had in the past 2 years. Take her, you wont regret it.
                
                   I've taken Dr Tucker twice, 4000 level courses. Her quizzes, response papers, and class assignments are easy. Her term papers are another question. Both classes i had also included graduate students. Wonderful professor with a sense of humor. Just DON'T be LATE. it didn't matter how many A's i got, if you rack up tardies or absences, it'll show.
                
                   Wonderful teacher!! She gives you the oppurtunity to use your own eperiences to write about and to be quite honest they are usually personal subjects but writing these papers really helped me deal with them. She was the best professor that I have ever had!! Highly recommended!
                
                   She was amazing my favorite professor ever! She doesn't like grammer and will not teach it but by now we should understand how to use periods and commas.
                
                   Absolutely my favorite professor. I've taken her for ALL my English classes. Participation is a MUST!
                
                   The class has an awkward vibe.. the professor stares at us as if we are idiots! Most of the time. She is funny though and has her head in the clouds from time to time. You can't be late to class! Not even thirty seconds without getting the evil eye!:/ So remember your life depends on attendence! Oh and her writing topics are VERY vague!
                
                   May be a better professor teaching something else. She hated grammar & had no will to teach it. We had to read the book to try to learn it for homework & if we had questions, we would go over them next class. Very little lecturing. Wants you to talk out loud in class. Quizzes are harder than the examples in the book. She had her bad mood days too.
                
                   While there is a lot of reading, if you are honest and up front with him then he will help you in the best way he can. He is very approachable and has great class discussions if you allow it.
                
                   Great professor, awesome sense of humor. Good class discussion depending on who's attending. A good all-around teacher--who actually teaches.
                
                   Easy class if you want a quick A.I took his class in both 1301 and 1302 and it went fine.
                
                   Great in-class discussions. Gives everyone a chance to contribute. Occasional quizzes are pulled straight from the novels; tests are about concepts discussed in class about the book.  Its a fun class you'll learn in.  He's a cool guy too.  Intelligent but not intimidating.  The best kind of English prof.
                
                   Easy professor to take, but I don't think I learned very much. Disorganized in class, enjoys it when students speak out loud, and vague on course work expectations. Uses group work and essay tests. Didn?t teach with the same vigor as other professors, thus I felt less enthusiastic to go to his class. Recommended if you want an easy A.
                
                   I'm not an english major, and i was afraid to take it due to it being a Poetry/Novels based class. he gave us quizes every other day & does alot of inclass discussions on readings. I ended up loving the class. Aced my major exams that i forgot to turn in one major assignment but becuz of my grades i sustained an A easily. Badass professor to boot
                
                   He?s the best. Really cool teacher. Helps out a lot and I would recommend him.You will learn something from him.
                
                   Extremely helpful. Very knowledgeable over subject matter
                
                   loved her!
                
                   i think that he is a fine educater and a fine human being and very attractive.
                
                   Very helpful in learning how to write. Good instructor if you can't write. Gave ideas on how to. Always helpful if you need him. Good instructor for someone who can't write.
                
                   Class with this professor was very intresting to say the least. He knows his stuff, and when it comes test time, you better know yours.
                
                   You Rock!
                
                   Makes learning fun!
                
                   Dr. Bliss is a tough grader, but she is more than willing to help you polish your work. She relies on class participation and group discussions for daily assignments. My biggest complaint was that she did not actively keep you posted on your grades, so it was hard to know where you stood. The readings assigned are long- welcome to college. :)
                
                   VERY hard grader! she does not post your course grade at all during the semester, you have to go to her office to find out what you have....   Lots of reading, expects everyone to engage in class discussions. 
                
                   funny and really nice.  As far as the class, there is A LOT of writing involved.  She is very specific on her writing assignments so if you don't write exactly what she is asking for, you're screwed. She expects lots of writing based on a specific questionopinionpassage. Can be overwhelming. Be prepared to analyze everything you read and write.
                
                   She is an okay person, but I wouldn't take her for a class again. I tried too hard and earned a C in the course. I don't feel there was much connection with this prof. If you don't connect with her, do not take.
                
                   Dr. Bliss is super awesome:)  She knows her stuff & is so nice & pleasant.  I love her accent.  She is always willing to help & encourages students to ask for help from her.  She is very smart & has fun classes!  I hate when her class is over at the end of the semester.
                
                   Dr. Bliss is what is expected of an English professor. She is a delightful person as well as a challenge. She does tend to gravitate towards the mechanics of writing more than individual thought, and even with that it is done in a manner you still absorb everything discussed. Literature was good, and assignments were fair. All in all it was great.
                
                   Great professor! Very thorough and informative. She is very helpful, and really pushes her students to bring their best. She gives lengthy, helpful feedback on papers and stimulates deep-thinking and analysis in her discussions. Be prepared to work in her classes.
                
                   Good teacher. She explains all class materials clearly and expects all students to participate in class discussions.  If you are looking to get a thorough examination of a specific class, take Dr. Bliss.
                
                   Dr. Castillo is a great professor. He is motivational and makes the class fun!  I have taken him 2 different times and would do it again. 
                
                   Excellent lectures, interesting topics and difficult but managable assignments. Strickler for detail, thesis development, and well-thought-out papers.
                
                   Great professor whose skills in making difficult subject easy to understand. All his books are useful and inexpensive.
                
                   Difficult subject, interesting professor. Lectures were not drawn out, small group discussions, research questions, and MLA format essays. Some inclass essays. Professor is well-versed in field and his lectures are not boring. Task-master, though.
                
                   A great professor!
                
                   Class wes never boring. it was alsways interesting. keeped you in your seat.Standard MLA style papers. if you do the read and what he says you can pass the tests.Class never went into over time always let out early. Class was great. he needs to teach more english classes.
                
                   Instructor was interesting, on task, and well-prepared for class. His lectures are extremely interesting and go beyond the text. His papers require heavy research, MLA style nitpicking, and well-argued. Edit your papers for this class carefully. On than that, I enjoyed the class and learned alot. I definitely would take this professor again.
                
                   She assigns a lot of reading, makes you participate in class, and expects you to be as enthusiastic as her. She'll help you if you ask for help but sometimes blows you off, taking forever to respond to emails. Assignment descriptions are vague which makes things confusing. If you read, go to class, and say a few things each class you will do ok. 
                
                   a very good teacher. Cares about the material she provides in comp class very much. Encourages students to be engaged and to have an inquisitive mind. Is always willing to meet with students when they need help with an assignment or any other concerns about the class. However isn't always clear on guidelines for certain assignments 
                
                   very nice lady. She is willing to help out and is organized. Problem is that she assigned TONS and TONS of reading. Also assigns hard assignments like reading boring and hard to comprehend articles and write about them.  be sure to like group projects and interact in class discussions. You dont have a choice becasue she will call on you to answer!!
                
                   Dr. Brown is top-notch-- there is no one better. She is dilligent, organized, engaging, and talented. She is meant for higher education. I took 4 courses with her and was always challenged. Her courses are tough! I've never had tougher-and you'll seek her TAMUSA proud!
                
                   Dr. Brown is easily my favorite person on the planet. Her teaching style is structured and organized and she encourages you to take risks with essays. She is incredibly challenging and very overwhelming, but completely worth it. If you don't take a Dr. Brown class as an English major, you aren't really an English major at A&M San Antonio.
                
                   Great professor. There is absolutely nothing negative I could think about her class or her teaching methods. Everyone I know who has taken her before tells me that I HAVE to take one of her classes. So I did. Everyone was right. Great professor.
                
                   Don't think for one second that this is an easy class. Writing and Reading HEAVY! She does explain, give examples, and let you work with groups to better get the point. However, unless you are an English major, I wouldn't advise this class. I am struggling...
                
                   Dr. Brown is an excellent instructor.  She takes the time to give, detailed, constructive feedback for all papers and assignments.  This information is invaluable when working on improving writing skills.  I would take her class again in a second.
                
                   Dr. Brown is a perfect example of how a Professor should run a classroom. She not only lectures ,but she models what she expects of her students. She is also very encouraging and can make anyone fall in love with literature.Fun class.
                
                   What a great instructor!  I really enjoyed her class. Anyone who wants to improve their analytical writing skills should take her.
                
                   Her grading when it comes to papers is a little tough, but it made me into a better writer now that I've had her a few times. Her lectures are easy to follow. And she's able to pull out the ideas in your head during these lectures. These ideas often become the basis for papers and before you know it, you've got a good idea to work with.
                
                   Dr. Gillen is one of the sweetest professors I have had. She knows exactly what she is talking about in the area she is teaching. Her voice is really soft, sweet, and easy to listen too. Make sure you have internet access for Blackboard access. You will post here quite often. 2 Tests. Also, she is one of the cutest professors I have ever seen 3
                
                   She is very nice, not hard at all.   Although what I was hoping for in the class is to learn from the Professor, not the students. The class is basically the students saying what they think or interpret of the play. But I would rather listen to more of the Professor. 
                
                   Dr. Gillen us a wonderful professor. She's encouraging and helpful and willing to negotiate when having a difficult time on specific topics. She still expects your best  but is willing to give some leniency if the situation calls for it.
                
                   Shes pretty and very young. Shes also really nice, shes always available if you need help, answers her emails promptly, and is willing to work with you in order to improve your essays. Her class has a relax atmosphere, not intimidating at all which makes her very easy to talk to. I liked her as a professor and would definitely recommend her.
                
                   Misty Popovich was a HORRIBLE professor.  The worst I've ever had. Do not take her class. She promises feedback but doesn't deliver. She speaks of required readings but doesn't post them. She is disorganized & doesn't seem to care for her students or their success.
                
                   I took her online class, it requires a lot of writing but it is an english class. She was pretty helpful, I'm in no way a good writer but she offered several opportunities to improve my writing. I would take her again.
                
                   I took this course online because I do not have the time to attend during the week and I also took a total of 6 classes. She kept trying to get me to go into the writing lab because my paper needed work.  I submitted papers to my other professors in the exact format but got better grades from them, than from her.
                
                   I had taken her for a class before and really enjoyed it a lot. But this semester was horriable. It is an easy class but DO NOT expect her to return e-mails or update on announcements if you take her on-line. She is really bad about being avaliable for students.
                
                   Communication for online classes could be better. She's not necessarily an easy grader, but I think she could provide more feedback/input on papers written. Cut and dry course. You read the book, write a paper, and post a discussion about it. She also could have prompted more discussions and participated in the class discussions.
                
                   she teaches online classes only. the class i took with her, she kept forgetting about and would post grades weeks after she said they would be posted. she doesnt respond to emails sent over blackboard, and she doesnt andwer questions posted on the discussion board.
                
                   She was a sweet lady and had some interesting stories but none of them ever applied to the lesson she was supposed to be teaching. I enjoyed the class, but I was no learning what we were supposed to be learning. We would have gotten an A if it was a class on her stories.
                
                   She is a boring teacher but she's also funny and understanding.She isn't very clear on how she wants the assignments to be done but she gives chances to redo papers and doesn't take off alot of points on late papers. Many of my late papers I belive deserved B- or  C's but she was  very nice to give me A- 's on my many late papers.
                
                   Boring and likes her plans done her way or no way!
                
                   She is pretty boring.. But it's an easy class, not too long of papers, and you have to perform a skit. No big deal but she is extremely boring! She is very considerate about her students though, nice lady just can't get my attention for long
                
                   AWESOME teacher!! I would take her for every class if I could! She is very helpful and engages the class in her lectures. She also is a very fair and helpful teacher. She truly wants her students to succeed!
                
                   Reyes is very knowledgeable. She has some great insight about life in general. As an instructor, she can at times be confusing and one may get unengaged in her lectures because all she does is talk and maybe draw a few pictures on the board. However she is teaching college, and students at this level shouldn't need to be entertained.
                
                   No tests in the class. There are 3 essays that make up 75% of the material. They are scaled with time so the first one is 15%, second one 25%, third one is 35%. She does less than 10-15 minutes of "lecture" per class. Every class is an open discussion with the class divided in groups. She maintains the discussions on point well. Essays are tough.
                
                   I never thought that a World War I Poetry class could be so fascinating but Dr. Ross was well versed in the subject. Keen on knowing the subject, Dr. Ross has proven to be a very noteworthy professor that I would advise any student of English to take.
                
                   Very difficult teacher. Took his Brit Lit II class online and he offered very little guidance. Assigned over 100 pages of reading each week which is highly unnecessary. Nitpicks when grading and his comments were not very constructive.Often came off as smug and rude in  his communication as well.He seemed not to care about this online class. Avoid!
                
                   I took Dr. Ross for psycholinguistics and now have him for another class. He does like to assign multiple books and expects them to be read in their entirety. However, if you want someone well versed on their topics and wish to actually learn HE IS THE GUY TO SEE!
                
                   Dr. Santos-Sopena gives very good feedback, but expect homework and class participation. He is respected by students. Excellent class dynamics!
                
                   Dr. Santos-Sopena was an excellent teacher and could always answer any questions asked; Highly recommended. Great motivation!
                
                   Class is fairly easy if you do the reading and turn in the homework. The papers are the hardest part but if you're specific and write academically you'll do fine on them.
                
                   Vinson is BY FAR the best professor i have ever had at TAMUK. Took her for both English 1301 & 02 & will be taking her AGAIN for literature. We did about 6 essays in each class but it is definitely easier than it sounds. All essays are group essays which makes it SO much easier! I recommend anybody that needs English to take her, you wont regret it
                
                   This professor is one of the most caring, and loving people that I have ever met at this university. She is seriously the best. She will crack a few jokes on the daily to break the ice or to simply make her students feel comfortable. Her material is simple and clear to understand. 12/10 would recommend!
                
                   awesome
                
                   She uses a "step by sep" method of teachng that other teachers do not do at all. She gave me the confidence to know that I was able to do a research paper correctly after taking this course several times with other professors. Proud to have her as my teacher!!!
                
                   This lady is by far the sweetest and most inspirational woman I have ever laid eyes on. She's so influential and helps you challenge your enter voice. I really enjoyed her class and the way she takes a back seat and let the students teach the class and helps us understand everything. Also she is very fashionable, and rocks bad azz purses
                
                   BY far my favorite teacher here at TAMUK! She sets goals for you that can be met but challenges you as well. For incoming freshman you will not regret starting off your year will the best professor hands down!!!
                
                   best professor I have had at TAMUK!!
                
                   THE BEST TEACHER IN ENGLISH 1301! alot of group work...total of 7 essays but 4 of them you do in a group and the other 3 are personal experiences about your self! She is very nice and very helpful...right now i have a 108 in her class!!!!(: Her midterm and final is easy and simple! she makes english 1301 so much fun!!!!
                
                   Without a doubt my favorite professor ever. She is simply wonderful. Hilarious, kind, helpful, and challenging, with the ability to take texts (in my case, those of Jane Austen) and bring them to life. We talked about books, films, pop culture, and everything in between. MAOF was a huge influence in my decision to pursue English in grad school.
                
                   Do not take her class !!!! She is extremely rude and very hard when it comes to grading. She never gave a straight answer and was very discouraging.
                
                   Was not sure what to expect taking this class, however, I enjoyed it immensely! For an 8 week class be prepared to do work every other day. He does not demand a lot. He does have expectations and provides ways to meet them. If they are followed you will be successful.
                
                   I make it a point to take every class I can from Dr. Redmon. He is quite possibly the best English professor at this school (at least one of the best!) He will bend over backwards to help you if you feel you are struggling. He is not an easy professor, but I have grown so much in his classes. I HIGHLY RECOMMEND taking any and all classes with him!
                
                   Dr. Redmon is by far the best English professor I have ever had.  He requires that you actually put thought into essays and reading.  Any of Dr. Redmon's classes will prepare you for higher level thinking.  He treats his students as professionals and values their input.  NOT AN EASY "A!"  When you get a good grade in his class you EARNED IT!
                
                   If you are sloppy, can't turn things in on-time, and you can't follow directions, run away because he will hold you accountable. If you want to be challenged and you want to be pushed beyond your comfort zone, this is the right professor for you. He is in no way easy. This was the hardest  "B" I've ever earned, but I am better off after his class.
                
                   Dr. Redmon is an amazing professor. His classes make you learn. I have come to see things that I had never even considered existed before just because of the insight he brings to class. He loves what he does and it makes all the difference in his teaching.
                
                   You really do have to work hard to get a great grade but Redmon is awesome. He is helpful in many ways. His teaching philosophy is to engage and Redmon follows to the T.
                
                   I will not say that Dr. Redmon is an easy prof.  You have to really work for every grade you get.  And the work is not something you can just mindlessly do, he really makes you think.  But I have to say even though he was probably the toughest prof I had here, he was also probably my favorite.
                
                   I have taken several classes with Dr. Redmon and I would recommend him to anyone that is looking for a professor that cares about what he is teaching and is available to help when needed. He isn't always clear but is willing to sit down and help you get to the grade you want. You have to work in this class!
                
                   He IS different, but he's also very educated in his field; will make your work for the grade, after all your final grade is reflective of the work you put into it. He is very helpful, only need to ask when clarification is needed. This is University level, not kindergarten, so expect to work for it. Highly recommend Dr. Redmon
                
                   Easy class if you buddy up with him in the beginning. Comes off as an egotistical narcissist, but he does know his stuff. Would have still taken a different professor if I could do it over again.
                
                   Class is very useful.  Lots of work but if you apply yourself to every assignment you'll make a good grade.
                
                   If you are willing to put in the effort you will find his classes rewarding. Otherwise, don't bother. Dr. Redmon is willing to listen to alternate viewpoints on a subject and his classes can be great fun if you have familiarized yourself with the material and can offer meaningful input into the conversation at hand. I highly recommend him.
                
                   I am in two of his classes right now, plan to take more. Dr. Redmon is a great teacher, very abstract. He likes to hear input and is open to ideas. Also, he does REVISIONS on papers and even test, if there were low grades. A thing to keep in mind is READ cause he will know if you don't. Overall, if you do the work, you will pass his classes.
                
                   Confusing grading system and offers no help. AVOID AT ALL COST IF YOU NEED TO TAKE TECHNICAL WRITING
                
                   He is a great teacher. Don't excpect a lecture though. His class is like a book club but the good news is that as long as you have textual support there is NO wrong answer. He is open minded and gets you to open your mind to the different veiws and meanings of each piece of leturature you read. A lot of reading a writting but not hard.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She is an awful professor!  She is very unclear on her expectations and does not grade assignments in a timely fashion, which results in students not knowing where they stand in the class, or what to improve on.  Avoid her if you can!
                
                   Not clear in her assignments. Still has not answered an email over two weeks ago. Makes excuses for her lateness. Worst Professor I have taken at TAMUCT. She don't seem very pleasant when answering what emails she does answers or when she grades papers. Still waiting on grades from 10 weeks ago. Never take her. 
                
                   This professor is very unclear. She expects you to pretty much be a mind reader as to what she wants done in class. She  doesn't answer emails very quickly and when she does answer she has an unpleasant tone. She doesn't grade your assignments in a timely manner either, but she expects them turned in on time.  She doesn't follow her own syllabus. 
                
                   she does not respond to your messages. there are very few graded assignments and they are all confusing
                
                   I just took the final, and still do not have any idea how I'm doing in the class. I haven't received grades on my major project turned in around mid-semester. The tutorials assigned taught me a grade deal, but not knowing how I was doing made it difficult to ascertain if I was understanding the material fully. 
                
                   I would recommend Dr. Miles. We had no quizzesexams this semester, it is all about writing. She gives great assignments that will improve your writing. She even allows for revisions and resubmission of some assignments, which we get plenty of time to complete. Expect a good amount of groupclass projects but it is never dull. 
                
                   I thought this class was pretty distasteful. She never grades ANYTHING. Midterms were not graded until finals week, which makes it impossible to know how you are doing in the class. The 15 page research paper sounds harder than it is. She is an easy A, but  I would skip her altogether because I was banging my head against the wall all semester.
                
                   I learnt a lot from this class. The professor does come across arrogant through. She is extremely harsh when criticizing your work.  I mean, who tells someone that the organization they worked for previously has an awkward name?  If your grammar and punctuation are not brushed up I would skip this class., as that may be enough to make you fail.
                
                   This professor comes off as arrogant.  Rarely responds to emails.
                
                   Makes little to no effort to help students. Uses trivial grading system such as 'Peer Reviews' so she has to do less work. Has minimal understanding of Blackboard and doesn't utilize it effectively. Forgets her job as a teacher is to TEACH. Simply awful, avoid her if you can.
                
                   I learned so much in this class! Dr. Miles is a lovely woman, with a vast array of knowledge. I also found her to very helpful, and was surprised to read that someone else said otherwise. This class is a lot of work. Be prepared. You will read a lot, write a lot, and work on a nearly semester-long project. However, you will earn great knowledge.
                
                   Dr. Miles is an accomplished, kind, dedicated, and inspiring English professor. Every time I take a class from her, I grow as a thinker and as a writer. She will work with you and treat you like a human being. Dr. Miles will ensure that you get out of your education what you are putting into it. I highly recommend taking any class from her. A++++++
                
                   Great teacher. Empathetic, clear directions, relevant and you learn a lot.
                
                   Dr. Miles is an amazing instructor! I learned far more than what the text offered in this class! Her lectures were minimal but she insisted that we do hands on work. The ending product was amazing! I advise all students at TAMUCT to take this professor. Her in class and off record advise to students is invaluable! you rock, Dr. Miles!
                
                   I absolutely recommend this professor. I wouldn't say that her class is hard, but you WILL have to work at it, and you WILL have to read the book. She is very helpful. I just wish there were more classes of hers required for my business degree. If you need this class, take it from Dr. Miles!
                
                   I also have her for ENGL 312, ENGL 412. This class is very technical and is difficult, but Dr. Miles is available and willing to help in anyway that she can. Things do tend to be hard from time to time but as long as you apply yourself the class is fine.
                
                   I wouldn't take this teacher again. She harps on being clear and concise yet all of her instructions for our online class were hard to read, had grammatical errors, and often didn't clearly outline the assignment. She is also very condescending towards students. AVOID!
                
                   Professor was amazing! You can tell Watson wants students to succeed in her class. Because our class was small, she was able to give almost all the students one-on-one time regarding most assignments. She brings new perspectives into light on political issues. Overall, one of the best English professors I've had. She is also really attractive <3
                
                   Dr. Watson is a great & passionate professor. One thing - she does bring politics into the mix often. Not a bad thing - just be prepared. Do your readings & get assignments in on time. She's fun & very smart.
                
                   Cathryn Watson is a dorky/nerdy professor who expects everyone to know what she's saying or thinking! She's a little tough when she grades the assignments, but shes a really great professor overall :)the only thing i hated was presenting in front of the class about The Alamo?! ridiculous! She gave out a lot of assignments..all papers! so good luck!
                
                   Has a knack for making even the most boring literature relatively interesting.  She is incredibly helpful as long as you make the effort to show that you need help. Her grading is kind of tough but it makes slackers want to try harder to garner her approval. I would take her again in a heartbeat.
                
                   Dr. Watson is a little disorganized but her lectures are clear. She is willing to go over what ever material is needed for the students to learn. She is a tought grader but fair and gives chances to fix problems as they arise. would reccomend this professor to anyone.
                
                   I love Dr. Watson! She's probably my favorite literature professor at A&M. Take her Multi-ethnic course and if you can, American lit. She's inspiring and makes you think thematically about literature and life itself. She's very fair.
                
                   Great class!  I'm an English major and never realized there was such a thing as &quot;ghostly matters&quot; in multi-ethnic literature.  Loved the class discussion and hope to take another class with her soon...  If you don't like literature - don't take this class!  It's probably over your head...
                
                   unorganized
                
                   Very unorganized, not very clear.  Nothing but a lot of handouts.  Doesn't really explain anything, just read the handouts to learn
                
                   I found Dr. Santos extremely clear in her expectations. Her class required constant reading as well as weekly discussions to be a part of. With each week she made it clear that she was always willing to help. I would definitely like to have her as my professor again.  
                
                   This professor is so understanding. She's sympathetic in the way she approaches everything to do with class. If one were to have complications with assignments, she is willing to work with that student to improve odds. I would take a class taught by her again. 
                
                   We had a 4-6pg paper due every week on Sunday by 5. On Thursday's student had to bring 2 copies of our draft for peer reviews, and feed back from Dr. Santos. Though attendance is not necessary, it is important to show up for peer reviews and other info. Discussion board forum posts due each week. A lot of work but it's college, don't be lazy! 
                
                   No exams, essays are graded first with a rough draft and then the next class date the final copy is due. Hard to get an A. Few opportunities for extra credit. Always something due. Grades journals which are based off of assigned readings. Attendance isn't taken.
                
                   Awesome professor, if I could I would take her again. Learned a lot from this class, that will help me in the future for use. Strongly recommend her..
                
                   Professor Okpala is a good instructor. I took his online class. He always got back to me when I had questions. He does have a life, so don't expect an unrealistic quick response. His assignments tend to be a bit vague, so read carefully. This is a COLLEGE CLASS, you will have to do work. He loves proper grammar. 
                
                   This professor offers no guidance on how he wants you to write your papers. Yes, the readings assigned are long, and you have to participate online daily to 2-3 peers. The problem with this course is that the Professor gave very little feedback for improving a paper such as "Thesis is not clear" and then offered no guidance on how to improve it.
                
                   If you don't check online often or are a couple minutes late on submitting an assignment, expect to fail. Gives no extra credit or slack. Does not accept late work, and if you have  a personal issue - wants you to use Blackboard forum post to ask him those questions.. (in front of all your classmates).
                
                   He wasn't very clear on his assignments, allowed to students to badger at one another online and didn't stop it especially when of the other students was harassing the class, only told you to refer to syllabus and good luck getting a reply back on a private email to him unless its a msg for everyone to see. work is tedious and he's no help!!  
                
                   Have no use for this professor. The only reason I took this class with him was I needed it to graduate. The professor seems to think that just because the class is online you have nothing better to do. Instructions are vague as is where to submit papers. The teacher also varies little from semester to semester. Will not take another class with him.
                
                   The assignments were not very hard but he assigns BORING readings. He also wants a long essay with 15 citations due in the end of the course. If you ask for help, he does respond but he gives very vague responses. If you are passionate and wanting to teach English then you will do great, if not then don't take it!
                
                   Jack was one of my first professors at TAMUSA. He definitely aided in my improvement as an analytical reader. His lectures were always fun, engaging and easy to contribute to if you did the readings. He also explained the more finer details so easily. I wish I had the opportunity to take more classes with him.
                
                   Dr. Ayres is one of the most organized English professors at TAMUSA.  If you are afraid of your writing skills, keep in mind that Dr. Ayres always provides detailed constructive criticism for each paper, and is open to meeting with you during office hours to discuss your work. He is respected by his students for his strong work ethic.
                
                   Awesome professor!  Class requires ALOT of reading, but the novels are very interesting.  Very few papers/projects.  Layed back and easy to talk to.  Keeps attendance but always willing to work with you.
                
                   Very knowledgeable about the subject & history. Relates course material when applicable. Easy to talk to and always willing to help. Very easy on the eyes.
                
                   Great guy and very knowledgeable. Always very happy and more than willing to help. Very handsome!
                
                   Sweetest English Professor I've ever met. Very helpful and understanding. I liked his classroom atmosphere and his teaching method. Also very handsome.
                
                   The grading is hard but he is very helpful and emails back quickly.
                
                   Excellent - very interesting, caring, and knowledgeable.
                
                   What a great person. Dr. Billings is all about learning from his students and teaches very well, but be careful, his vocab is very advanced, so keep a dictionary close by. Very positive attitude and will work with you. Trust me, I was scared to take this class, but I am glad I had him as my professor. Now I have a liking for literature thanks tohim
                
                   Best professor at A&M-Texarkana
                
                   Had him for Children's Lit. Class is a lot of work, but fun and he helps you out if you need it. Very flexible and helpful.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Course is conducted as though it is a face to face.  Not much flexibility with the mass amount of work in this class.
                
                   Mr. Joshuah O'Brien was my professor for english 1302 research and rhetoric class. He is wonderful , lovely, handsome and helpful. You need a book, expect to have pop quiz, extra credit and a lot of papers. However, it is worthy because he explains very good.
                
                   A very helpful and kind guy. I took his class for English 1301 and it was totally easy to get an A. I just came to class and did what he said. He's really nice with international student. I like him and am looking forward to taking his class ^^
                
                   She is a great professor. Very sympathetic, caring, & funny. She is precise with her work and helps students out where ever they need it. It was one of the most easiest English classes I took. Mention Elvis Presley and she'll love you more :)
                
                   Most of the time, we had assigned readings & would discuss them with questions she prepared. She is very interested in what you have to say, & it helps to be outspoken in her class. Assigns reading responses, an essay, group work, a few quizzes. No tests.
                
                   She is very energetic and loves the Cowboys lol She's really approachable and won't overload you with work.
                
                   I took dr. wright for 1302 & 2362 and they were great classes. She isn't hard at all and doesnt overload you with essays. In 2362 we had no essays just short reading responses and group presentations. 1302 had essays but nothing hard because she lets you write about what you want.overall great teacher!very nice and understanding.
                
                   I'm not sure how she is in freshman comp classes, but I do know that she is netter than any other professor I'm the department to take technical writing with.
                
                   I absolutely enjoyed Dr. Wright. She was very understanding and helpful, and she made the ethnography project very easy for us to complete by the end of the semester. She also has a great sense of humor.
                
                   She is easy and understandable. I have made all c in my paper but did all the other work and have B in th class. The journal she gives us are easy jut right write something related to that and you will receive an 100 in Journals.
                
                   She is very easy and makes the class fun. You will never want to miss a class of hers b/c they are very interesting.
                
                   He is a fun and great professor.
                
                   Very fun, easy and laid back. He grades really hard and isn't very clear on what he wants in an assignment.  He doesn't use blackboard so you won't know your grade unless you meet with him in his office. 
                
                   hardest class I've taken. demanding
                
                   hes a great teacher! do what youre suppose to and youll pass. ask him for help because he grades your papers!!!
                
                   If you're looking for an easy A DO NOT take his class. He's very outspoken and loves to argue. You will not pass if you do not participate.
                
                   Verderber is very loud, crazy, and entertaining. Never a dull moment in class. You MUST be able to keep up with deadlines. I was shy and quiet before taking this class and it really helped me open up around people. This has been my favorite class at TAMUK by far and I highly recommend him. :)
                
                   Is a great professor, very outspoken. If you love to argue then take his class, you will have a blast. Do not take if you are shy and timid. Offers rewrites for every paper except final one.
                
                   He is a great teacher and very interesting. He is open to others opinions, but is not afraid to tell the student when they are wrong. He is fun and playful, but it is not an easy &quot;A&quot;. Read your material and you will do fine. I really enjoyed this class.
                
                   Verderber is a total goof, but do not take his class lightly. He may seem very careless about most things but he is very opinionated and is not afraid to express his thoughts. He will call you out in class so if you're a shy kid drop him.
                
                   Over caffeinated; very rude, and will humiliate you in class.  Thinks that he is always right and better than you.  If you aren't liberal don't take him.  Highly offensive
                
                   This class is one of the few classes at TAMUK that actually challenges its students. Verderber is an eccentric professor, sure, but his class is engaging and fun to attend. There aren't a lot of classes like that where the student actually learns something. Verderbers class is my favorite, and he prepares students for the employment world.
                
                   No, unless your a girl that wears a skirt to class will he only pass you. This professor seems to be very flirty and very 'chummy' with the students. At first, he seems pretty cool but then it's apparent that he's playing the friend card. It was an okay class but you have to speak up...very high on participation points!
                
                   teacher is more of an over caffinated college student and class can be confusing at times this teacher needsss to tone it down!!!! Not to mention he seems to like to hear himself talk! Ugh! and for those of you who delete this whats the point of rating a proffessor if you delete the bad and leave the good&#63;&#63;&#63;&#63; Helloooo&#63;&#63;&#63;
                
                   He's a great professor but if you don't talk don't expect to get a good grade and at time he comes off as if he thinks he is better than everyone else but other than that he's good.
                
                   great material and he is funny and interesting. Everyone inclass was asked to speak up about their opinions and participate. He is very open and uninhibited. You need to keep track of when things are due sometimes and turn in all of your work or else you will fall behind and your grade will get effected.
                
                   Great teacher!! but if your not an outgoing person then i would take someone else because he has a lot of debates and class discussion and makes everyone say something before they can leave.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The guy's practically a drama teacher. Everything is expressive. Class was o.k. and mildly enjoyable. Dailys and group work made for easy points. Midterm and Final were easy but time consuming. Rarely a boring moment.
                
                   you don't see much in class. The dailys are kind of annoying but besides that I like the class. My favorite
                
                   Dr Tanner is awesome.  She understands every situation, and even lets you correct your essay tests (after she's made her comments and revision)! how awesome is that&#63;---this is a writing intensive class (engl2342) --- about 8 essays due every book! a little crazy, but overall great class!
                
                   Mrs. Tanner is one of the sweetest ladies you will ever meet!  She is completely dedicated to her students, is super helpful, and is totally understanding about anything...she is awesome!  I most def. recommend her!
                
                   Not that bad. She is demanding and gives a lot of work.
                
                   Great and nice teacher!
                
                   i enjoyed her class. if you like to write, take her. she is understand her students and helps them out
                
                   not a good instructor.  avoid her.
                
                   One of my favorite professors!
                
                   Great Professor, very understanding but only to a certain point. As long as you show up, participate and turn things in on time, you'll pass for sure
                
                   Very easy class. Everything is done in groups and you can get by without a book. Reading does help, though. He sometimes picks on certain students, but it's usually the ones he feels didn't read.
                
                   BEST PROF. ON CAMPUS!! In his poetry & novel class he gives reading homework every day, but it's not too much. You can get by if you don't read, but it's better if you do. He's super understanding and sweet and just the best professor I've ever had! :)
                
                   David Sabrio is an excellent educator. Most professors know their stuff and can convey the necessary information adequately. These are the adequate professors. The excellent ones, like Sabrio, have the additional ability to actually increase student appreciation of the course material.
                
                   Awesome professor.  Because of him I am minoring in English.  His energy makes you want to come to class. I hope to take him again and even go on a study abroad trip with him.
                
                   best professor on campus.
                
                   You have to work in groups almost everyday & answer questions about what you had to read in only a few minutes. He then calls on people randomly to answer the question aloud. Grades the out of class essay harshly, but he is a very nice professor. What we had to read was interesting & we sometimes watched movies. Make an effort & you'll be fine.
                
                   Okay teacher. Loves group work (which can be a pain at times) but homework in just reading and the occasional essay. Has a set reputwar of jokes so get ready for some repeats. Nice guy.
                
                   The essays you have to write about aren't bad considering some of the stuff other professors want. (No expressing your feelings essays). He only requires 600 word essays which is pretty short. He grades pretty hard on the essays though, I received a B because I hate writing (math 4 life).
                
                   ugh!  not hot
                
                   ugh!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   wonderful teacher, but uses group work, which can be hard on those who actually care.
                
                   Strong believer of cooperative learning groups. He is very knowledgeable. Overall great professor.
                
                   Very interesting professor. He is very positive and never says anything negative about your paper. He's that &quot;what can you do to make this better&quot; kind of teacher
                
                   Dr. Sabrio is a great professor.  He is friendly and very knowlegeable.  Class time is peaceful and easy going.  It was a pleasure having him as a professor.
                
                   This professor just wrote a book is extremely sharp will continue to take more classes with him he's an excellent teacher and makes you think
                
                   Assigns a lot of reading and work. Easy to keep up, but is understanding with missed work.
                
                   Dr. Quintanilla is a good professor. He is not that difficult. Although, he can be a hard grader with essays at times. He gives plenty of time for final essays. Overall, he's a great professor.
                
                   He's class is not one to be missed, you work a lot in groups. He does give out homework but it simple basic stuff. THis class is a lot like high school not a lot of demand to achieve a good grade.
                
                   Overall this class was very interesting and easy. The book was used for outlines and those outlines were very easy to complete. Also the professor is hot.
                
                   This class was interesting and entertaining. A really good professor who tries to get everyone in the class to participate.
                
                   Very intelligent and engaging.
                
                   awesome class ,very easy
                
                   A++++
                
                   Mr Hernandez is an extremely great teacher. He will help you if you ask him and he also gives good credit points. I recommend him highly.
                
                   Mr. Hernandez is very lay back, and cool. There is no way no one would fail this class, it is way to easy. If you are not good a writing papers,you will be once you take this class. I highly recommend taking English 1301 in Mr. Hernandez
                
                   Dr. Goswami is the best professor I have ever met. She is very specific, clear, and fun. She is a caring person, very understanding. I have not found any faults on her teaching nor personality. I recommend her for doctorate level studies.
                
                   Dr. Goswami is a wonderful professor.  She expects students to work to maximize their potential,  but does not overdo it.  I recommend her as a caring professor who will give an honest effort to support every student in the room and facilitate growth.  It's a pleasure to know Dr. Jaya Goswami.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Goswami is a fantastic instructor. I learned a lot from her. She reassures that everyone understands her before going on. She is very considerate of her students. She has some group work and persentations which are not difficult. I would highly recommend her. She is GREAT!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This is a pretty easy class. Just make sure you get your work done
                
                   There are no exams, just online quizzes and papers. They are relatively easy to write and the examples for each assignment in the textbook are very helpful. She also provides extra examples of what to do and not do on ecampus.  She's very nice and happy to help with any questions you have and gives great feedback. 
                
                   We did a ton of writing but it wasn't so bad because she was very flexible about the topics so you can provide good quality work. The grading was very reasonable. My only dislike was the quizzes because some of the answers where subjective and some of the stories where hard to understand. 
                
                   I would recommend taking him during a semester where you are taking difficult classes. His class is very easy and will help bring up your GPA. His papers do not take long to write as well. Plus he's a very understanding man.
                
                   This teacher is amazing. He talked about JUGGLING for our class and it is the first time I ever made a 100% in a class that wasn't an elective. Its  super easy and he basically tells you wants, but lets you have the freedom to pick  your own topic. Best English teacher I have ever had. However he does take attendance so you gotta go. O
                
                   Really good prof, loved him and he grades pretty easy.
                
                   Tells you exactly what to study for the tests.
                
                   Go to class, read the assignments, write the responses/article reviews. Straight forward, just stay on top of it every week.
                
                   AMAZING TEACHER!! Although her class is three times a week, class only physically meets on Wednesday, and Monday/Friday are due dates for papers to be submitted online. She's incredibly clear with what she wants and more than willing to give you a hand if you're struggling. The best teacher on campus!
                
                   She is extremely easy. You have three days of the week of class, but you only show up on Wednesdays. Monday and Friday are online assignments, which are super easy. when you are in class, you just talk about the readings. no tests. just midterm and final, which are super easy as well. Very easy A.
                
                   She was an awesome teach and made the class interesting and fun! She Related her lessons to real world situations and was  lenient in grades. I would highly recommend her.
                
                   I had this professor for a Women Writers class.  She is simply Awesome and way too much fun!  The class was work and not easy, but you can't wait to go to class and find out what happens next!
                
                   Loved this class!!! Awesome!
                
                   I LOVED this professor!!! She really cares about her students and wants them to succeed. She will push you to better yourself and the world. By far the best professor I have ever had!
                
                   Mrs.Boudreaux is an awesome professor who takes a genuine interest in the education of her students. As long as you attend and pay attention you'll pass.
                
                   I look forward to this class. Sometimes it can be a little too easy, but that doesn't mean I am not always learning something.
                
                   Great teacher!
                
                   AWSOME TEACHER!
                
                   Great Prof. She is an excellent teacher, and keeps things interesting.  I wish all my professors were like her.  &quot;G-$&quot;
                
                   He talks a lot and really fast too! Whatever he ever said in that class got muddled together. He'll tell you a story to prove that he had to write a research paper once and the processes that he expects you to adopt. He spent 3 weeks talking about it. HE thinks it's helpful and enjoyable. But just sit there and listen bc his class is easy.
                
                   BEST TEACHER EVER! Hes so nice, and super funny. Always outgoing, hes awesome. Just go to class, listen, and follow the motions and you'll pull an A! PS: Hes hott.
                
                   Very helpful! Class was always enjoyable.
                
                   One of the best teachers i have ever had.
                
                   Grea Professor, gave help when needed, and the added benifit of him being hot, and he sings!
                
                   He's hott. I'm just saying.
                
                   
                
                   She doesn't grade easy. Write your essays a little ahead of time. There are a lot of books, buy them and read them. There are parts of the course you can BS, but it can only get you so far. She does give extensions on her papers and doesn't need a legit reason. Good professor if you like group work. Books are boring though.
                
                   A lot of people here say how fantastic she is, but I wasn't impressed. The class really isn't hard, just work-intensive so you'll be busy  in class (one in-class quiz almost every week). I felt like I didn't learn much for English writing, I just learned how to do things HER way. Boring film theory essays. Not horrible, but not for everyone either.
                
                   Extremely engaging. She's great at &quot;teaching&quot; and at getting students to learn the material through interactive learning techniques and active student participation. Very knowledgeable, and her charisma makes students gravitate towards her.
                
                   Dr. Talley is awesome.  Dr. Talley sets the standard and will make you perform to your best.
                
                   Dr. Talley is absolutely amazing.  She is challenging but worth every cent of your education.  TO go through Humanities without taking her is a crime - she is fantastic but difficult - you will learn, be challenged but learn some amazing things.  I love her and learned so much from her.
                
                   Dr. Talley has been a huge motivating influence in my ongoing education.  Her classes always have weighty, meaningful discussions and yet she never ceases to make me laugh or smile.  I have taken every opportunity to enroll in her classes, and anyone who is serious about their education at A&amp;M-CC should consider doing the same.
                
                   She's a total feminist! I loved her! She is a great teacher! You will do a lot of reading in her class, and she will challenge you to think in several different ways! She's a definite recommendation from me!
                
                   This is the teacher that will make you realize what your true potential is so long as you make the decision to cultivate it.  She's tough but makes you a better writer.
                
                   She's a tough cookie, and not your typical english prof. She is blunt and appreciates wit. READ and DO THE READING JOURNALS. A lot of people either love her or are ok with her. You will do a lot of work.
                
                   She's a tough cookie, and not your typical english prof. She is blunt and appreciates wit. READ and DO THE READING JOURNALS. A lot of people either love her or hate her.
                
                   She is hard but worth taking.
                
                   she can spot a bullshipper from a mile away
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Absolutely loved her enthusiasm and jokes. As long as you pay attention,do the homework exercises, and the assessment quizzes you are bound to pass this class. She really dedicates her time to make sure that you have a better understanding of grammar.
                
                   Dr. Sullivan is a different kind of English teacher.  She is a linguist, which makes her more of a scientist than a literature professor.  As such, don't expect this to be a typical English class, though you also shouldn't expect it to be too hard.  Attend class, read the book, and you'll be fine.
                
                   JAMES ROCKS, i took him alomst 3 years ago, he is awesome if you can get into one freshmen english class get into his
                
                   James was awesome! He made the class really easy and pretty fun.  He was also a funny guy. Interesting wardrobe (white t-shirt and khakis every day) and he was bald. Cool teacher.
                
                   Easy teacher who makes writing bearable! He's flexible and makes you laugh, treats you like an equal and not a lower class citizen! Loved him!
                
                   Dr. Jones is just terrible. He does not allow people to have their own opinions on things. He treats students as if they are ignorant and he is godlike.
                
                   Really awesome, really laidback, and really connects with her students! You have to do the work to pass, but she's very willing to work with you as long as you show that you are making the effort! I'd definitely recommend her to anyone who has to take ENGL1302 - it's not a boring english class.
                
                   She is super cool and always keeps things fun and intersting. I definately would recommend her.
                
                   soon enough youll realize all you need for a good grade is participate in class and not worry about the projects. Hot teacher
                
                   I took her class for both comp. 1 & 2 and it was no that dificult. Just do your work and attend class, as well as her reasdings and you will be find. But if you dont like to do the work, then you will probably not have a good grade.
                
                   She is a good teacher however expect homework every single day. NEVER any breaks. She teaches mostly off of WIKI. She expects you come to class with questions, and makes you feel rather awkward if you don't have questions. She overall was nice but attend class in-order to pass. And do all the assignments. Little points count with her....
                
                   She is new so she doesn't have much experience in teaching. I always hated being a teacher's guinea pig and unfortunately I had to be her guinea pig. She doesn't explain assignments clearly, she just reads off of her class plans that she has in her web page. she sure is a great person but needs more experience on teaching.
                
                   Yes, she is difficult. Yes, she assigns a lot of homework. But, she explains all the assignments in class over and over again, and expects you to asks questions to help you. She gets upset, if you are disrespectful, or if you are not completing the assignments on time. If you ask for help, she is there for you.
                
                   I am disagree with all above. People in my class should realize that we are not high school kids anymore. Eda expects you to come prepared, ask questions in the class. Ask a lot of questions. Keep asking if you think she wasnt as clear. I think she is helpful more than necessary just find a way to approach her. Got B in her class.
                
                   Ms. Eda is extremely helpful teacher. Her classes are a little bit challenging but very informative. She teaches useful topics that I can apply in my other classes. She is honest in gradings and always ready to explain after the class. I would highly recommend taking her class, if you want to advance your knowledge and skills.
                
                   Ms. Eda is not helpful at all! You never know what she wants us to do on the assignments. she doesn't clarify, and is rude. I did not enjoy taking her class. If you have the option to take another english teacher, take another one!
                
                   She can be a tough grader depending on your attitude towards the class.  She does often times cancel class because her schedule is so busy (giving more time for assignments. The class was very easy-- I would take her class again if I could!!
                
                   I thought she was the rudest person ever! Always callingpeople out and treated us like we were still in high school.
                
                   She is a good teacher. If you are going to act out in class she may not be for you. She is a tough teacher but if you are haveing trouble in her class and go to see her for help she is VERY nice and EXTREAMLY helpful. You just have to get to know her to like her. If you dont get to know her than she will seem snooty and mean.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   From what I remember we all pretty much hated him but we were all dumb freshman! He's very detailed in teaching how to write good papers! We had I wanna say 4 portfolios to do which were time consuming all semester long. But overall just do the work and you'll be alright
                
                   A lot of work for a freshman composition class.  He is very helpful, sits down and talks to you about all your papers, and helps you get a better grade.  Tests were easy because they were exactly like the review.
                
                   class was VERY time consuming. constantly reading a novel. every two weeks we were assigned a new novel and at the end of 4 weeks we had to write an essay on either one of the books. essays were graded extremely hard. only tests were a midterm and a final.
                
                   profesor kucera gives a lot of work. every time the class meets, a assignment is due. he also takes attendance so the class is mandatory.
                
                   This was honestly the worst prof I have ever had. You have to read a 600 page novel every week. The novels are not interesting. Do not take this class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I don't know what that other person is talking about, but this is Mrs. Jess' third year teaching. Anyone who says anything bad about her probably didn't go to class because she definitely knows what she's talking about. Yes, she's often booked at the writing center, but that's because she's popular. She is the best teacher I've ever had by far.
                
                   Mrs. Jess is great! I actually liked going to her class and learned a lot about writing. I would take her again if I could. She is clear and helpful in class and is always willing to help after class too. 
                
                   Jessica is such a sweetheart and as long s you put effort into the class she will do what she can to help you pass!
                
                   So helpful and respects students. I love the way she teaches!
                
                   Jessica is a fantastic professor! Show imitative and show an interest in the class, and Jessica will sit down and take the time to help you. However, if you slack off and do assignments last minute, she will be less willing to help you.
                
                   You only have to show up to class for attendance and questions on assignments. All or most of her assignments are on blackboard so if you miss you can just post you work that you probably didnt do online. Would take it again bc she's really helpful and her assignments are not hard to grasp. Take this woman
                
                   Made an A. And writing essays is not my favorite. 
                
                   I barley passed English all through highschool and then i get Mrs. Jarvis Freshman year and my grade was never 90. Show up shes super cool, very lenient. Easy grader. Nick name: Juicy J(jarvis)
                
                   She was one of the best comp teachers I have ever had! she didn't assign a lot of homework. She was extremely helpful, and was pretty leniant on late work!
                
                   Shes the best composition teacher ever. IT is not difficult to get an A. You only have to work on class.
                
                   She's great! I had her for both of my first-year seminar classes. She's really helpful and will work with you if you ever need anything. Some of the stuff we did was kind of useless, but she was a big help when it came to studying for exams!
                
                   Funny, down to Earth woman. I had a great time with her and I wish I could STILL be in her class. I don't remember a single time I hated being in her class. 
                
                   awesome professor. not hard at all just do your papers and you will be fine.
                
                   Probably one of the best professors I have ever had! She is helpful and only wants you to succeed. Her class can be tough at times but if you do your work, you'll be fine. I still go to her to edit my papers.
                
                   Great teacher!!! She is tough when it comes to turning in work though. Her emails with comments on improving your papers are very helpful. Overall, just go to class and turn in your work, you should do fine. She gives article summaries once a week, do them!! They are an easy grade. Gives extensions on big papers if you let her know in advance.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Not sure why she chose to teach...she is def. not good at it.  But it is an easy B, I didn't go the last half of the semester and I got a B.  But if you want an A, all you have to do is get on her good side and suck up. =)
                
                   She is a cool teacher ... I learned so much from her... I wish she taught other classes... because I would take them in a heart beat
                
                   No Comments
                
                   she sux, worst teacher 4 ne college DUDE ever!!
                
                   She is a very nice woman, but not a good teacher.  She is unclear, inarticulate, and her website, which is the basis of all that is her life, is poorly organized and overly complicated.  To perform the most trivial of tasks, you have to open at least 10-12 windows and its very easy to get lost and confused.  Pass on this one.
                
                   all I can say was that she was great, understanding and very helpful. considering it was the 2nd time I was taking english comp 1 but still, what an awesome experience! she's great, I would take all classes that she taught!
                
                   she is a very intellectual woman...however does not know how to teach. Every time a question was asked her response was &quot;What do you think&#63;&quot;. She expects alot out of her students as well. If you are looking for a challenge, Cathy's your woman.
                
                   I've taken him for several classes. He's a great introductory professor (he gets you ready for college English). Yet, he is VERY disorganized. He tends to get way off schedule and sets too many tasks for day-to-day work. You never get through all of them. His classes aren't hard, but he provides a lot of "busy" work. He's a very sweet man, though.
                
                   He is so easy to talk to. The blue book tests are difficult, but that is the only difficult thing about the class. He is extremely funny and you can tell that he adores the field he teaches. However...good luck reading his handwriting. I still haven't mastered that.
                
                   His tests require you bring blue books to write essays in class with 1000 words. Which is meaningless. Daily writings drop my grades down.
                
                   Very interesting class but you have multiple writing assignments each week as well as 2 peer reviews for each assignment. He does not give 100s for the core writing assignments, because even if you think your assignment is perfect, he'll find something wrong with it. Even with the strict grading, this was still one of my favorite classes so far.
                
                   Not too hard if you keep up with the reading; the most difficult part of the class was reading his handwriting.
                
                   He is a good teacher but I have never read so much for a course. He requires you to read before every class because of daily readying quizes. I am the worst english student and I got an A. Just read go to class and you will be fine. Also you will do a couple of presentations for his course.
                
                   this is a great professor to go to, he's very helpful and he's a ton of fun.  He could make ANY topic interesting and he grades fairly. highly recommended.
                
                   great books to read except one, really good professor, highly recommended
                
                   She's a tough grader, but her classes are amazing. 
                
                   KEEP UP WITH READING. Approachable professor. He is very passionate about what he teaches and treats the class like everyone is an English major.
                
                   If you are looking for an easy A and don't care to take the course seriously, move along. If you plan on working and earning your grade, he's awesome. There is a significant course overload but it's fair. He's balanced with the work and concern with his students. You will get what you paid for. I enjoyed his course!
                
                   You have to keep up with the reading or you will fail. If you participate in class discussions you will have a better chance at a higher attendance/participation grade. Read ahead of time so you don't fail the pop quizzes. If you Do your rough drafts ahead of time and put some effort into them, you should get a decent grade.
                
                   Don't take this class unless you  love his book selection and plan on reading every single day and writing perfectly. He grades papers very thoroughly and expects the rough draft to be the quality of a final draft. This class was not treated as a core so unless you love reading and writing, I don't suggest it. He takes everything very seriously.
                
                   I'm taking her Film & Lit class. It's a lot of fun. Lots of discussion, there are sporadic written responses but there's pretty much no daily work. Lots of reading though. You can BS the discussions, but you can't BS the papers. Although, if you've gotten this far in English, I doubt that would be a problem. Strongly recommend for discussion types.
                
                   Intro to ENGL Studies: You have to do a group teaching project, 2 lit papers, research paper, and 2 exams. Her grading is weird. She reviewed my paper saying it was awesome, but gave me a B. Papers may require a little more effort than usual. I got an A the second time. I'd recommend her, but be prepared to work a little bit.
                
                   I had Victorian Literature with her. We were graded based on quizzes, attendance, essays and a creative project. No tests. I really enjoyed the books we got to read and her class was a lot of fun. She's really funny. The creative project was a lot of fun to do and she would let you do just about anything (I did a screenplay of Dracula). Take her!
                
                   Not really sure how I feel about her class. You have to keep up to date on the readings. A lot of the class is just discussion. Not sure I liked her essay prompts or the way she graded them. Also, its kind of boring & she really makes a lot of the same points. Hate studying for the midterm, makes it up as she goes along really.
                
                   I agree with a rating below.  She is very accepting of ideas as long as they are similar to hers.  If they are not she rejects them or tries to somehow make them similar to hers.  It always felt as if she was trying to get you to think like her.  With literature there is not a definite answer so a rejection of someone's idea is like a slaptotheface
                
                   Excellent teacher.  She keeps English interesting and fun, I would definitely recommend her.
                
                   very good teacher..took her a couple years ago for an english lit class...you had to keep up with the readings..but the class discussions were always interesting and fun
                
                   Was a pretty good teacher, she was very open to peoples thoughts and ideas, just read the books and you will do good, class is boring sometimes but o well still a good teacher very nice and willing to hlep!
                
                   I did not like her at all. It seemed like she was making everything up as she went along. She is open to ideas as long as they are the same as hers.
                
                   Great teacher with a great teaching style.  She truly cares about the subject and her students and makes learning (and class) fun.
                
                   Great class and teacher. Just have a clue what's going on in the books and have some interest and you'll do good.
                
                   very good teacher! her class was always fun because of the different discussions we had ..she is really enthusiastic about what she does! i would def. recommend her!
                
                   I loved having her as a teacher, she really cares about her students and makes you want to work hard.
                
                   intelligent, witty, energetic, entertaining, fun, approachable, beautiful person through and through.  highlight of my semester!
                
                   love the way she dresses...no kidding. Shes a great teacher who is understanding yet firm.
                
                   Great professor.  Had her for Victorian Lit and she was just a blast to work with.  Would love to take another class with her.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very nice, and loves her job. She will help you until you understand. She is always available and truly wants you to succeed. Loved this class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I loved having Lili as a professor especially during my first semester as a freshman. While her work isn't simple, it's not the hardest work I've ever done. She shows interest in her students. I was a lazy student and she would constantly check up on me. Even when I wasn't her student when she saw me, she would ask how my grades were. Great teacher
                
                   Mrs. Cook is all over the place she is messy and doesn't not explain anything well.. She assigns something doesn't elaborate and then gets mad when its done incorrectly.. She acts more like a student than a professor. I would really recommend you get out of her class immediately it's for the best
                
                   Mrs.Cook offers a fun and interesting approach to learning the fundamentals of how to write and think about writing as a college student. She offers her uniquely funny interpretations making it easy to understand the material. She is very helpful.
                
                   Lili is beyond awesome. She does everything to help if you show interest. She makes the class as enjoyable as she could. Really, your experience in her class is based on your attitude towards her and the class in general. I made like an A+ in Composition. She is super helpful. You can either fail the class or extremely do well.
                
                   She is not an easy teacher. She makes class confused. My classmates dropped her class often. She did not except late work in 1 second. We have class on 8:00. Everything turns in should be exact 8:00AM. I do not recommend anyone register this class
                
                   She is very rude. She gives a ton of work with no consideration to other classes you may be taking. Expectations are too high. The majority of the time she confused the class.
                
                   She is fun. However, she does not has tight ideas and this makes most of the students in the class confused. Sometimes, she uses bad words in the class. In general,it is not easy to get A  in this class.
                
                   I thought she was great. You do need to put in work, but she makes class super interesting. She's very much a feminist, and that reflects in lectures. She really knows her stuff. Plus, she's very interested in your take on the material (which was really refreshing). I would definitely recommend her. 
                
                   She is a very good professor. If you do the work it is not too hard to get an A. Be sure to read the readings ahead of class, and to attend lectures. There are pop writing assignments, and attendanceparticipation is part of the overall grade. The lectures are interesting, and are lead in a way that promotes class discussion. Would take again.
                
                   She was amazing! Hope to take more of her classes. A lot of reading, 5 novels and short stories too. 2 essays 1-2 pgs, final paper 7-10 pgs, midterm, a presentation, and a current event. Little in class writing assignments here and there. Discussions were really helpful. Oh, and she's a feminist. 
                
                   Dr. Concannon is one of the most helpful, intelligent and sincere professors at the University. TAMUCC is not a distinguished institution but Dr. Concannon certainly raises the bar. If you get a chance to take a class from this man, you should.
                
                   We read 5 books and there were four essays.  He give a handout for each essay which spells out word for word what he is looking for.  He basically gives you a question bank for tests and picks some.  Showing up,for class is a must, what he says in lectures can be turned into the essay.  Very interesting take on the books, although some were boring.
                
                   This professor was crystal clear on his requirements for essays. He would even give outlines that the students had the option to follow. Had a couple of small extra credit opportunites. Very easy teacher. Just attend class.
                
                   The class was pretty riduculous. He's not really open to different points of view so your analytical essays mean absolutely nothing. Not to mention HE doesn't even grade the essays so you kind of have to figure out what the grader wants. I would not reccommend this class for non-english majors. He's a smart teacher....but tough.
                
                   Is a nice teacher, and extremely helpful in giving feedback, tells students exactly how to format papers, but his grading is a bit tough in essays. Not very open-minded to different interpretations of pieces, so when writing, make sure you use his interpretation if you want to make an A. He is always there to help you and you can send him drafts.
                
                   He is an awesome professor.  All of his lectures are crystal and interesting, and he will explain EVERYTHING in detail if you need it.  He even encourages you to send in a draft for him to edit for you. Very supportive, grades easy/fairly, and communicates well.  I've taken 4 classes with him and all are great.
                
                   Kevin is an awesome professor! He will tell you exactly what he wants, and even provide an outline of the way he wants the papers to be. I always used his interpretations to be on the safe side, which is the easiest way to get an A.
                
                   He is incredibly helpful.  He helps you outline essays and assignments and is always there for drafts and critiques.  As long as you pay attention in class and interact and read all the assigned readings, you'll do just fine.  He grades fairly easy.
                
                   Fairly nice and respectful but quite hard on grading for an introductory course. He acts like there are absolute interpretations for certain concepts, causing restriction on your own interpretation of texts (affects you big time on essays). He acts like everyone is an English major, even though I'm just a minor. Wait for someone else if possible.
                
                   Mrs. B is a pretty cool professor, but it can be quite difficult figuring out what she wants. Just get creative and you will be fine. Also, be prepared for class discussions and do your readings. There will be pop quizzes.
                
                   I don't know which teacher they are talking about because when I had her I emailed her asking for help with this huge project twice and when she responded a week later she was saying how irresponsible it was to ask a question that late. But I emailed her a week ago?! She's just not helpful. I taught myself the class. 
                
                   My high school English teachers were so bad that I had no hopes to do good in college level English. However,  having her during my first semester in college really helped me out, anytime I needed help she was there for me and encouraged me all the time. I got an A in all my papers by going to her office hours whenever I had questions or concerns
                
                   She is very nice and cool. Class can be interesting time to time. she is very helpful and thoughtful and allows late work if needed.
                
                   This is an easy class, plus Mrs. Boeck is awesome! She is one of the best teachers I have ever had. Show up to every class if you want a good grade. I would recommend you to take her class.
                
                   Want an A? Take her class! Its really hard not to make an A in her class or at least a B (as long as you show up!).She takes plenty of grades which helps in keeping a high average or creep your way back up if you scored low on an essay. In addition, she is extremely helpful, and an awesome teacher...Trust me!(:
                
                   Absolute cakewalk class. Doesn't really teach so much as assigns papers and answers questions. If you turn in every paper on time and show up to most classes, you will get an A.
                
                   She is an awesome teacher! had her for both COMP I and Comp II and would take her for any other English classes if possible. ALso, works in the writing center which is helpful if you get stuck on an essay... she is always there to help you.
                
                   great overall
                
                   really hard with a lot of work...but she is good by pushing you so that you don't slack off!
                
                   She's great.  Really helpful and friendly.  She does good to be specific on what she wants.  She lets you revise the papers, making it easy to get an A.  Also you don't take any test.  Overall an easy A.
                
                   Was not looking forward to this class and it turned out 2 B very interesting. One large paper due at the end of the term but you work on it throughout the semester.  He was very responsive and supportive throughout the project.
                
                   This professor is not very helpful and very opinionated. She prefers to be called Dr. Stewart rather than Ms. Stewart because she paid $80,000 for her degree and it won't be paid off after she dies, so students must call her Dr. She seems like a nice person with strong opinions.
                
                   O had her for a mandatory Freshman success class. For most of the year I did not like her, but after a while we started getting along. She does grade papers harshly. I won a essay contest that involved the entire freshman class and I was in the top 40 and I'm now going to D.C. because of it and she gave me a C on the exact same paper.
                
                   AMAZING. simply amazing. she's funny (well dressed to boot) opinionated, and knows the material. Took her for Children's Literature (forgot the course number) but she made what i thought would be a boring, easy class, into something i will never forget. i will recommend this class to anyone who wants to fall in love with learning again.
                
                   Her ENG 305 class was awesome! I learned so much!!! I would take her again in a heart beat. She is smart and offers great insight!
                
                   Loved this class! She teaches so well and the classes are so interesting. You won't fall asleep in this english class. She's very knowledgeable and funny. I dont think she grades too hard either @ least not for this class, just do your papers.
                
                   ok this class just confused me...assignments were like HUH&#63; and she was super opinionated and it was quite apparent that she had her favorites- didnt learn a whole lot just wrote my butt off
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This was my favorite class during Spring '05. This class taught me a lot & Dr. Stewart was very helpful! I enjoyed her class very much- she's awesome! :)
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great teacher! Really cares about her students and does what she can to help them.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is a real arrogant jerk.  He gives an F on your first paper and then treats you like you are inferior to him.  I don't care for his idea of what makes an English teacher
                
                   If you are way out in left field this is the class for you. All you need to do is write in agreeance with his views and you will pass. That is where he will get your grade not from the work you produce.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Ohh..he is a good teacher. He knows what he talking about. Grades ur papaer badly at first and after that it will be alrite...makes u learn more
                
                   there were very few assignments for this class, so u have to do well on most of them to pass.  he knows the difference between a someone who really works on a paper, and those who juts throw something together, so ur grade reflects it.  u have to present your final paper as a speech at the end of the semester.
                
                   He's a good teacher overall. His lectures are pretty boring most of the time, but he listens to us and lets us state our views. He sometimes grades lower than you would expect because he wants us to do revisions but after the revisions he usually makes the grade a good amount higher. Again, overall, he's a good english teacher just a little boring.
                
                   Amazing professor.  Requires thought provoking discussion from students, which helps me to learn the material.  Great assignments, fair exams.  Only thing he is a stickler for is attendance.  Definitely recommend.
                
                   Dr. Royal is the best instructor I have ever had. Ever. From grade school onward. He's extremely good at helping students understand the concepts he's teaching. His handouts are awesome. His selection of texts is great. And as if all that were not enough, he has a fantastic sense of humor and knows how to make a class fun. He completely rocks.
                
                   The class was very interesting and I enjoyed the lectures and class participation that was encouraged.  Terrific teacher. Challenging though.
                
                   Awesome professor.
                
                   Loved Dr. Royal's open dicussions. He encourages participation from every student and is very knowledgable and prepared. Good Professor.
                
                   Derek was great.  I really enjoyed the selected readings.  Class discussions were never dull or lengthy.
                
                   Very demanding, but EXCELLENT teacher!
                
                   Professor is very demanding. He's a good listener. Most of his classes are discussion based. In most of his classes, he makes students read a book every two weeks or more. He's funny and one of the most popular professors in the department. Come for the humor, stay for the readings.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. P is unorganized. Every class day he spends it going over what he went over the class before, and the one before that. He tries to engage the class its just difficult because he's so unclear. The class is easy because he always extends deadlines. Just do your work and you'll pass. It's just annoying the way he teaches.
                
                   Pizziconi is great. I like that he makes the students completely responsible for their own learning, in that if a student does not make an A, it is 100% because of their own lack of interest or studying. He always is available for help if needed.
                
                   Dr. P is not a good teacher at all. He is unclear, has no organization skills in his syllabus or class assignments and generally made all the work I did more difficult than it had to be with his lack of teaching and direction. Also, he loved to insult American students and speak about how Italian students were much better.
                
                   He is always so pumped about his classes, stays interested, and REALLY wants his students to succeed. The students who are not fond of Dr. P are those who are not satisfied with their result due to their own laziness. He is one of the best! In fact, I give him credit for introducing me to what I now want to do for the rest of my life.
                
                   He is a very challenging prof.  He can be hard to understand at first but he is passionate about the subject.  We have alot of quizes and his midterm is hard.  He spends too much time on stuff that isn't relavent.  We have homework every week and half hte time we don't know what we made on it.  You get distracted by his accent sometimes too.
                
                   He is full Italian with a very thick accent. I found it very difficult to pay attention in class. He did not explain things very well at all. I will not take him as an instructor again.
                
                   Dr. Mosely is a very nice lady and teacher.  She is a little on the boring side and pretty much lectures most class meetings.  She will help you if you ask and if you come to class every time, you should be alright.  She is an expert at mythology and is very passionate about it.
                
                   If you can, take a class with Dr. McCarron.
                
                   I love Mr. C!!!!
                
                   He was a bit &quot;monotone&quot; for meno energy or passion.  He did, however, unfortunately play favorites (tended to like the girls more than the guys) and was very inconsistent with his grading.  Gets off topic on is Vietnam/service stories a lot.  I am sad to see him as the Dept. Chair now; no one else must have wanted it.
                
                   Oh man, he is the greates prof. ever, didnt do to well in H.S. english, but he made the writer in me come out, and he always built up everones self esteem, no teacher like him, i will go to any class he teaches, even PE, no wouldnt that be funn to see, for those who know him.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Listen and come to class.
                
                   I loved his class - by far my favorite english teacher ever. I have never enjoyed the subject, but I would sit in on his class any day of the week!
                
                   He is so cool, he made us read other books that i wouldn't have usually read. He is very considerate if you miss days and actually cares. The best english teacher i have ever had!
                
                   I LOVE THIS MAN! He made me WANT to learn MORE! I made English my minor because of him. God bless every bone in his body! He is AMAZING!!!
                
                   Great class!
                
                   Dr. McCarron is probably the BEST Writing Professors I have had. He is very good at what he does and knows how to teach the subject. If you have to have Technical Writing 341, Take it From Him, You won't be sorry.
                
                   Dr. McCarron is one of the best in his field.  It was such a good learning experience and if he taught Advanced Writing, I'd take that course also.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. McCarron is the best teacher that has ever taught. He is my favorites of favorites. You learn so much from him and he is so caring and gentle. God Bless You!
                
                   Makes a very dry subject interesting - not an easy task. Provides LOTS of examples (more than you might want, even).
                
                   he is the best english professor i ever had,,,,he is cool
                
                   It is a very good class but be ready to listen to a lecture all year.  Try to take notes, but make sure you ask him questions when he gives the reviews.  He pretty much gives you all the answers during the review. Kinda boring, but he is a great with answering questions. Highly recommend!
                
                   I'm sorry but he is one of the most boring professors I have ever taken! All of his lectures are based on him standing in front of the class and talking. If you go to class and TRY to take notes you will get an EASY A. He gives reviews before his test and he gives on final paper which is SUPER easy! Highly recommend
                
                   Dr. Jonz makes grammar come alive.  His approach is very clear and structured, and he provides many examples. The use of the textbook he wrote greatly enhanced my understanding of the content. He is very calm, has a great sense of humor, and is easy on the eyes.  He always learns his students' names. I love Dr. Jonz!
                
                   Dr. Jonz has great energy and neat sense of humor, which almost makes something as boring as modern grammar bearable.  If you come to class and do the work you should make a B.  Getting an A is a bit tough. He used to allow students to grade their own papers.  Make sure you are not too tough on yourself; you will need those points at the end.
                
                   Class is like Math to me. Please don't take it the semester that youre to graduate. Just might not get that diploma! Try hard though.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I love Dr. Jonz; such a funny guy.  Moddern Grammar was tough, and made me want to cry at times, but he always explained, even two or three times if I asked.  He even put little notes at the top of our papers........&quot;Nice job, Melanie!&quot;  it's the little things, you know!  I'm still waiting on the smell good stickers..........
                
                   He is such a nice, helpful teacher. He really wants his students to understand and appreciate what he's teaching
                
                   He has a very dry sense of humor and a pleasing disposition.  He lets people in the class drone on and on sometimes.  Reading material was simple, paper summary over reading every week, and 3 large papers.  His grading criteria was unclear and inconsistent.  He is extremely informed and passionate about linguistics.
                
                   This is a hard class. You'll find many people are on their 2nd try, but he's an outstanding teacher who does everything he can to help you through it. He doesn't hold it against you if you take it again because he knows this is tough stuff. Instead, he is very available.
                
                   Dr. Jonz is easily one of the very best teachers I've ever met.  He presents difficult material in a genuinely engaging way.  A half dozen of my classmates (along with me) commented freely during the semester that his is our favorite class.  I am taking him again for another class next semester.
                
                   Even though this class is very difficult, Dr. Jonz's teaching style is very helpful and I expect to recieve an A in the class.
                
                   A very difficuly class. it will consume most of your time that semester. make sure you form a study group. he is very helpful though.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I didn't find it that hard, but maybe it was because of my grasp on the subject matter.  (I think I got like a FIVE point O in that class)  I never had a problem with the class that he couldn't clear up in less than 45 seconds.  Funny guy, too.
                
                   I think that he was a very good teacher, but the class (Eng462--language acquisition and processing) was very hard. He's a nice, funny guy though.
                
                   Hard but fair.
                
                   Class not easy but I did OK.
                
                   Miss Jones's class was pretty great. She isn't really easy but she isn't hard either. Everyone does the same project for this class but she made it seem fun.
                
                   Mrs. Jones is a wonderful professor and very laid back. She will work with you if you miss an assignment or class and is an Easy A. I made a 100 in this class.
                
                   He's the coolest Professor I know!!
                
                   Professor Isip treats you just like an equal.He speaks on your level of communication and gives many opportunities for extra credit.If you attend class and do the homework he assigns, it's an easy A! Had no tests just a few 7 page writing assignments,but nothing difficult.I loved this class,and I will be taking him for 1302. I totally recomend him!
                
                   Dr. Hayes is such a wonderful professor. He is so knowledgeable and knows his material so well. Dr. Hayes is a very honest and fair person because you will get what you really deserve in his class. He always opens the chance for deep and analytical readings of the text we read. I highly recommend this professor for the hard working students.
                
                   Excellent instructor. Very interesting course, great readings. Dr. Hayes is one of the best teachers TAMUC. Really cares about the students too. If you get a chance to take his class, it will be a good one no matter what the topic.
                
                   I love Dr. Hayes! He is laid-back, relaxed, and doesn't seem to take the &quot;world&quot; too seriously, often finding humor in it. He's got a very dry, witty sense of humor, and if you're smart, you'll catch things that would otherwise slip by. Don't underestimate him. He's a great guy all-around!
                
                   He's got a very relaxing voice, which can make you sleepy, but he's also got a wicked sense of humor.  He knows and loves his material, and he made the class enjoyable.
                
                   he was a really awesome professor.....a lot of people thought he was boring but he just had a really dry sense of humor!!
                
                   Lauren is such a great teacher. SHe makes class funa dn interesting and is extremly young and cares for her students as if it were her own kid. She does give quizzes over reading but it is really easy if you just read. If you come to class then you will get a good grade for sure!
                
                   a hypocrite
                
                   funny man, very good teacher, not all hung up on the mechanics and responds with helpful critique. I would take him for more English classes.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Outstanding instructor and very helpful class. Definitely take!
                
                   Most universities possess great teachers that draw students, Dr. Dick is one of those teachers. He was ranked third in the nation in debate.  If you take him he'll make you a better writer guranteed. He will always make you rewrite so just do it. His hairstyle is fine. He's a professor not a star.
                
                   This course required lots of time outside of class, but Dr. Dick was very helpful in revising our papers. It is hard to get a good grade on papers if he disagrees with your opinion, which he often does. I did like the class discussions, though some of his beliefs are strange. Overall, fun class.
                
                   Loved his class....You learn how to really write....not just theorize on how to write. Challenging assignments.  He rocked.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   His grading seems to be opinionated. Many students are struggling in the class, and many are repeats. He does teach, though.
                
                   Dr. Fulkerson knows his material. We even are reading one of his own books, and he tends to clarify for us what others make seem so very hard to understand.
                
                   he is too hard,,,he needs to change his hair style
                
                   Very Challenging!  Graduate course had lots of reading and posting online.  Loved the class wouldn't recommend her unless you are willing to work!
                
                   She either likes you or she doesn't. She does not mentor graduate students unless she likes you. She can be detrimental to your career if she doesn't like you. Instead of telling you why she has a problem with you she shuts you out completely. She can hurt your feelings deeply seemingly w/o regret.
                
                   Dr. Dunbar-Odom is a really cool teacher. Some don't like her because she takes her job seriously and actually chooses to teach her students. She requires that they participate and make an attempt to learn. Her behavior toward all students is always very professional and she's a lot of fun. Students learning is a  good thing.
                
                   I really liked her from the get go and then she was a total B****! All I can say is she's just an O kay teacher, nothing special here! If possible take some one else. Not very genuine.
                
                   She was enjoyable to listen to but was very unfair and inconsistent in her essay grading.  I could work very hard and make a B or I could just slack off and not try and still make a B.  It's like she decides up front who the A students and who the B students and doesnt change her mind no matter how hard you try or improve. I consider myself a good
                
                   She had such energy when she was teaching and she was very funny, it made me enjoy that class, even though sometimes writing the papers were  tough.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   forgets diff btwn joking & teaching, any infraction puts hatred behind her eyes, prejudice toward those who don't follow her ways, fakes caring
                
                   Dr. DO is a nice prof. who likes to challenge her students (she's not anti christian). Her students are mostly freshman who leave petty complaints about being challenged. That makes her a good teacher. In her class, you get the grade you deserve. For GA's she a great guide into the academic world.
                
                   Make it to class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very lively & interesting.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I feel like this class was a very important stepping-stone for me; I learned so much about writing and it really helped me shape the essays I'll write in the future. It's really open-ended, and one of the main points he tries to make is how important revisions are. Sometimes it was overwhelming, yes, but it's worth it in the end.
                
                   Awesome professor! This guy really cares about his students. Classes are interesting. I learned a lot!
                
                   If English is not your strong point, do not take this class, it can be overwhelming. Gerald is understanding & checks in often on how your work is doing, & keeps students informed on test material, papers, homework, exc. Not an easy class but put in effort and he will acknowledge it. Grading is fair. Missing class means you miss a lot of material. 
                
                   So far, this was the most challenging class I've ever taken. While he does grade "hard", he also grades fairly. If you stay on top of your work and really listen, you'll do fine. His lectures were humbling and inspirational. I would absolutely take one of his classes again. 
                
                   The guy is the typical movie critic. If you're into that, you'll probably dig him. Otherwise, he is really, REALLY annoying and condescending. Also, if you don't know anything about film, prepare for a rough ride. 
                
                   I've taken two graduate classes with Dr. Duchovnay  and I can honestly say he ranks up there among the best. He's an exemplar who's passionate about teaching and about mentoring. He's extremely knowledgeable about film and literature and is always fair. He's been an inspiration to me. There should be more Dr. Duchovnays at this school. 
                
                   I've taken 4 undergrad classes w/Dr D & will take more as a grad student. He doesn't hand out grades to ppl who won't try! I know when I get an A, I've worked hard & EARNED it! He is ALWAYS helpful when asked, but he's not there to babysit. (We're COLLEGE students!) His knowledge & grasp of film is superb and students are blessed to have him there.
                
                   He can be an ass most of the time. He will put you on blast about every little detail we barey used the book. We took alot of essay and do not recieve grades so if you are failing you wont know he is rude and blunt do not care about your feelings and if you are weak you do not need to be enrolled in this course
                
                   This was a hard class and I did not do as well as I had hoped.  I feel like I learned from this course and had I invested the time and effort it deserved I would have gotten the grade I wanted.  Though he is difficult, he is fair in his grading.
                
                   Boring. Makes you wish you never had to take the class. Does not give you any indication whatsoever how you are doing in his class. Needs to be fired.
                
                   Dr. D's classes are tough because you actually have to think.  He makes the topics very interesting and inspires a desire to take more classes.
                
                   This is a great class.  The discussions are interesting and Dr. D. imparts a greater appreciation of film to his students.
                
                   I liked Dr. D and his style of teaching.  I really enjoyed his film class.  If you want to take a teacher who's passionate about his subject, take Dr. D's film class.  But here is the warning: If you are an &quot;A&quot; seeker, you may not want this class.  It is pretty hard to get an &quot;A&quot; in his classes, but a &quot;B&quot; is easy to get.
                
                   Very good professor-does everything possible to help his students.
                
                   I liked Dr. D, but he could be an ass.  The film and lit class was very interesting, but for a while I couldn't watch a movie without tearing it apart.  It took a while before I could enjoy them again.  I pulled an A in the class, surely because I had big ****.
                
                   I had to drop cause this class was so overwhelming. he is nuts with his damn quizes, I can't remember every tiny detail on a fairy tale and then pass a quiz on 60 pages of it when I have 4 other courses going on.
                
                   Loved his class, loved his attitude, I personally noticed that those with the most &quot;problems&quot; in his classes were often the ones who weren't there or didn't really give a crap.
                
                   Class was fun and interesting, and I learned a lot about the subject. He's always willing to help if you have questions or have a problem (accepts almost any excuse for late papers or missed class, willing to give incompletes if necessary). Very respectful and understanding.
                
                   I'm seriously surprised to hear some say he's not nice. The man wasn't rude to anyone all semester! He's very intelligent and listens to what everyone has to say. A good teacher. His tests are kinda hard, but very passible. Do the work and it's impossible to fail.
                
                   Dr. D's got a great if very dry sense of humor, and while he does expect a lot out of you, he's always fair.
                
                   Love this class!!!!!
                
                   Ok class.
                
                   Mr. Baker is so fun! Love his class. And to the person who missed 7 classes... you deserve to fail.
                
                   Failed because I only had 7 absences. Fun class but attendance policy is too strict!
                
                   Not an easy class, but gives great discussion. I like that he uses video clips and is open to what the class has to say.
                
                   Not a class to joke wuth. Mr. Baker is really passionate about his class but also understands we ain't all english majors. Cool prof.
                
                   Funny professor... Doesn't just talk at us. He gets us talking and shows videos and relevant stuff. Really fun class.
                
                   Accent at first will frustrate you but is not hard to adjust to.  Text was barely ever used except for the book that we had to read for a paper we had to write.  Grades were based on 4-6 papers we had to write throughout the semester, all of which he gave us plenty of time to write and walked us through on how to do.  And he also never gives &lt;70
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Danced into class on the first day. Likes to do Quasimodo impressions during slide shows.
                
                   Prof Wilson was a great English teacher.  She uses ECampus so everything is well organized.  Also, she gives extra credit per essay.  I really liked the fact that she takes the time to get students to think critically about our reading and writing.  You will earn you grade in her class.  Show up. Do the work to pass the class.
                
                   Positives: extra credit for your essays.  Negatives: Very unclear about grading. Grades essays with a computer. Does not help you outside class. Provides little feedback. Is very unclear in lecture and tries to speak with big words to sound smart. Expects you to have graduate level grammar. Quizzes every other day over reading.  DONT TAKE HER
                
                   Great Prof, class is always entertaining and he usually lets you out early! He does demand some good writing out of you, so you need to put effort in your writing! Definitely recommend him for 235!
                
                   Great prof. funny. loved going to lecture. You will have several papers and a group project. i am a better writer because of him and would love to take a class with him again. I will say that he was pretty darn tough on grading. he demands your best. You are forced to be creative if you are not already.
                
                   
                
                   This class increased my writing potential and really made me reflect on myself. Her lectures teach you how to think differently and ask yourself the right questions. She's open to discussion and difference in opinion. As long as you do the work, you will pass. She usually offers extra credit, as well. I would definitely take her again. 
                
                   I took at Lonestar, Spring 2015. She's so amazing. She makes sure everyone in class gets involved and it makes you look forward to class. Guys, is college English so be prepared you'll have to read, actual readings, write "FIT's" on them and you will have major papers, she's very explanatory so pay attention. I would take her again. 
                
                   SERIOUSLY THE BEST PROF AT A&M. HER GRADING IS PERFECT.  The class discussions are so analytically and thought provoking. If you do the work, you will pass! 
                
                   Very good professor. Gives crystal clear prompts for the major paper assignments. Gives great feedback on your papers sometimes very critical. Downside is the fits  as at some points there are two that need to be submitted in one week. It is a lot of work no office hours  just email communication but responds quickly.
                
                   Great instructor! Clear about what she wants from assignments. Willing to help, gives extra credit opportunities. Interesting discussions, but the readings can be a little tough...... worth it though. Would definitely take her again.
                
                   Passionate prof.  I really enjoyed this class.
                
                   Lindsay takes easy to a whole new level, and she is a dime piece. Their isnt very many girls on this campus as good looking as her.
                
                   Very down to earth, young, and full of energy! -Especially for being pregnant with twins!!! She makes this class cool!
                
                   wow... can you say HOTT&#63;!&#63;!&#63;!  bangin hott late 20's chick.  very cool!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Short is such a badass.  She's hysterically funny and you can tell she's just a real lady who's lead an interseting life.  Her class is challenging, but managable.  I actually looked forward to going...weird.  Anyway, take her if you can -- she's a lot of fun to talk to and always willing to help.
                
                   Mr. Shake was  a super helpful teacher who definitely cares about his students. If you meet with him to discuss your papers and really participate in class, you should do well. Take him!
                
                   I took shake this last semester and enjoyed the class. He makes you write a good amount, but I like the content in the course. At the end of the day, Professor Shake is three things knowledgable, difficult, and very very attractive.
                
                   This professor was very bland when it came to lectures.  I play a sport for this university and had to miss some class, and because of that she graded my papers a lot tougher.
                
                   Loved attending her class at first until I discovered she was easily the worst human being I had ever met in my life. She reported me for plagiarism when some of my final paper got flagged for matching one I wrote in high school. I ended up with a D in the class and may have to leave the school. She didn't even talk to me before reporting me.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   You will do well in this class as long as you do the work.
                
                   He is the best English teacher I've ever had, far and away. He is engaging and thoughtful, and really made the material interesting. Lots of reading of course, and about 15 750 essays on stories, but he's a good teacher. Tests are not too bad.
                
                   To be honest he is one of the best professors at A&M. He gives test that are half ID's and half essays, but he give you a review before the exam. If you don't understand something or you have questions you can just contact him or go to his office hours. His exams come from lecture and the readings. YOU HAVE TO READ/PAY ATTENTION/TAKE NOTES!!!
                
                   His tests are difficult as he only draw upon vague quotes from the books we read in class. The 'sample tests' he gives before the real test will not help you in any way. It feels impossible to study for any of his tests unless you memorize the books. I am an English major and find this class difficult.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He was by far the best professor I had at A&M!  I took three different classes of his.
                
                   She has a lot of written response homework, but it really wasn't that bad at all. As long as you can BS something about what we discussed, you'll be fine. My responses were never longer than a paragraph. She really captured my attention and made the class extremely interesting! Take her if you can
                
                   SHE'S AMAZING! if you need a literature credit take her! alot of homework and turning it in on time matters but she is great! well worth it! 
                
                   You read a book every week and then write 2 mini essays after each, so be ready to read and write. You'll write two essays (and the latter is LONG AND a group essay) so make sure you're ready to do that. 
                
                   There is a lot of reading. Did I mention ALOT of reading? The twice weekly reading responses can sometimes be very lengthy. The readings are interesting and she is an awesome professor. Attendance does count.
                
                   Dr. Robinson is awesome! She's really helpful and makes her class very interesting. I had a lot of fun in this class, and I would definitely take a course from her again. There's a lot of reading, but it's all novels, not a textbook. Great professor!
                
                    ThisI hated the twice weekly reading responses. It was like doing a short essay twice a week.
                
                   She was a very interesting and enthusiastic teacher.  She had great charisma when dealing with students.  The class does entail a rather large work load, but it's very rewarding.
                
                   She knows her stuff but demands a lot of work. It's not hard work but it's time consuming. I think she teaches the online course which I would recommend instead. If you do average work or don't cover every detail, plan on getting a B. Not an easy A class but you do learn a lot and it will help you in the long run.
                
                   Great professor. Class is largely  paper based. If you aren't a good writer, class can be difficult. Makes Shakespeare very interesting though.
                
                   Dr. Nelson was an awesome professor. Reading for each class can be a bit long at times, but it is not necessary to read the full book or article for class. Each class you write an "in-class writing" and she is normally very lenient on those grades. She is a tough grader but if you go into office hours to discuss an essay then she is very helpful.
                
                   Don't take her if you can help it. No one in the class likes her. She assigns ridiculous amounts of reading, and if no one answers her questions in class you sit there in silence. Really nice, but beats around the bush and is awkward. You can tell she is really passionate about english but it does not translate enough for students to enjoy it too. 
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS TEACHER! She gives unrealistic amounts of reading. The exams (which is 6+ page papers) has absolutely nothing to do with what is discussed in class. She gives 1 question reading quizzes EVERYDAY. She will call you out in class if she does not think you are paying attention. I have so many complaints, just DO NOT take her.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I liked this course a lot--my poetry has improved greatly and I have joined an interest group. We used the text so little I don't remember what it was.
                
                   Class was fun and easy; textbook was a waste--do not buy it.
                
                   This class was great. McCann is an awesome professor and she always gives feedback, and is always ready to help with any questions. She encourages students and seems very passionate about the subjects she teaches.
                
                   Oldie but goodie.  Lots of fun.  I am going to sign up for more of her courses.
                
                   His tests are all from the book so pay attention to what he highlights in the books. I didn't pay attention in the beginning of class and I made a 77 on the test, then I started to pay attention and a high B on the next test. His test never change and are all open ended. He gives you a quote and you identify it, not hard if you study. He curves!
                
                   BORING...mainly bc in afternoon, rather easy, he was sick alot.  attendence policy, but easy B, work hard and maybe get an A
                
                   She is a pretty awesome lecturer & really spiked my interests. She makes her points VERY clears. There are two writing assignments due per week & she/her TA grades pretty tough. There is a midterm & final that are pretty tough, but if you go over her power points & your notes, you should be fine. No extra credit & she drops the lowest assignment.
                
                   Her TA grades her papers (you write one before or during every class) and I had a hard time understanding what she wanted despite going into office hours multiple times. I had friends in the class who didn't struggle at all so maybe English just isn't my thing. Lectures are long but she's a good prof.  Occasionally gives attendance extra credit.
                
                   This class is very reading and writing intensive. One in class writing and one online writing a week (300 words.) Aside from the workload, this class is easy. Dr. Hodgson is wonderful. She is very passionate about teaching her subject and she absolutely loves to help students learn. She will do everything she can to help you succeed in her class.
                
                   This class is very reading and writing intensive. One in class writing and one online writing a month (300 words.) Aside from the workload, this class is easy. Dr. Hodgson is wonderful. She is very passionate about teaching her subject and she absolutely loves to help students learn. She will do everything she can to help you succeed in her class.
                
                   There is a writing assignment every time you go to class. The teaching assistant does all the grading and even if you follow all of the instructions, she will never give you 10 out of 10 points. It is impossible to get full credit on an assignment.
                
                   Lucia is a very easy professor. By putting in minimal effort you can make a high B or an A in the class.  The textbook is required and almost every time you go to class you have to type a paragraph about a reading from the book.  These are really short. The test are online and easy. There is one group project but its an easy A. Take this professor.
                
                   Super confusing instructions.
                
                   He's a really cool teacher. I'm not an English major but he made me love to write in my free time. Homework is minimal and what is given is actually kind of fun. I hated poetry until I took his class and now I sort of love it. He is really funny and friendly. A lot of times we were told to go to the library instead of having to attend class.
                
                   I found English under this prof to be an extremely easy A. She teaches mostly advanced Englishes classes, so it should be expected that this prof will be *very* picky when it comes time to grade essays. The students who did bad in this class came in not truly knowing how to write at the university level. High school level English won't cut it. 
                
                   STAY FAR AWAY FROM THIS LADY! She grades on the MOST ridiculous things. You can do whatever you want to try and improve, and she will still find "errors" in your paper. I went to her office personally to ask questions and my grade never improved. She expects students to know information she has NOT taught. 
                
                   One of the hardest classes I've taken. I'm an English major and like writing and I still get shut down. I have worked 10 hours on an assignment to be told it is "adequate." In class we learn how to critique work where it is not offensive. Yet, she does not practice what she teaches. Want to be told how terrible your writing is? Sign up is here.
                
                   Dr. Gutierrez was a good teacher. You can pretty much get through the class without doing the assigned reading and I feel like she's very fair with grading. She seems intimidated by students and their questions, but overall I truly enjoyed her class.
                
                   Overall a dry professor. Lectures are long and he is prone to going off topic. Assigns 4 papers as test grades with unclear expectations and gives minimal feedback.  
                
                   There are 2 papers and 2 tests. There are a couple homework assignments. Do them all. A lot of reading, but he makes it interesting. Go to class and you'll do fine. Go to class and office hours and you'll do great.
                
                   OMG - I thought it was just me!  I am a senior, I've taken many English classes and always excelled - except in Forman's class.  She never graded by the rubric, her critiques did not match what she asked for.  Very frustrating.  Thank goodness I'm confident enough in my writing to not take her comments seriously.  NOT a good instructor.
                
                   If you voted for Obama you will love this professor. Her grading policy is unintelligible, her essay comments are rude and not designed to be constructive.  She gave us an assignment with one hour notice - glad I was online to see that one coming.  Only instructor I've had at A&M that I thought was truly disrespectful to students.
                
                   This class is difficult because the teacher (she is not a professor) is so unclear about what she wants.  She contradicts herself, does not follow her own rubric, deducts points for things you would never have thought....grades heavily influenced by how liberal the student is, not their writing skills.  Don't take her!!!!!
                
                   Ms. Foreman is an excellent teacher. She makes class fun, and our reading are really interesting. Her lectures are really interesting, too. The only grades in the class are reading quizzes, journals and 3 major essays. If you follow the instructions on her paper prompts, you should do good. Take her class!
                
                   Very awesome prof!  She made it fun and exciting. I'm not a reader but  loved coming to class  She does expect you to work though.  Attend class and take a few notes, you'll be fine.  We had reading assignments each class day, a majority of which took at most 10 minutes to complete.  2 essays and 1 midterm, they were super easy since I took notes! 
                
                   Dr. Eide is amazing. I would recommend her to anyone who needs an English credit. 55% of your grade is one HW question (3 per week). We read 9 books this semester, so watch out for that. 3 tests with 3 essay queseions each. Easy day. Very sweet and helpful, but don't make her mad. She's no doormat, and will tell you how it is.
                
                   She is great as a teacher and definitely tries to make it less boring but it is very easy to get behind in the readings because there are so many books and reading and very fast paced.
                
                   I am way more of a 'math mind' than an 'english mind,' however, I absolutely loved her class. I'm also not a morning person & had this class at 9:35am. I actually found myself wanting to go to her class! It requires a lot of reading, but it's not boring and unnecessary. She loves everything she teaches, and loves to interact with her students!xoxo
                
                   Professor Eide stimulated my interest as an English major. She's fun, enthusiastic and her intellectuality is intriguing. Plus she's hot, which doesn't hurt ;) Read your assigned readings and you will do fine! Loved this class!
                
                   Great teacher. very enthusiastic. she enjoys what she teaches and loves interacting with her students.knows her material and presents it clearly.her tests are not difficult if you read everything.
                
                   She's awesome. Her class is really interesting. She is a fair grader, but her class is really hard for sure. It has a ton of reading, but she is willing to help you outside of class if you go to office hours. It is not an impossible class, but you definitely have to do your work.
                
                   She's awesome. She knows her stuff AND puts the erotic back into pedagogy. You'll want to come to class.
                
                   Great prof, excellent pedagogical skill. Cares greatly about students and intellectual freedom. Facilitated a dialogical course that engaged students and encouraged maximum learning. Graded fairly.
                
                   Oooops!
                
                   Excellent teaching ability. Great professor. very helpful.
                
                   so so
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Not a bad class. The readings can be long, and the weekly quizzes can be tough, but her lectures help a lot. The weekly assignments aren't too bad, the TA gives helpful feedback. Two exams that are both online, a midterm and a final. The group project is a lot of work and she isn't extremely clear about it, but it isn't super difficult.
                
                   I spent the first half of the class living in the Zambian bush for an internship with little access to internet. Regardless, I got every assignment turned in on time. She changed the time of the final the day before and I got locked out. When I went to her office, she called me a bad student. The F has effected scholarship and work opportunities. 
                
                   This was an online English class i took. There are weekly reading quizzes and assignments; the assignments are rarely hardlong but the quizzes are a bit tough- you MUST read the assigned readings. Sometimes, those are pretty long. Only two tests and a pretty easy group project as the major grades. 
                
                   Great professor. She's very passionate about what she teaches and she's very approachable. If you read and study you should do fine on her tests.
                
                   Even though I am not an English major, this class is one of the best I have taken. Dr. Cooper is a fantastic professor, but I will say that he is not the fairest grader in the world. Like many other teachers, I think he forgets that most students have other classes to study for and do not have 10-15 hours a week to devote to one class.
                
                   If you're a strong writer, prepare to have your confidence crushed. He is a really nice prof, but he grades terribly hard. I went to office hours one time and they helped tremendously! If you have to take him, you'll be fine. If you have the option of switching then switch. Material we covered was all fantasy based, not your typical ENGL 104 class.
                
                   Rich is a chill professor. He curses and makes the class enjoyable. However, this ENGL 104 class isn't as easy as others. He expects you to read VERY difficult, obscure novels about mushrooms and drugs. He is a HARD grader and is not afraid to tell you that your writing isn't up to his standards. He WILL give unfair pop quizzes if you don't read. 
                
                   Awesome guy, very relaxed and open to hear student opinions. He only gives quizzes when he suspects no one is paying attention and other than that there are a few papers due nothing very intense as long as you keep up with the reading. He's very willing to work with students. I highly recommend
                
                   An extremely interesting fellow that can captivate you for 50 straight minutes without effort. Writing assignments are extensive, and he expects a lot, but he grades fairly. He also randomly calls you out and asks your opinion, so be prepared for that.
                
                   Very interesting class/professor. Very much enjoyed his class.
                
                   One of the most amazing professors ever
                
                   Dr. Bowers is an AMAZING professor! Her class was very interesting! She picked great readings and novels- not boring at all! I actually enjoyed reading! Throught the semester you have to do 10 blogs, which are over everything you read. Also, there are 3 papers- one of them being a research paper (Your final). One of my favorite profs at A&M! :)
                
                   Awesum prof, hot, likes hippy writers tho
                
                   Really good teacher, very interesting. Best teacher ive had at A&M.
                
                   Good professor. Seems tough at first but just go to his office hours and be nice.
                
                   I really loved the class I took with Dr. Bhattacharya. Not an exceptionally difficult grader, but not an easy A by any means. She is one of the most brilliant people I've met - there were so many times she turned a student's babbling claims into clear, coherent ideas that advanced me understanding of the subject at hand. A lovely person and prof.
                
                   Most classes were discussions of the book, while the rest were students presenting their book reviews. She also had several days that were online discussions.
                
                   Class was mostly just discussions about the readings. Tons of extra credit to be earned. Super easy A.
                
                   Awesome prof! Reading is fun. Attendance not mandatory but you must go to pass the class. Test is out of 110 pts, 90+ is A, essay format, 22 quotes or themes from books you must analyze. All the quotes and themes are covered in class so take good notes. 2 mandatory essays from given topics. Super easy, super fun, do the reading, attend class.
                
                   AMAZING PROFESSOR!!! He knows Sci-fi like the back of his hand. Every class is very interesting and I recommend this class to all of my friends.
                
                   if you are into science fiction novels and short stories, this is a great class to take. There is A LOT of reading!!!! You have 2 essays to write but he gives you multiple choices for your topic and multiple dates to turn it in. Tests are easy if you actually read and take notes.
                
                   She is a very abrasive person, but beneath the shell she is a sweet cookie.  Be prepared to write a lot, and read n front of people every week. Introverts beware.
                
                   Took online
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Took the class online.  Does a good job of helping you before your final draft with things to correct.  Sometimes instructions for reviewing other people's papers are hard to understand, which can really change your grade in a negative way.
                
                   I actually took this class online, but Dr. Tyrer was easily the best online professor I have had!  She was always willing to answer questions, and her class material was consistently enjoyable.  Take this class! It doesn't take more than about an hour or two a week, and is fun along the way.
                
                   He's not very clear about what he wants when it comes to essays and tests. He's a really tough grader. You have to try really hard to get an A or a B on writing assignments. Conferences help a little with this though. He gives lots of points away for classroom participation, so make sure to go to class.
                
                   Dr. Severn is one of my favorite professors. He is really laid back and although some of the material is boring, he makes it interesting. He is super helpful. DEFINITELY go to him during office hours. If you make the effort, you can easily get an A in his class.
                
                   AMAZING teacher. He goes out of his way to help you and make you have a good time learning english. If you have the chance to have him DO ITTT!!!
                
                   If you have an opportunity to take a course taught by Dr Severn, you should absolutely take it. He is without a doubt the BEST teacher I have ever had - the course I took challenged me but was not impossible, and Dr Severn is VERY willing to help students who need it. He never failed to make class interesting.
                
                   Best Professor I will probably ever have in college; quizzes were fill in the blank, but STRAIGHT from the lecture; papers were a little difficult, but he doesn't grade hard; if you can stay on top of things and not procrastinate, this class is totally for you; if you put in the effort and go to class, there is no reason you shouldn't make an A.
                
                   Honestly he is my favorite professor. He helps with any questions. I have not had too much of a problem in his class and when I did, he helped with everything he could.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   All papers are over the same topic. All papers seemed repititious. Mondays were lectures, and Wednesday and Thursdays were time with the TA's (teaching assitants). My TA barely spoke english. Had difficulty with her. Severn didnt help with my TA problem.
                
                   There are good professors, and there are bad professors -- you'll have both. But, I hope that once, just once, you can have a professor like Dr. Severn. He makes his class interesting and fun, all the while, you're learning things you never knew before, or see things in new perspectives. Severn is a great guy all around.
                
                   Dr. Roos is an inspiration.  She creates an atmosphere of critical thinking through lectures and class participation.  I recommend her courses to anyone wanting to sharpen and expand their literary knowledge.
                
                   She was very helpful and wanted to see all students succeed. You have daily quizzes over the readings, super easy questions with a sentence or 2. If you have an A or B average in quizzes and no more than 4 absences, you're exempt from the final. Lots of reading but totally worth it.
                
                   Incredible teacher!  Willing to do anything for her students, really enjoys the subject matter and is very interactive with the class, cannot recommend her enough.
                
                   extraordinary teacher!  compassionate, humble, and has a way of teaching that is not intimidating but very effective!  Could not stress enough what a great instructor she is to all of her students!
                
                   She is a great teacher who is wiling to do whatever it takes to help he students succeed! Fairly easy class as long as you keep up with your paper!
                
                   lots of reading, but no textbook.  really cares about students and is very helpful and lenient if she feels you're trying. interesting subject matter, good class discussions--sometimes felt as though there were lots of questions brought up but no answers. papers were not given definite directions but she offers to clarify. good teacher, good class.
                
                   Brilliant, helpful, fair.  Looks you in the eye. A straight shooter.  Worth the work.
                
                   Dr. meljac is wonderful espically if you are not a fan of english. 4 essay, take home midterm, class discussion. Very helpful! highly recommend taking for english 1301,1302  
                
                   Dr. Meljac is the best! He is very passionate about his students and teaching. If you need the help, he is there for you and won't let you fail. Clear instructions, and not a tough grader. Participation really helps and he also notices those who show up and try. Wonderful teacher, never liked English until I took his class. 
                
                   Likes discussion in class, read your book, will work with you, never really angry, after 5 skips lose a letter grade
                
                   Her lectures are amazing. Her passion is contagious, and she is just a downright awesome teacher. However, do exactly what she says in papers, or you will regret it.
                
                   This is an English class but she gives you philosophy readings and asks you to write about it. She grades hard. However, her grammar tests is super easy. You just need to listen what she says in class, review at home and you can do well. Nevertheless, she is very nice and sweet. No homework. You need to read a reader at home to do pop quizzes.
                
                   Dr. Macdonald is one of the most brilliant instructors that I have ever met!  She has an unmatched ability to present material in which I had NO interest in learning and made me really want to learn the material and do outside research on the subjects.  EXTRAORDINARY INSTRUCTOR!  wow...  If you get the chance to take her course, DO!
                
                   :)
                
                   Hands down, Dr. MacDonald is the best English teacher I've ever had. She's quite passionate about what she does and is explains ALL of her material, most of which is from novels, with crystal like clarity.
                
                   Dr. MacDonald is quite possibly the most passionate instructor I've had the privilege of studying with.  Her passion for the subject matter as well as her students is refreshing.  Plus you may find yourself really enjoying literature and its examination.
                
                   Dr. MacDonald is the greatest teacher I've ever had.  she changed my life, and made me want to study English and be like her someday.  Some people were born to teach.  dr. MacDonald is one of them.  Take her class.  you won't regret it.
                
                   TOUGH grader. Cool person, not exactly a great professor. Probably wouldn't take her class again. Very specific in essays.
                
                   She gives homework and then fails you because she didn't like your wording on a short answer. She grades essays without telling you criteria. During lectures she repeats herself about 6 times and treats the class like elementary kids. Absolutely the worst class I've ever taken.
                
                   Good Luck.
                
                   Firm but fair. If you take an interest and interact during class and show that you actually read the material your grade will reflect his pleasure. Attendance will get you; I had perfect scores on all papers and tests, but thanks to attendance received a C.
                
                   He is very laid back and friendly. The class can be a little boring at times, but he often does a lot of interesting things like having authors call the class and talk about their book.
                
                   Dr. Hunt is a very simple professor. In 1302, he was very direct and clear in his instructions. Some students thought we read and wrote too much. Yeah, and that makes no sense in an English class! If you have a problem and put in the work, he'll help you. The class is very useful and sets you up for other general requirement classes very well.
                
                   Very hard prof, but willing to help!  This class is not an easy class, I'm a nursing major and it was my hardest class this semester!
                
                   I wasn't very fond of this class or the teacher.  I don't think he liked me for some reason.  I didn't do well on ANY paper.
                
                   Dr. Hunt is very smart. He can be a tough grader, but if you pay attention to what he marks, you can really improve. I'd take a class from him again.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He was an amazing professor.  I learned so much in his class.  He also took the time to work with me on my papers and told me that I had real writing talent.  He was challenging, but fair.  Once when the class did badly on a test, he threw out the questions that 75 percent of the students missed.  I took several of his classes.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                